
                   Always dreaded going to this class. He does not have homework grades, just test grades. He hasas 2 finals at end of semester and 5 others. If I asked a question he repeated himself and didn't answer the question without looking at me like I'm stupid. I will NOT take him for calculus 2. 
                
                   He starts off the course with the intention to fail you. The only reason the school keeps him is because of how much money he makes WTAMU for writing the damn books. Would not recommend.
                
                   This guy is on his own level when it comes to math. I like that he has his lessons in handouts. It eliminates the textbook cost and is much easier to understand. You may make a C in his class, but you will understand math way better than the kids that make A's with other professors and do better in all your other classes if you just get through it.
                
                   Easily one of the most intelligent professors at the university. Ambrose is an effective instructor and is always willing to help those who are dedicated enough to do the work. His classes aren't the easiest, but you will receive a wealth of knowledge from his courses. Do the homework (twice if you want a good grade) and you will be golden.
                
                   Teaches in a very Obscure method, very different from most other teacher's lessons.
                
                   I thought he did things very fairly. I had to drop Calculus, but that is because math is not my thing, and it was just too fast for me.
                
                   Booooooo!!!
                
                   Dr. Ambrose is brilliant.  He's not very exciting but seriously, if you want to learn math at ANY level, he's the professor you want teaching you.  He'll show you the right way to do everything and he's not confusing.  If you have questions he's always glad to answer them.  Don't get stuck with the other prof's, just choose Ambrose.
                
                   Probably the most knowledgeable math teacher at WT. He is very good at explaining complex mathematical concepts clearly and logically. Just do all of the assigned homework and it will go well!
                
                   Egotistical to the point of ineffectivness  No teaching skills
                
                   Mr. Ambrose has taught at WT for more than 30 years!  If you are serious about his course you will find him easy to get along with.  One missconception is that he is not approachable, however I have that not to be true.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I think Mr. Ambrose is a robot that Dr. Van Doren winds up and lets loose when he comes into work in the mornings.
                
                   I've had Mr. Ambrose several times. If you want to learn, he's the one.
                
                   Focuses on his "videos", doesn't teach, he writes "office hours" on the syllabus, that means he'll be in his office then right? Wrong. Wasted my time in this class. Very disappointed for this man getting hired.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great prof, knows his stuff. Clearly defines what he expects and challenges students to think.
                
                   Very good teacher, if you want to learn.  Explains very well, do your home work...ask questions...and you should make an A.  Most of all attend class and you will understand her easy methods of learning...
                
                   His TAs don't know how to explain things to help you understand. He also looks at you like you're stupid if you ask questions during lecture. 
                
                   Has a very dry sense of humor that I appreciate
                
                   Make sure to ask questions if you do not understand the material. He is willing to help anyone. He gives about 4 exams plus the final if you do you homework and reviews and understand the process of each problem you should be fine. Easy class. 
                
                   Great teacher! wish I could take him for physics two. Make sure to take notes and go to test reviews, they are worth the time!! 
                
                   I only made a B instead of an A, because I missed several labs. DJ is a great professor. Few students dropped through out semester. He has a good sense of humor. Very helpful. Weekly homework and several open book quizzes to boost grade. Would recommend to anyone taking physics 1.
                
                   Jacobs a humorous professor who loves what he does. As long as you have an open mind you will enjoy and thrive in his class. Nice man and an even better professor.
                
                   HE IS A VERY GOOD TEACHER
                
                   Great teacher, he was very helpful and his lectures are great. He does give pop quizzes once a week but he goes over the answers. You do need to study for the tests but nothing too crazy. Textbook is needed for daily homework.
                
                   He is very nice and sweet. I took him in Summer. His class is interesting and easy. The lectures are clear. Before the test, he always gives you the practice tests. They are very useful for you to know how the test look likes and prepare well for it. He gives you many homework, but it is helpful since test questions will be similar to his homework.
                
                   Awesome teacher! Teaches everything clear and to the point where we can understand. HW almost every night but he always asks if you have questions before class starts, and it's nothing to difficult. Group quizzes were so helpful! Very kind and wants the best for his students. One of my BEST professors so far! 
                
                   Just show up, do the homework and you'll do fine on the test. He does a good job at explaining the material. 
                
                   He is a really good teacher and is there to help you as long as you ask. He even helped with homework questions before class started. 
                
                   Gives you a very clear explanation on everything. Does give homework and exams aren't really hard, but do study. 
                
                   Best Math teacher I've ever had. He is so motivating and you can tell he wants his students to succeed. 
                
                   Charming and very interested his students. Creates a power point of the days work and posts it online. Grades are posted shortly after tests/quizzes. You have to actively try to get a poor grade or not learn from him.
                
                   horrible...reason for him getting let go by TX A&M
                
                   BEST MATH TEACHER EVER!!!!
                
                   He is an awesome teacher that loves to help out the students.  He wants you to make a good grade! I think he's the greatest math teacher here!
                
                   By far my favorite teacher my first semester of college. Yes her class is hard but what math in college isn't? She was very nice and helpful. Cares about students (learns everyones name). She made it as fun as math can be.
                
                   She's awesome but if you do not go to her class or the math lab, you will fail horribly.
                
                   She was an amazing teacher. Always willing to help and willing to answer any questions.
                
                   Teacher is nice and her teaching is alright, but if you don't attend classes you will hands down fail. She takes attendance, doesn't give extra credit, and doesn't accept late work.
                
                   This professor is fantastic! She truly cares about the success of her students and if you attend class, you will make a good grade. Like any other college course, you have to give a little effort. She is a wonderful professor and really helped me if I ever needed anything. I made a good grade in her class, too!
                
                   This instructor is an excellent person, and probably a capable or better mathematician. She is however, in desperate need of training as an instructor. Keep track of her ratings, with some solid assistance, she could become outstanding.
                
                   Fair amount of homework online for completion grade. Tests mirror the homework for the most part. Don't like group projects in general, but his weren't too bad. No attendance but daily quizzes worth a few points each. Reviewing for tests is necessary but didn't stress at all to make my A.
                
                   Great teacher, very clear and helpful. LOTS OF HOMEWORK though. Have to turn in a (usually 10-15 question) homework assignment every class day of the semester. Gets old fast.
                
                   Good professor, lots of homework. Take good notes and a lot of them. Book is essential and would even suggest a solutions manual.
                
                   Love Mrs. Timmons! Very clear with her material, whatever is on reviews given is what is on exams. Homework is simple and she gives great and very helpful notes. As long as you take notes and study her reviews you can make an A. She can be in a way dull, but such a great teacher. 
                
                   Great mathematician and a good teacher.
                
                   Very intelligent, loves the subject he teaches...and intelligent and interested student will enjoy his classes a lot...
                
                   This professor walks into the classroom, writes on the board for a hour and does not explain or answer any questions. Definately the worst professor ever!!!!
                
                   Knows his stuff, fair grader, truly wants the student to learn. Very patient and helpful on difficult subject matter. HIGHLY recommend.
                
                   Don't take him, he doesn't know anything about teaching.
                
                   Good professor. Grades fairly.
                
                   Boring class. His tests are hard and more like mymathlab than his lectures. If you absolutely have to take this class, go to study sessions and prepare for the quizzes and tests with mymathlab. otherwise, i would recommend taking the class at Blinn. Cumulative final. He skips the baby steps and if you get lost, you're screwed.
                
                   very knowledgeable but does not answer questions well
                
                   very hard to understand,speaks very quickly and does not go back on topics
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The first two tests were extremely easy, then out of no where I failed the 3rd and final exam. She doesn't prepare you at all for those last two test. Even if you do all the additional problems she hands out it will be difficult. Study very hard for those last two tests or you could easily fail.
                
                   I would highly recommend Rashi for 167! She is the sweetest professor ever and really cares about her students' success. There were 4 exams, weekly quizzes, and online hw. The material itself isn't hard, but it is essential to attend lecture to do well. Do all the work and put in the effort, and a B is guaranteed and an A is definitely doable.
                
                   Rashi's 141 class had a few aspects I really enjoyed. First, she posts all of the class notes online each week. They were really easy to learn from because they go step by step rather than answer only. The quizzes exams were avg. difficulty, overall work load not bad at all. many concepts I knew from HS, not a hard class
                
                   My class had about 300 kids therefore she gave us take home quizzes that were due the following class. About 2-3 homeworks due every Wednesday. homework similar to lecture and lecture very similar to the test. 1st test easy 2nd the lowest average 3th  B average and final relatively easy. She is so helpful and sweet.  never used the textbook.
                
                   Dr. Arora's class demands a lot of work. You have weekly homework assignments and weekly quizzes. There were four tests in total that were fairly difficult. I've attended A&M for two years and her final was the first test I ever got below a 70.  She is personable and approachable though. She's a decent prof, but I wouldn't recommend her.  
                
                   Rashi is a great prof! Math has always been a difficult subject for me, but she made the concepts easy to understand. Her tests are straight forward, no tricks. The problems on the tests are from either the additional problems she gives as a review, or lecture notes hw. 
                
                   Arora's class was actually pretty decent. She offers ALOT of office hours and is willing to help you if you need it. She gives a lot of homework but it does truly help you to understand quizzestests. She keeps lecture pretty interesting and actually has a personality. I would suggest her to other people just be ready to actually listen and do work
                
                   She really cares about her students and it shows. Her exams aren't too difficult if you focus in lecture and when you're working on the homework. There will be plenty of homework but it's not too bad. The quizzes are take home and are usually pretty short. Homework and quizzes are good grade boosters. I highly recommend to take this professor. 
                
                   Great professor, she really cares about her students. She puts all her completed notes online, quizzes are take home, and tests are announced far in advance so you can afford to skip class sometimes. I would take her again.
                
                   Quizzes are take home which is nice. Homework is kind of heavy but very manageable. She is helpful outside of class as well.  Lectures are fine, unless you're a math genius you need to make sure you attend. A lot is covered in one lecture. Overall, good prof and a B is totally manageable. Take her.
                
                   Grades are evened out nicely, but no reviews for the tests. I advise to save EVERYTHING, including homeworks,and redo them all every day before the test. Tests are 20 multiple choice, all quizzes were take home. Very sweet lady, just not the best at communicating when questions were asked. B is very possible for the average student.
                
                   Rashi is the absolute best! I am good with math, but I think even if you are not particularly you would find this class to be fairly easy. She is the sweetest person and genuinely cares about her students. She even answers homework questions via email the night that it's due. Honestly have no complaints about her.. I would recommend her to anyone! 
                
                   Rashi is the best Math Teacher I have ever had. Math is very difficult for me and she worked so hard to make sure I understood and learned the material. She is very dedicated to her students and is a really great teacher. Her classroom is a very positive learning place and she treats all of her students equally and kindly!
                
                   Rashi is one of the best Math professors I've ever had. She dos her best to make sure each individual student understands the subject matter. I highly recommend you go to her office hours and get to know her personally. Also she is very understanding of making up quizzes and or exams. She is your best choice if you're uncomfortable with math
                
                   She is really helpfull, She  really knows her stuff, i love her because she is looking out for the students. Tries her best to give everyone a good grade.
                
                   Rashi is one of my favorite profs, and is definitely the most helpful prof I have ever had. Class isn't too hard. She is always cheerful. Take Rashi Arora!
                
                   I had her for the Spring 2014 semester. Gave us her old tests to study for our tests and they were VERY consistent to what was on the tests. I ended the semester with an 88.6, but because I went to class on a snowday when a lot of people skipped, she gave me an A. Enjoyed talking with her and she will do whatever she can to help you.
                
                   Made this class easy to understand. Gives plenty of practice problems in nots to make sure material is understood. Homework problems each week that is for a grade with helpful problems. Need help?...GO TO HER OFFICE HOURS! She will help you as much as you need to understand. Tests are straight forward and not tricky.
                
                   Rashi is easy, friendly, and funny. As long as you ay attention and do the homework, you'll do fine,
                
                   Very friendly and helpful, but not always the best at explaining concepts. The homework and quizzes don't always correlate with the lecture problems, which makes it difficult to figure out. Quizzes were hard, but tests weren't bad. The textbook isn't ever used.
                
                   Professor messed up midterm grades for several students in the class and did not correct them.  Did not offer any curves while other professors did.
                
                   Entered wrong midterm grade for several students
                
                   Standard course, good teacher. Very clear, not big on curves though.
                
                   Dr. Battle is the sweetest professor. MATH 401 was not hard if you do/understand the homework because that is basically the tests. He gives you a review sheet for each test. If you want to know what hw problems he assigns, arrive early for class and actually go to class.
                
                   Professor Battle is the best professor I have ever met. He is kind, earnest very patient with student's questions.
                
                   good, nice
                
                   He definitely knows what he is talking about, but doesn't take the time to make it clear to the class or make the theorems connect to examples. I did most of my learning outside of class or based on knowledge I already knew from high school. Not recommended.
                
                   Amazing professor. Would definitely recommend for any math course. His tests can be challenging but he teaches you more than enough to succeed on them if you go to class
                
                   Very fair professor with the ability to give an effective lecture. His tests and quizzes are straightforward. I recommend studying past ones on his website. Attendance isn't mandatory but recommended, because his lectures are helpful. The homework also is optional, yet recommended. 
                
                   Gives good examples in class. Can sometimes lose you by going fast or from his moderate accent. In class quizzes are not bad, can be found online. Tests are very hard. He is a very strict grader, gives almost no partial credit. He really does not want to curve despite awful test averages. Attendance is not mandatory, but recommended.    
                
                   He gives quizzes based off of the homework he assigns. He explains everything very well & most of the time the questions on the exam were examples given in lecture. Show up to class & it's an easy A! 
                
                   He substituted for a portion of my analysis course, i really wish i would have had the opportunity to take a full class from him. He made everything so easy to understand! I never had any questions because he explained everything so well the first time around.
                
                   GREAT PROFESSOR. Tests are not hard compared to the other 251 teachers. Homework is of course on webassign. Very nice professor! Fair also!
                
                   I loved this professor. His accent was hard to get used to at first, but it really wasn't that bad. He spent a lot of time explaining why certain theories and equations worked. He was very helpful outside of class and encouraged students to visit him during office hours. He is one of the better engineering math teachers and I highly recommend him.
                
                   good
                
                   Very poor lecturer.  He doesn't explain things well.  I ended up dropping the class after getting a 35 on the 1st test and a 52 on the second.  I took the class again during the summer and got an A.  Stay away from this professor.
                
                   He was extremely paranoid about people using their computers during lecture in the computer lab.  If he suspected somebody was looking at their monitor he would call him out and force him to sit in the front row.  He's pretty crazy.  The problems on his tests aren't difficult, but they are entirely too long for the time alotted.
                
                   Shows up late to class everyday, never finishes material on time. Explination dont help. If you value grades dont take this professor!!!!!!!!
                
                   Considering I had taken Calculus in high school, MATH 151 itself was mostly a repeat save for a few topics. If you did well taking it in high school and will be taking his honors section, this is the teacher to go to. If not stay away since lectures lack substance if you won't be able to use the calculator. Learning the calculator is great too!
                
                   Belmonte used up to half of the class time teaching us how to use calculators. aka for up to half of the class time HE DIDN'T TEACH CALCULUS. Absolutely prideful; refuses to listen if you have a question as to whether if a graded test may have been misgraded.  Do not take Belmonte. Only good thing is that he posts summaries online.
                
                   He was by far the worst math teacher I've ever had. He barely taught anything in class, and if he did, he would teach the topic on the calculator which we couldn't use on the exams. I went to class, but it was honestly pointless because he would just rant about the calculator the whole time. I would not recommend him.
                
                   I rarely went to class and it didn't make a difference for me I did take calculus in high school however. Overall I found him funny with his repetitive phrases. He was actually pretty helpful during office hours if you had questions. He would be good if you have a good understanding of calculus already since attendance isn't required and no quizzes
                
                   He is difficult to comprehend and has very little leeway for students. He does not curve and he teaches with a calculator when the common exams are without a calculator. 
                
                   If you have never taken Calculus, he won't help at all! He only complains about how Amy Austin and the Math Dpt. don't let MATH 151 students use calculators on exam.  If you do take him, be sure to go over Amy Austin's and JD Kim's notes and reviews for exams!!!  EXPECT TO HAVE A HARD TIME DURING COMMON EXAMS!! 
                
                   MATH 151 is an incredibly easy class. That said, Belmonte isn't a great teacher of the material and his lectures are unhelpful and often stray from the topic at hand. If you have a basic understanding of calculus coming in, you will be better off teaching yourself the material online.
                
                   I'm in honors math 151, and Belmonte is definitely my favorite of all my professors this semester. His sayings are hilarious, and the lecture videos he posts on his webpage are extremely helpful. He makes math151 incredibly easy.
                
                   Professor Belmonte does not know how to teach. He spends way to much time talking about how to do things on the calculator and you cant even use it on the test. The things he does by hand he does not explain thoroughly! If you want to pass his class you basically teach yourself. No need to go to class. DO NOT TAKE HIS CLASS! The TA sucked too
                
                   Belmonte doesn't actually teach you, he mostly endorses his calculator. A typical day begins with 5 minutes discussing the "Hot Topics", 5-10 minutes being taught about the content, and the rest of the class is him explaining how to do the problems on his calculator which you can't actually use on any weighted assignment. His jokes are bad too.
                
                   Belmonte obviously knows what he's teaching. He posts lectures online and only works examples during class, but the lectures are basically bullet points with definitions and then the examples that he does during class time. This method of teaching was not beneficial for me and made the class more difficult than it should have been
                
                   DO NOT TAKE HIM!!! He is very rude and not a good professor. All he cares about is how to use the calculator and you cant even use it on the common exams.
                
                   He's a nice guy and is very willing to help, but he does not necessarily know how to teach. Talks way too much about the TI-inspire and raves about the computer algebra system... When you can't use any type of calculator on the common exams. He has a lot of strange sayings that are very annoying at 8am, but you get used to them.
                
                   Really good teacher, you only have to learn the basics of the TI-inspire calculator and your off to the races.  Also his videos are helpful
                
                   good
                
                   Best professor ever.
                
                   I love Mr. Art Belmonte
                
                   Its been several years, but Belmonte is the best math professor I have ever had.  He's not easy, but he's very willing to help, even outside of normal office hrs.  I learned a lot and would recommend him to anyone wanting to really learn and understand the concepts at hand.  You will walk away with an understanding, not just a credit.
                
                   you will never learn how to do a problem but can ace the test using a calculator. however, in calc 3 you dont learn alot of new stuff its just how to apply what you have learned so far. all he does is punch it in the calculator. take someone else and you might learn something. most likely you'll need it. good guy though
                
                   He knows what he's talkin about, but not how to teach it. Spends way too much time talking about the TI-89 and Matlab, but not enough on how to do the problems with paper and pencil, which is what the common exams seem to always be. Ask anyone in my class and they'll tell you they learned more from Amy Austin's web videos than they did from him.
                
                   Overall good professor but his test are way to difficult. I had a very good understanding of the material as i took Diff Eq before and made an A. However his test are very very tricky and i ended up with a C in the class. Avoid this professor!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I had Boas for MATH 409, considered to be one of the harder undergrad math courses. He does a phenomenal job explaining the concepts in a way that just about any student who's taken at least Calculus I will understand. He definitely has a gift for teaching higher math - I highly recommend taking him next time he teaches ANY 400 level math class!
                
                   If you ever have the opportunity to take a class from him,  take it! Honestly best prof f on campus.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The greatest math professor I've ever come across in my whole life. Totally unique way of teaching. Besides, in the office hours, I have never seen such a friendly professor who can help you for anything and everything... simply AWESOME!!!...He is my inspiration.
                
                   Best math teacher I have ever had (and I've taken a lot of math classes).  Very clear in his teaching, and will go the extra mile to help you.
                
                   Very tough class; Teaches at a graduate-level
                
                   Horrible lecture. Get ready to spend a semester confused and not knowing what is happening. The book is a must seeing as you need it to teach yourself the material. DO NOT TAKE!
                
                   He is a very sweet man, but the information is not clear. I made a B on the first exam, only because I had prior knowledge of the material, but on the second test I made a 63. The third test is the final and I am almost positive I didn't pass it, but I think he felt sorry for me and gave me a C. I went to office hours and he would try to help me.
                
                   Not bad accent, I would definitely get the book, go to every class
                
                   If you are an education major, do not take this man. It is awful! He cannot teach to where you understand. Get another prof.
                
                   The only thing that got me through his class was prior knowledge of the course material and Amy Austin's reviews.
                
                   Very tough class; is very patient and helpful if you seek help during office hours
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Mr. Carroll puts up his lecture slides online with explanations (for those who don't go to class) and is really helpful during office hours. He cares about his students and makes an effort to learn everybody's names. There's also a lot of extra credit in the form of optional homework. Don't bother getting the textbook -- he puts it online too.
                
                   I truly enjoyed this class because he is such a great professor! He posts notes from lectures online, gives practice tests before the actual one, and is always willing to help! He's pretty laid-back but the material isn't so it does take some studying but it doesn't seem like that bad of a deal because how much Mr. Carroll helps! 
                
                   David goes above and beyond to help you succeed - posts all lectures online, gives practice exams, gives short easy quizzes, meets you for office hours. Cares very much about students. Class can be quite long and boring, but he does a great job of explaining concepts and offering help. There's no excuse to not get an A or B if you put in the work!
                
                   I loved Dr. Carter's class, and I'm not even really a math person! She makes things easy to understand and gives tons of examples. If you go to class (there are pop quizzes), do the online HW, and study a little, it's an easy A. She even drops your lowest quiz and homework grade from the average.
                
                   He was a great teacher. Accent is not that bad and a very fair grader. He posts notes and a very organized teacher. Well Done
                
                   Very great professor. Very Organized and cool guy. He has  Better accent than most nonwhite professor and grade everything fairly. 
                
                   He is a very nice man, but not the best teacher. He mumbles and will sometimes ramble on, which makes it very hard to focus. If you ask him a question there is a 50/50 chance you will get more confused. Did not feel prepared at all for the common exams and had to teach myself. He is not the worst, but I would recommend taking a different prof.
                
                   You will not understand half of what he says. He takes the book, pulls out his marker, and rewrites the chapters onto the board. He expresses ZERO creativity and helpfullness, and gives no guidance. The lectures are nothing more than the book put into handwriting. The tests are not much like the homework. Expect to teach yourself here.
                
                   Good luck trying to understand him. Very kind man, but he is a mumbler with an accent. He is a great curver though so that is a huge plus. Overall, not great at teaching but it is easy to learn the material via textbook. And go to class. There are frequent quizzes.
                
                   Terrible professor. Does not clearly explain anything. If you ask a question, his answer isn't helpful. Do not take him unless you plan on relying heavily on outside resources to learn the material.
                
                   Very hard class, makes absolutely no sense. Professor is not helpful at all. Beware of this class!!!!
                
                   I took Comech for Math 308 (Differential Equations). He is probably your best bet for Math 308 as it is one of the hardest math classes their is. Comech provides you with plenty of opportunity to pass and even make an A. Lets you use an equation sheet on tests and 30% of the final grade is from homework (easy 30% with chegg at hand). HW from textbo
                
                   Horrible Professor.  She recently graduated and thinks that she knows it all now.  She uses a tone as if you were in kindergarten but vocabulary as if you have a your phd in math.  Homework is ridiculous and her notes do not help what so ever.  She is very snappy in class whenever you ask questions.  I haven't taken her test yet so who knows...
                
                   Definitely one of the harder class I had this semester, despite it only being my first. Tests are usually challenging and her belief of "not-curving or bumping" doesn't make things any better. You have to work hard and put in effort, however, doesn't ever professor expect that out of their students? This class was a rough start to my semester.
                
                   Mrs Cox is a very nice lady for starters. However even though its just 141 math she seemed to make it much more difficult than it had to be. Plus she always talked about her home schooled kids. Most say she helps, but with our class she always made her TA teach us or help out.  Her tests although being easy were nothing like homework or lecture. 
                
                   The notes are easy, the homework is easy, the tests are easy. Never have to memorize a formula and always allows a calculator. If you're doing poorly she also has take-home quizzes and a lot of outside class TA and office hour times.
                
                   Good prof!  Go to class, take notes, do the homework, study for tests, make an A!
                
                   LOVED this prof. She was very helpful, and probably my favorite professor I've ever had during my A&M career. The class took a little work, but she is so willing to work with you!
                
                   Awesome professor would highly recommend her. makes math pretty easy just study the web assign homework's and her weekly quizzes and you can get a B. 3 tests cumulative final and weekly homeworks and quizzes
                
                   GREAT professor, super easy to follow her lectures. You just simply follow along in class with her as she fills out the printed note sheets (not provided). Her tests are straight foward, if you go to class and study a little bit you will make an A. VERY helpful, and is genuinely concerned with making sure anyone who wants to learn, learns.
                
                   Was a good teacher, rather easy if you go to all of her lectures, and practice outside of class a little. Notes are easy since your basically just filling out blanks and doing the problems, just remember to write EVERYTHING she does on the overhead and you'll be fine.
                
                   Lisa was a good teacher and was willing to help, but when it came down to it you had to show you knew the material on the exams. The exams are worth 80% of your grade, so if you are a bad test taker like me, don't take her class. Also, she will not help you at the end if you fail even if you're graduating.
                
                   Amazing professor... cares so much about the students!!
                
                   She is very helpful and very nice. You need to know the material, but she is always willing to help if you do not understand. She is a wonderful person and a great teacher!
                
                   Uses overhead notes for the lectures which can also be downloaded from her web site. Doesn't take attendance. One homework assignment and one quiz every week... all easy though. She's very nice and always willing to help out if you don't understand.
                
                   The MATH141 hybrid class is honestly amazing because you only have to attend class for 1 hour each week and the rest is online. If you have the discipline to actually complete the online lectures & homework, this is a GREAT option. The TA's are great, but you do have to study for Prof Epstein's test because they are not easy by any means
                
                   I took the math 141 hybrid class this semester, and I honestly liked it. However, he material isn't easy if you don't watch the video lectures or do your homework. You never Dr. Epstein because we meet once a week with a TA, who was super helpful. She drops your lowest test score and replaces it with the final, and drops lowest quiz and homework.
                
                   Half of the class was  online. I spent nearly $300 at tutor john to save myself from this prof and I barely ended up with a B with my best effort. Go to EVERY class for quizzes (they aren't actually hard) and do NOT forget your clicker. Take the notes in class for quizzes but figure out the rest yourself. Don't expect to learn anything in class.
                
                   Worst teacher. Her lectures are super confusing you will have to teach yourself all the material so I suggest going to the TA who was actually helpful
                
                   where do i start?  she is a tough teacher and the tests are difficult to say the least especially with little to no partial credit. hard to understand during lecture and you have to go to tutoring to really understand the material presented in class. 
                
                   She goes way too fast, but the TA's and extra sessions can explain all the problems better and slower...
                
                   Online Math 141 with Epstein isn't actually that bad.  She can be confusing, but she is not the one narrating the videos anyways.  She drops the lowest grades from each catergory, lecture videos are part of your grade (participation basically), and she gives a lot of extra credit.  If you're decent at math, this class will be pretty easy. 
                
                   I dropped this class. I do not advise taking this lady, her voice was overtly annoying and her overall teaching methods sucked. Not only that but you basically had to write an entire essay on why you chose a certain answer. Thumbs down all around.
                
                   She is probably one of the worst professors I've had. The online homework isn't too bad, but the tests are stupid hard. I went to her office several times and she always treated me like she had better things to do. Definitely not a professor concerned with student welfare. 
                
                   Her teaching skills definitely need work, the highest grade on the first exam was a 75. Most of the students rely on tutoring in order to learn the material due to her lack of properly explaining the examples. Exams are incredibly hard. Avoid at all costs!!!!!!!
                
                   Hard class. Lots of online homework & quizzes every week. Only good thing is that she drops the lowest quiz grades and homework grades. Tests were quite difficult. The way she teaches is hard to follow and understand.
                
                   Does not explain HOW to solve a problem, a lot of online homework, a lot of quizzes, test are hard, I hated that class. She seems like a nice lady and she is always willing to answer &quot;questionssssssss&#63;&#63;&#63;&quot; :)
                
                   She is very confusing, her in class lectures are weirdly worded. Her tests are crazy, she is very anal about the free response, you hardly ever get full credit for a question. There is also an insane amount of online work. AVOID IF POSSIBLE!!
                
                   The most confusing math teacher you'll ever have. Other teachers teach the same class with much more clarity.
                
                   This class was really hard.  Her tests were completely impossible (she had to curve every test), and she doesn't make any sense in class.  Get math tutoring if you take this class.  She is helpful if you go to her office hours.
                
                   Besides her extremely annoying voice, the class isnt too bad. If you do the online hw & quizzes, and show up on thursdays for in-class quizzes, you'll be fine. She's willing to help you if you go to her office but in class, she makes no sense. She does expect you to know a lot as well, formulas, ect.
                
                   She expects a lot, for you to know every detail and counts off for little things. Gives a lot of notes and sample tests but they are all online so you can print them off. Online quizzes and hw too that help raise your grade.
                
                   dude, this lady is horrible... avoid this class! it maybe the subject material, but when you have to curve the final exam like 25 points then you know theres a problem... the only thing that keeps you afloat is the homework
                
                   She had a bad teaching style, but she gives a lot of extra credit, and that is what made me get an A in the class.
                
                   His thick accent makes him difficult to understand.  Attendance dropped to about 15 of the class after about a month, it is difficult to pay attention to him.  A+ tutoring and online practice problems saved my grade.  I would not take from him again.
                
                   I read the comments here and thought I would give him a chance. Don't...he talks into the board, makes random soccer references, doesn't really articulate any of the points at all. I did not even have a clue as to what he was teaching. I had to use other professor's notes just to get a good grade. Take anyone else.
                
                   He is extremely difficult to understand EXTREMELY
                
                   Could not understand a word he said. Attendance dwindled very quickly
                
                   Very hard to understand and teaches the whiteboard more than he teaches the class.
                
                   always tells the truth.
                
                   Huh&#63; I have no clue what you are saying.
                
                   This class was okay. She's an alright prof (I think she's actually a TA figure), and she made a lot of mistakes and would argue about them. You don't use the textbook at all, unless you want to. There are pop quizzes, and she does give a short review for tests. Aditi is about middle of the row.
                
                   This professor is terrible. The main thing he teaches in class are just the formulas and sometimes how to prove them. He very rarely uses them in examples and is very hard to follow along with. DO NOT TAKE HIM!!!
                
                   Accent is hard to understand, and Fall 2015 was his first actual class, so he was reading off of an outline. Lectures can get confusing if you don't take time to understand him/the math, posts notes online and emails you the week of to notify you of weekly quizzes and homework's. Math help is very available outside of class with other profs.
                
                   He has a very thick and difficult to understand accent. Most of his lectures feel like he's reading off an outline (although he seems like a grad student, so that may be expected). Quizzes every week. Homework every week. Notes are posted online every friday, so lecture attendance would be optional- if not for the quizzes...
                
                   Can we say EXTREMELY DIFFICULT prof&#63; I'm sure 151 is very different from 171, but he lectures really fast, skips steps, & the whole class is lost at times. His tests are hard & he puts problems on them that we've never even SEEN before! And to top all of that, he doesn't curve...tests OR the course! Avg 1st test score was well below passing!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Harrison is a pretty good teacher. It may be hard to understand his British accent at times and it's a little hard to stay awake...especially at the 8am classes. Otherwise, he's a good prof. He does extra help sessions before each test to summarize the notes and stuff.
                
                   Took calculus in high school and passed easy enough, but this class was awful. He doesn't seem to know what he is doing and was constantly being corrected by students and trying to teach us his "easier" way to solve problems, which of course was different than what they were looking for on the common exams. Hard not to fall asleep during lectures.
                
                   Dr. Harris was a good guy. He is not the best, but he is not bad at all. For those saying he goes pretty fast, every calculus teacher will go fast, so that would not be a factor. He is clear in what he explains, but he might do a couple algebra errors, but that mostly doesn't make a difference making a point over a topic he is discussing.
                
                   Took calculus in high school & did well so for the most part i haven't struggled. On some of the new material it is becoming apparent that  Harris works a little too quickly for my taste & doesn't explain things much more than surface level explanations. He often makes mistakes, skips steps, etc. But, he's a nice guy, funny, and very approachable 
                
                   Have Dr. Harris this semester and he's pretty good. I took Calc in High school like most people so I find it kinda boring and easy but I've still struggled a little bit and Dr. Harris has explained stuff to me in class. He can be very lazy and won't even perform simple calculations on the board(like 4*5) but that doesn't mean he isn't smart. 
                
                   I took calculus during high school and it was a breeze. This guy however doesn't know what he's talking about a lot of the time and is often corrected by the students. Take this class if you don't need to learn anything but otherwise it's a waste of time. Often repeats "Questions, comments, concerns?" like the back of a cereal box. Very annoying.
                
                   Okay so i ended up dropping this class mid semester because of how hard it was. I was going to a tutor twice a week and doing all of the assignments and STILL had a hard time making a D! My tutor told me that she's the hardest prof for this class by far! Gives a weekly quiz, 3 tests and a final, & a lot of homework. It took over my life!
                
                   I was in her class for about 2 weeks and had to drop it because she wasn't able to work with me to clarify on topics I needed help with. Definitely doesn't teach the subject very well and the online homework is a NIGHTMARE! Have to retake in the spring either with a different professor or at Blinn
                
                   Great teacher...very tough.
                
                   
                
                   I loved having professor Kahlig. He is my favorite professor I have had thus far. He is very approachable and is great at teaching the material. Highly recommend.
                
                   Difficult class but he makes it manageable.
                
                   Don't take him if you aren't good at Calculus already. He won't slow down to accomodate the whole class. Grades tests very tough. Will try to fail you if he can tell you went to an off campus tutor. You can tell he gets some sort of strange satisfaction by placing a large load of work on his students. Also very unwilling to discuss grades at all.
                
                   This class was so hard, but it was definitely on the back burner for me. Joe is super cool and actually tries to learn his student's name. He's awesome. He's really bad a basic math so make sure you pay attention closely to his lectures. Often he'll set up a problem and not know how to solve it. The content of the class is ridiculous. 
                
                   Joe Kahlig is absolutely awesome. His lectures are extremely clear and helpful, and cover all the necessary topics for succeeding on the tests. Must attend lecture to pass as he gives useful tips that other professors do not. He is extremely helpful in his office hours and is happy to have a conversation. Wish I could have him for every math class.
                
                   Best prof i've had since I've been at A&M
                
                   A GREAT professor. He has notes ready before class to be printed and has them completed and posted online if you happen to miss a day. Enjoyable professor, and has great corny jokes! He'll help you any time you need him. Definitely one of the best professors on campus!! Tries to prepare department tests as best as he can for the class.
                
                   This Professor is amazing!!! He is very helpful, teaches well, and very funny. Do not listen to the people that say his exams are tricky, he doesn't create the exams. The MATH department does, but he does warn you what you are going to be tested on. You just have to show up to class and pay attention.
                
                   This guy is the greatest! All his lectures told me everything I needed to know for the quizzes, homework, and tests. He's to the point and gives you useful information for solving the problems. Aside from that, he's really funny. 10/10.
                
                   Overall a great professor: likable, engaging, funny, helpful, and fantastic at teaching. Posts notes online before class so print them off and bring them to class to fill in as you go. Email him if you're ever confused about something, he's generally quick to respond and very helpful. One of my favorite professors, would recommend for any course.
                
                   Prof. Kahlig was awesome! I highly recommend taking his class. I am not good at math at all, and I managed to get a B in the class. He is funny and makes class enjoyable. Two thumbs up!
                
                   I really enjoyed Joe's class. He is extremely helpful and puts a lot of helpful links on his website. The class is similar to statistics and isn't hard nor easy. If you get Joe as your professor, there's no way you'll fail the class.
                
                   I'm a little over halfway through his class right now and I'm not finding it too difficult. As long as you go to class you should be okay especially if you're strong in math. Printing out the lecture notes from his websites is very helpful. Quizzes ever week once a week.
                
                   I had him last semester, and I didn't think the class was all that bad.  I am a strong math student, but that doesn't mean I still didn't work hard in the class.  If you go to week in reviews for tests (and sometimes for homework) everything will be a lot clearer.  I would take him again for math!
                
                   Prof tries to trick you on the tests.  Not overall too difficult.
                
                   The class is hard, but Joe explains everything with great detail. I am not the strongest math student but when I moved from the back of the class to closer to the front my grade shot up. I finished with a B due to my lousy first test but even skipping some class I managed to get a B. If you do the homework it does help though. I would recommend him
                
                   This class was awful, Ive never taken a class in my entire life where I felt like I really knew the material, but in the end did not do well because of Joe's extremely tricky tests. I had an A on the homework , but apparently that did not matter. He put's every method he taught you as a choice on each question and none of the above. Dont take him!
                
                   Prof Kahlig makes this class WAY too difficult. My class of 300 students got a failing test average for every exam- does that say anything&#63; The HW is pretty do-able. His test try to trick you with &quot;e- answer not here&quot; on every question. Take MATH 141 w/someone else!!!
                
                   He's a nice guy. Always tells lame jokes. His website has everything you need (notes, practice problems and solutions, video solutions, and even more help links) also, i think there are a lot of way to get help without leaving your computer. His lectures are a good speed and he explains things very well.
                
                   Get Bolinger if possible. The past two test  averages for our class of 300+ were a 69 and a 65. Thank God I passed, but I can't say the same for the majority of the class.  I refuse to believe more than half of the class is incapable of receiving a passing grade. Something is wrong and I wished I'd known not to have him as a prof. Thanks & Gig 'Em
                
                   Great professor. I told BC calculus, so the class was an easy A for me, but even if it's not his averages were way above the other sections. He offers lots of resources and cares a lot about his students. Take him if you can. I would retake him in every class, but do make sure you show up and study. It's really important for the first exam.
                
                   This guy is hilarious. Pretty easy grader. You get the grade that you put in the work for. Definitely go to office hours just to know him.
                
                   HE WILL MAKE YOU LAUGH. All of the other students that I know who had him enjoyed his class! Of course he has to go rather quickly to cover all of the material but if you have a question during class, he will do his very best to make you understand. Does his best to make sure each of his students get the grade they want. Amazing professor.
                
                   BEST MATH PROF EVER. I'm not a morning person, but I loved going to his class because it put me in a good mood for the rest of the day. He wants to be more than just your teacher - he wants to be your friend. The course is very fast paced, but he is always available outside of class if you don't understand something. TAKE MATH WITH JD!
                
                   Easily my favorite professor I've had at TAMU. He is very inspirational, and totally there to help you as a student. His class sections had the highest test averages in the University my semester. He does everything he can to help you and is very good at helping develop a problem-solving mindset. Lots of homework though and a tough final exam.
                
                   JD is the best cal 151 prof there is. You will get used to his accent and learn to enjoy his hilarious mannerisms. He gives a "booster" if you're final grade is higher than your tests average. He really cares about his students and i loved how he sneaked in his christian faith into his calculus lectures.
                
                   JD is an amazing teacher. Engineering calculus isn't easy but he is willing to give you everything you need to do well. He has some accent but its perfectly understandable. Gives reasonable homework and is very helpful at office hours.
                
                   JD Kim is such a caring and nice professor. He goes out of his way to make sure we were always prepared for the exams. I liked that in his lectures he gave us exactly the type of problems that were on the exam and on the homework. He posts the notes online which is super helpful.  I wish he taught math 152 that would be amazing.
                
                   JD is absolutely the best 151 prof out there. He really cares about his students and makes it clear that he is always their for us. His positive attitude and love for his students make a great learning environment and he makes everything very easy to understand. He is hilarious and I wish I could take him next semester. 
                
                   JD is one of the best instructors I've ever had in my life. Although I took Calculus in high school and coasted through this course, even people who did not take Calculus prior did well also. His notes and lectures are easy to understand, and his exams are based on examples from notes and homework. He cares about each one of his students, too!
                
                   ABSOLUTELY LOVE JD KIM!!! Nicest man on campus. completely brightens students days with his amazing personality and kind spirit. Not to mention he is a very entertaining professor who cares about all aspects of his job, the teaching, communication, and the responsibility to care and love all of his students. Hoping that I get him again next year!
                
                   I never have any preCal class in high school. I knew absolutely nothing about Calculus. But I get pretty good scores on the exam because JD explains everything well. HE IS THE BEST! He is a friend that understand you and is always willing to be there for you, helping you to succeed in math.
                
                   JD is THE best. I would take his class again and would recommend him everyone. He really cares about his students, wants them to do well, and makes sure everyone understands everything. He is a great person and he is hilarious! I always look forward to this lecture and am never even tempted to sleep. 
                
                   He's cool
                
                   JD  Kim is hilarious and cares a lot about his students success in their academic career. Lectures are clear and he offers help. The class overall was not very difficult if you had taken Calc AB or BC in high school, but there a a few new material that can be taught easily. Great guy overall ! 
                
                   JD is awesome!! He is the BEST teacher. Not only does he care so much about all his students, he is always willing to help. He really cares about how everyone does. He wants to give all A's and B's. He always says that a grade should not define us, but he does his best to give you the grade you EARN. Never took calculus in high school, but its good
                
                   JD is an awesome prof!  He is so helpful and really wants to see his students do well.  The material is hard and there is a lot of homework and weekly quizzes.  But he does week in reviews that are very helpful.  He does curve if your final exam grade is higher than the other 3 tests.  Overall great class! Would definitely recommend him!
                
                   Awesome Professor! He really cares about his students and wants them to do good. I highly recommend taking a class with JD.
                
                   JD is seriously the best! Hilarious guy and cares so much about the class. The material is hard and he goes fast but he wants you to do well! He gives a 5% boost to your grade if your final test is higher than your 3 tests averaged together. He doesn't curve the tests but curves your grade at the end! Super nice guy and I would take him again.
                
                   He definitely has the best lectures for MATH I have met. 
                
                   If you struggled with math you will more than likely struggle with this course but Kilmer made it easier to understand. At times she can go fast during her lecture but overall was a great teacher. I know other friends that took the same course with different instructors and struggled until I helped them through her methods. TA's are super helpful.
                
                   I actually really enjoyed math with Professor Kilmer. She teaches with thorough examples and I was able to pick up on concept fairly easily. If you did struggle though (which I did on certain aspects), GO TO HER TUTORIAL ASSISTANT HOURS! She had two TA's and they were always so willing to help and had ideas on how to get me to grasp concepts!
                
                   Kilmer really knows what she's talking about, but expects you to understand it as in depth as she does. Her tests are very difficult and her homework is easy compared to the tests. She's not very engaging and an hour and fifteen minute lecture can get boring. You have to go to class, or you will get very behind
                
                   Awful.  I took 141 with her, and it was the worst class I've taken here.  Lectures are incredibly boring, go over time, and her microphone never works.  Tests are very difficult.  Expect HOURS of HW each week.  Not understanding at all - a family member passed away tragically, I missed 4 wks and had to take the exam 2 days later.  Passive agressive
                
                   Her class can be boring, but she works really fast. Her notes are very useful. Do her old week in review problems and take home assignments before test. 
                
                   Kilmer is an uptight lady and is pretty picky -- assigns seats, likes things done in a certain way. She will call you out if you are talking or on you phone. She has lots of help available which is nice but her tests are usually more difficult than the lectures. Do the extra practice problems and you should do well.
                
                   She is fair, but the tests are a lot harder than what she instructs. You do a lot of online homework and take home assignments. 
                
                   Was not a friendly person. When I asked questions or was in her office hours she often made me feel like I was stupid. She knows what she's talking about, but not very kind or helpful.
                
                   Everyone here says she talks really fast, for me at least, her lectures moved verry sloowly. But you MUST go to class to pass. Dont bother buying the textbook. If you want to do the "highly suggested homework" from the book, theres an online copy on Webassign. Not an easy class, but not impossible!
                
                   I took this professor because I read good reviews about her, but I found it extremely hard to enjoy this class. It was a very unwelcoming atmosphere, she never smiled and always seemed mad. Also, the tests are extremely difficult, especially compared to the homework. 
                
                   This is a tough, but not impossible, calculus class. Kilmer is a tough grader. The tests and Daily Grade assignments are much harder than our in class work and our homework (which there is a lot of). Also, she is extremely hard to listen to. The class is very monotonous and she keeps talking until several minutes after class is supposed to end.
                
                   Kendra is a nice lady but the class is VERY difficult. I don't recommend her for 141 unless you are a genius.
                
                   Not a terrible experience. Not an easy class, but also very manageable, just be prepared to put in the work and time practicing, and it's a lot of time practicing if you want to make an A. She is a very good and clear teacher, not confusing at all, but it does move very fast so you need to practice on your own to succeed.
                
                   So glad to have this class behind me!!!! Kilmer's lectures are clear but insanely monotonous and I struggled not to fall asleep every day. She'll start a new problem a minute before class ends which was so annoying. Tests are tough but doable, just GO TO CLASS and keep up with your homework... you'll do fine. I'd take her again if I had to
                
                   I took the Honors section of Math 141, and it was probably one of my worst academic decisions ever. Professor Kilmer was willing to help if you asked for it, but sometimes it was impossible to determine that you even needed any help - until you had already taken the test. She does in-class reviews, which are really helpful.
                
                   If you go to class, take notes, and do practice problems you should be fine. Notes are fairly straight forward. Always go to class after  the exam day. She tends to take pop attendance for daily grades or curve points. 
                
                   If you need to take 142 or 141 take Kilmer. Any one who gave a bad review didn't try in this class. No matter who you take for math it isn't going to be easy. She really genuinely  cares about your success in her class. Go to her office hours and her TAs hours. Do well on the homework and it will boost you a letter grade. TAKE KILMER. 
                
                   Kilmer is a great teacher. She does go rather fast in class but if you have a general knowledge of mathcalculus you can for sure keep up. Her tests are not easy, but they are fair. If you review your old turn in homeworks and group quizzes you should do fine on the tests. I would recommend her. I made an A, so can you!
                
                   Go to class. Pay attention. Do your homework and make sure you understand it so you can answer questions similar to it on the test. You pass. Probably with an A. And definitely at least a B. 
                
                   Don't take this class if you have other difficult ones the same semester. Idk if it was just a bad one, but this semester every lecture was rushed. Kilmer knows her stuff, and puts tricky questions to see if you do. Yep, she's THAT prof. Makes it way more complicated than it has to be. I'm pretty good in math, and I don't think I passed this class.
                
                   He does teach things pretty fast. I found reading the book at home over whatever he went over during lecture really helpful. Homework isn't mandatory, but it really helped me understand everything clearly. Doing the homework really helped with quizzes (sometimes they were the same questions). Looking at quizzes helped w/ tests.
                
                   He's not a very good prof... He is not very good at explaining things and moves really FAST! Do not take this class if you havent taken calculus before...
                
                   He doesn't teach anything,only proofs . If you didn't take calculus in high school or algebra in grade school, don't take this course.
                
                   Horrible prof. Lectures had little or nothing to do with the questions asked on the tests, quizzes were nearly impossible, he treated you like an idiot when you ask questions in class. Do not take this teacher's class.
                
                   Challenging class; strong programming & memorizations skills help
                
                   I couldn't ever seem to get help from the prof and was expected to learn a lot from the textbook. He didn't always give examples. The subject matter isn't very difficult though and what he actually taught in class was usually explained decently.
                
                   Great prof - sense of humor, careful about not running over time, tells interesting stories that make the math fun. Great at explaining.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   great prof, the best math teacher i've ever had. tests are reasonable and he explains things well. he has a russian accent, but he know english well, and i dont have a problem understanding him.
                
                   I was skeptical at first, but I really enjoyed taking his class. Get to know him and visit him during office hours with questions. I'm not a natural at math like others here,  so I must work 3 times as much as others probably. I did well, and Dr. Lee was VERY accommodating. Wish I could take him for 152.
                
                   Dr. Lee is a Great professor. You can even understand Him with his accent. Study the material and you will do good.
                
                   If you've taken calculus AB in high school and actually understood it, then you should be fine.  He is pretty funny, and he is pretty understandable even with his accent.  I love the way he pronounces zero (zshero).
                
                   I didn't take Calc in high school, so before taking Math 151, I was really intimidated. However, Sang Lee is a good professor. He is very helpful and funny. He provides lecture notes that are very useful. Just make sure you study and pay attention in class.
                
                   I never went to class all semester, and passed with an A. The labs are very easy and you get a very long time to do them, the homework is pretty short and easy. I also skipped the lab classes because you can do everything from the lab from your dorm. The professor is really funny, but if you took high school cal, you won't need to go to class much.
                
                   Dr. Lee really cares about students on an individual basis. His grading is not rough at all, he likes to give as much partial credit as possible. His office hours are flexible and will take time to speak to any of his students about all the assignments and tests. Homework is not very hard. Tests are basically straight from homework. Awesome Prof!
                
                   Professor Lee was awesome. He printed out notes for everyone to fill in. Also, the final was very reasonable as he understood the struggles of being a student. Great prof.
                
                   I took his class in the fall.  He is a great prof and will actually help you get the the grade you want.  He offers many extra credit opportunities.  He is teaching a math course take him.
                
                   I took his calculus 1 class and loved him! The material is just as hard as other calc classes but he was so helpful and if you spend time at his office hours an talk to him he will let you do extra credit and extend your webassign homework or give you extra tries when you need it. He also gives you a lot of info before the final so you are prepared
                
                   Solid professor.  Told you anything you needed to know in lecture, so attendance is a must.  Very sweet man as well -- helped me a lot during office hours.  While he occasionally made mistakes in class, it never bothered me.  He's human after all. My only complaint is that the final was brutal.  Then again, I could have studied more. Good luck!
                
                   Dr. Lynch was a good Prof to have. He tried to make class fun and would often interact with the students. He did make mistakes, but the best always do. I highly recommend paying attention during class though, often he will give away how to do the homework and more if you listen. Overall I ended up with a B with minimal effort and studying.
                
                   Dr. Lynch was very nice and understanding of everybody's specific needs. He kept the lectures humorous and was very clear on what we would need for tests. The final was a bit harder than all tests so beware of that, but the three tests throughout the semester are fairly easy and don't require to much effort to pass/make an A.
                
                   Lynch was a good professor, he does examples and goes through them fast so be prepared to study the material way more on your own time. If you go over the practice exams, you were surely get a high B on the tests. Very helpful in office hours.
                
                   Professor Lynch does a good job of trying to find different ways to explain something in order for everyone to understand the topic. He answers questions willingly and happily. He also replies to emails quickly. He does assign homework and you can take a practice portion which is the exact same thing. He also gives extra credit on exams.
                
                   Very hard to understand. Four exams throughout the semester, 3 were common and he wrote the final. Hardest math test I've ever taken. Emailed him after semester ended to see where I stood and what I got on my final and he never responded. 
                
                   He was a really nice guy but sometimes hard to understand.. He wasn't much into technology I guess because he wrote everything on the board. I got through common exams just fine but the final (which he wrote) was just not fun.
                
                   Awful.....couldnt understnad him and he hardly ever taught. I learned how to do things by looking at the homework problems and trying to find anyway I could come up with the successful answer. DO NOT TAKE THIS PROF!
                
                   not fun
                
                   Lectures only cover the basics of problems and the homework and quizzes are more complex.
                
                   Very Hard Material (I Expect a C). great prof she will do her very best to help you if you can understand it she will be the one to get it across take maggie!
                
                   The guy is a nice guy, but NOBODY understands a word he says! It is ridiculous. He has the most difficult ways of teaching. I know he is a smart guy, but he needs to learn English first...His Homework assignments are short so not too bad. (Examples: Can YOU guess what words these are&#63;--pereasian, peerial, zayta, metroreal, mayorment, assamtopee...)
                
                   By far one of my favorite professors ever. This little old lady helped me so much all semester. The class was a nice, easy 1 hour class to just learn about math and I loved every second of it. 10/10 would take again.
                
                   Great prof! Russian and sometime hard to understand but very sweet.  She's extremely helpful and tries to start every class with teaching origami. Quizzes every thursday.
                
                   She does move very quickly, but is always willing to stop and take time to clarify and answer questions.
                
                   Good teacher, a little fast sometimes, but explains things very well
                
                   He wrote too many theorems and words in general that I felt wasted time in class but he was knowledgeable. Will explain any questions, but sometimes he has trouble understanding why you aren't getting a concept and can't explain in another way. Quirky sense of humor, nice guy, helpful in office hours, tests were just like reviews so do them!
                
                   He does a good job of teaching the subject. It was his first semester teaching and English is his second language, so at times he had to think of the right way to say something so as to not confuse us. He has a slight accent, but it isn't hard to understand him at all. His tests are essentially straight off the reviews he gives, so do those.
                
                   This is the easiest math class I have taken so far. He does at great job at testing over the important concepts. He gives a great review before the test. Highly recommend going to the class before the test. He also posts a review online the week before a test. Work ALL the problems!
                
                   Pavlos is a cool guy- has a slight accent but didn't bother me. Tests are easier than the homework and incredibly similar to the review. Class usually goes long but Pavlos is pretty helpful in office hours and explains concepts well. Writes a lot of rules/theorems in lectures, I only bothered to write down the examples and did fine (I expect an A)
                
                   Great professor! I hadn't taken a math class for a semester but he explains everything really well so that it was easy to catch up and get back in the swing of things. I definitely recommend him for 251! Only 1 homework assignment weekly and 3 exams, 1 final. He gave reviews for all of them and they were almost identical to the tests
                
                   he is sooooo funny. He is really bad with the smart board so he is always making jokes about it. his class is easy and he explains things really good, i dont do so great because i fall asleep in class but if you are awake and do your homework ,  you will do really good!!!! quiz every week + hw + tests so many chances to improve grade!!!
                
                   He is a FANTASTIC teacher, explain everything extremely well. He seems to explain things almost TOO thoroughly, i get a little bored in lectures, but i can't fault him for that. HW is bookwork, and doesn't take long to do. Tests are very fair and look much like his test reviews :)
                
                   Not as good as austin
                
                   only teacher that makes you do bookwork as well as webassign
                
                   Boring and takes attendance. Way too slow.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Goes too slow or too fast.
                
                   Puts me to sleep...
                
                   I was lucky that I took Calculus in High School because if I didn't have some kind of former exposure to the subject, I would've been completely helpless in his class. His lectures were all over the place and fast. His tests didn't reflect review material/homework. He expects you to know the "WHY" behind the math.
                
                   The lectures, homework, and tests all are different. There is a lot of info to take in but if you do all the homework and study hard for the tests then it is not impossible.
                
                   He is not the right professor for you if you have never taken calculus or if you need things to be explained clearly. His lectures can get confusing very fast. He does not explain the material well. You will have 3 homework assignments every week. Homework's are nothing like the test. You can have a high A on homework and have a D or C on exams. 
                
                   He seemed to have no invested interest in his job or any of his students, and he if the entire class were to fail he wouldn't even flinch.
                
                   Orchard is young, inexperienced and overwhelmingly difficult. He does terrible job of explaining what is actually going on in the course and when questioned, he cannot answer effectively. His tests are largely stolen and concept based unlike what he does in the class. Honestly someone might be better off sitting in on Allen for lectures.
                
                   Never explains anything clearly, tests are super difficult. He does not curve 
                
                   Passing all of the homework? You still won't pass the tests.  The homework and lectures are a complete 180 from the material on the actual tests. PLUS, the tests are only 20 questions. Be prepared to only know half or less. 
                
                   Made the class way harder than it should have been. Often messed up on problems and said he would "get back to us later" with what the answer was. Very awkward. Seemed to know what to do but unable to communicate it to students. I learned most  of the material in high school, but otherwise would have had to teach myself.
                
                   He's too immature and ill equip to be teaching this course. He's very young, and thus not wise enough to be teaching college students. Though he does have his moments of hilarity. 
                
                   Orchard is a very young and new professor. Because of the lack of experience, he can be very confusing even to people who are usually really good at math. Webassigns help boost your grade. He isn't a bad guy, but he is very awkward.  Ask him about dog sweaters, you'll laugh I promise.
                
                   Hes extremely inexperienced and awkward. Test are not like the review and are way more in depth. If  you haven't taken calculus before THEN DONT TAKE HIM because you will be totally lost. The only reason I passed was I took calc in High School. He never curves. He's a nice guy and going to his WIR really help. 
                
                   I'm sure he knows the material, he just has a problem collecting his thoughts when answering questions. He's much better one on one! He just started teaching, so he'll get better in a few semesters. Tests are pretty difficult, but aren't all math tests? Its easier to go to class than teach yourself. Study and go to office hours and you'll do fine. 
                
                   Run. He is literally the worst teacher. I like to think I'm good a math and I made a 45 on the first exam. So I studied really hard for the second exam and made a 40. His lectures are pointless and there is one example for each question that is 10 times more in depth on the exam. I would never recommend him. 
                
                   Orchard is a real awkward sweetheart who knows his stuff, but no one in his class knows what is going on. He moves on to topics very quickly without really going over what he just previously introduced. He gives like one example for each thing. Also, reviews are NOTHING like the exams. There's also a lot of homework every week. It was a tough class
                
                   This class is extremely difficult if you aren't good at teaching yourself. Orchard knows the material well, but has trouble explaining concepts to students. Lectures are very vague, and test reviews often give little insight to what will actually be on the test. Don't recommend unless you are especially  gifted in the math department. 
                
                   Orchard is really young and unexperienced. Lectures are boring, and very vague. He's not good at explaining the material. Tests are nothing like the homework. He also doesn't give curves and rarely gives extra credit. If you aren't good at teaching yourself then I recommend a different prof.
                
                   If you did well in high school calculus this class is a breeze not because he is a good teacher but because the concepts are very basic.  He is very young and seems to know his facts he just hasn't figured out how to teach yet. He's very funny in a nerdy way.
                
                   Time for an honest review. I am awful at math, and Orchard is not a very experienced teacher, but he is willing to help. OFFICE HOURS HELP ALOT & basically PRACTICE is everything in his class. The concepts are not terrible, HW is long for non majors. He's dorky but chill. Put forth the effort and you'll pass.
                
                   Don't take his class. He is too inexperienced and he makes things more confusing than they actually are. I would recommend you pick another professor.
                
                   He is so monotone that class is not interesting. He is unclear and unhelpful. I am good in math, have always gotten As and I am usually good at grasping concept.s According to the way he teaches, his homework and test are nothing alike, so expect your grade to be low. 
                
                   Dr. Pearlstein is a good professor. His tests were fair, and not unexpected. If you're good at math, you'll have little trouble. If you're not, you will likely struggle with his concepts in class, but reading the book and doing practice work outside of the assigned homework will make this class a breeze. Expect TONS of homework.
                
                   Don't take him. He's very unhelpful if you go to office hours, and if you ask a question during class, he goes on a super long tangent unrelated to the question. I honestly didn't learn anything during class, and learned everything from the textbook. He doesn't respond to emails. The final was multiple choice, which made me pretty mad. 
                
                   Dr. Pearlstein was a good professor. His lectures were kind of boring and his grading scale was a bit tough. Most of the weight was on the exams and not on homework, even though he assigns weekly homework. If you do the homework and study well for the exams you should be able to pull a B in this class fairly easily. 
                
                   Very hard to understand. Reads examples straight out of the book, does not explain anything. Better off learning material yourself.
                
                   Julia is very hard to understand. If you don't have a good grasp on Calculus I would not recommend. I ended up skipping class most of the time and just going to a tutoring service because lectures weren't helpful.
                
                   Tests are hard
                
                   Absolutely loved Dr. Poage! If I were to decide to get my masters I would dedicate it to her! She's the kind of professor who shows you how much she loves her job and cares about her students. If you go to class, do the course notes packet and study well for the exams you will easily succeed.
                
                   Such a great teacher, really knows her stuff! The class is not easy but she is there to help you!!! Put in the work from day one and go to her when you need help and you will be fine.
                
                   Dr. Poage is awesome!  My favorite college professor after 6 semesters.  She cares, she's smart, she can explain things in different ways.  She genuinely seems to like her job and her students.  I wish I had taken Math 166 with her as well.  Highly recommended.
                
                   Great Professor. Class is kinda tough but she is always there if you need help.
                
                   Professor Poage is awesome. She tells you everything you need to do throughout the semester to make an A. Online Homework and the Optional Homework are necessary to have success on the tests. There are opportunities to boost your grade like take home quizzes. Overall a great professor, strongly recommend. 
                
                   Wish she taught all my classes!  Kind, Cares, Smart, Knows how to teach, funny.  Gets papers back super fast. LOVE HER!
                
                   She'll help you on the take home quizzes if you go to her office hours. If you have to work and have other classes and can't make it to the office hours, then too bad. Which is a little unfair.. Do the suggested homework! She tells you not to come if your sick, but won't excuse you. She's a great professor though and makes math clear.
                
                   BEST MATH TEACHER EVER. I hate math, but she made it easy to understand and her personality made the class entertaining. Tests were on the easy side since the review is like the test, but the multiple choice are weighted heavily so watch out for careless mistakes! Other than that I highly recommend taking her class! SHES AWESOME!
                
                   SHE ROCKS. Seriously take Poage, she'll save your academic career.  I'm registered to take 1325 with her next semester at 7 in the morning and I'm only doing it because she is honestly the best math teacher I've ever had.  She really cares, she's funny and she helps as much as possible.. Seriously take her.
                
                   GREAT professor! Gives reviews that match the tests exactly, super easy online homework, and explains everything super clear. If you do not understand it one way, she is more than welcome to teach it to you a different way. You can tell she loves math and that helps when you are not particularly fond of it. AND she drops the lowest quiz grade :) 
                
                   Best teacher I have ever had!!! She is so helpful and gives you every chance to pass her class!!! Tells you what kind of material exactly will be on the test! Reviews included! Great teacher definitely  recommend her!
                
                   LOVE LOVE LOVE her!!
                
                   Best teacher ever! I highly recommend her. She helps anyone in need and is very good at explaining how to solve problems.
                
                   My favorite prof in the past 3 years of college!!  She makes math seem fun and interesting.
                
                   She is the best professor ever! I actually looked forward to getting up and going to her math class! If you are willing to try in her class she will make sure you learn!
                
                   Best prof ever!
                
                   amazing!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Clear class notes. Helpful help sessions. Neat exams tips. Overall, she is a very nice and easy-going prof. And of course, the class is &quot;fun&quot;. Take her class, and do the review questions, even if you skip some of the suggested homework will still be fine. Oh! And ASK questions if you have one. She is very nice and GO TO THE HELP SESSION!!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Alright guy - has a monotone and we all know how that is. He's kind of funny but not very quick to respond to emails. Dropped quizzes, applied a curve, gives a single bonus point on each test. He's not very specific or concise when lecturing, and he gives pop quizzes if enough people aren't coming to class. Easy subject, though. I don't recommend.
                
                   Philbin is a super nice guy. Doesn't want anyone to fail his class so he'll curve tests significantly. The tests are variations of the homework questions. He allowed an 8.5x11" front and back cheat sheet for tests. Honestly, even if you suck at math andor stats, you'd almost have to try to fail his class. 
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   cool
                
                   
                
                   Always willing to lend a hand (or ear) he'll make you work hard, but you WILL learn what you need if you put in the effort and he's EXTREMELY fair with grades.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Need to know Maple to do well in the class, but he walks you through to learn it before tests
                
                   Heather Ramsey was an amazing prof. She knows a lot of her student's names and is super personal and helpful. Her tests are all multiple choice and pretty difficult but if you do the week in reviews and pay attention in class you are fine. She is so willing to help and really cares about how her students do but she will not give extra credit. 
                
                   Ramsey is not a bad math teacher. She explains everything thoroughly and clearly, although sometimes I find myself dosing off, but that's because I have her at 8AM. Overall I would not mind taking another math class with her. It's all about attending class.
                
                   Overall her method of teaching Math141 is pointless. She lectures math at a room of possibly 300 people, gives homework, and then you are tested. No curve, no extra credit. She does hold office hours, but if they don't fit your schedule you are suggested week in review. I feel it wasn't helpful. If you struggle in math. This is NOT your class.
                
                   Dr. Ramsey is a great professor. Her tests are extremely difficult and do not necessarily depict your knowledge of the material. Multiple choice is worth so much that it kills your grade. She grades fair on everything else and you will learn the material if you take Ramsey. Practice practice practice and you will make an A.
                
                   Dr. Ramsey is one of the best profs. I've had. She is so nice! If you have any questions, even stupid ones, she answers them no problem. I talked to her once in 147 for a few seconds, and towards the end of the next semester in 148 I was walking to the front of the class to talk to her and she remembered my name out of 3 sections of 150 students.
                
                   I took this class in the summer so everything was a lot faster. Professor Ramsey is a wonderful professor. I would recommend anyone taking any math class to try & get her
                
                   Had her for Math 147 and 148. I LOVE her. Best professor I've had so far. Loves teaching, and has a clear passion for math. She explains things clearly, and takes time to get to know her students personally. Creates her own notes and we simply fill in blanks/do exs w/ her in class. Go to class to get the notes, do the hw/reviews and you're golden!
                
                   Ms.Ramsey is an amazing teacher! She is passionate about math and she has an answer for every question you throw at her! If you don't understand something she will continue to help you until you are a master! The book was rarely used in the course but it is an okay resource for study problems. Must go to lecture and must do the practice exams!
                
                   no comment
                
                   Great prof! Just attend class and take down her notes and you'll do fine on the exams. Quite helpful both in and out of class. Plus shes kinda hot
                
                   Professor Ramsey is a really nice prof and is very helpful if you are having trouble in the class. She has week-in-reviews pretty much every Monday night and has 2 student helpers that help 2 or 3 nights out of the week every week. Tests are ok...the multiple choice part is hard because you can't get any partial credit...overall she is a great prof
                
                   i would definitely recommend her.
                
                   Mrs. Ramsey is an excellent teacher, and a helpful one at that.  Keep up with the class notes and do the suggested homework and you'll ace this class.
                
                   His test are tough, especially the multiple choice, and he over uses the log and ln rules. He gives very few examples in class, it is all almost strictly conceptual. I would strongly recommend not taking his class, but if you do Amy Austin's 152 notes are online and extremely helpful.
                
                   Dr. Reihani is very caring & is always willing to help you conceptually understand a topic. However, he often fills his lectures with conceptual mut rather than working examples. His exams are very difficult and are misbalanced  (MC vs FR) & mistimed. 6 take-home quizzes through the semester that took multiple hours each. AVOID REIHANI if you can!
                
                   Awful professor. My math education is heavily dependent on how well the teacher teaches. He has very minimal coherency in his lectures. Tests are also hard. Very bad lecturer. Not a mean person or anything, he just doesn't know how to do the most important part of his job, which is teach.
                
                   Dr Reihani is more than happy to help students but the tests are a big step up from the homework and quizzes. You have to be well prepared and have lots of time to give to the course to do well.
                
                   I love math and hated this class. He was helpful during office hours and class, but he was adamant about  his tests, no mercy, scantron, and no partial credit. I was very frustrated with his tests questions and often confused.  He also had in class clicker questions so GO TO CLASS!! Ended with a 69.7 with a lot of effort.
                
                   His lectures were very straight forward and easy to follow along with. However his tests were VERY tricky. And he was never open to a debate on any test question even when every single student missed the same question. He was very helpful during office hours but a completely different person when speaking to him about the test. Not very nice
                
                   He's an absolute pain. Don't take him if you avoid him. His tests follow his the problems in his notes, but he can't teach his notes very well. He's also rude in office hours and makes fun of you if you asks questions. Got an A due to looking at other profs notes.  Do not take him 
                
                   Do yourself a favor, don't take this class. Hardest class i've ever taken, and it could have been so much easier had the material been more clear. Passed by the grace of god and thanks to outside tutoring. Wouldn't put this course on my worst enemy.
                
                   Awful Professor. I would not recommend him to my worse enemy. All semester he didnt teach well at all. I learned everything from tutoring and the TA. He spent most of his time teaching theory which wasnt part of the course at all. 210 would not recommend.   One time he spend an hour on 2 examples in class. worst teacher I ever had 
                
                   Tough prof. I went to his office hours to ask for help and he literally said "maybe try to be more responsive to the material." Not super helpful. 
                
                   He isn't particularly the worst professor I've ever had but he can be very confusing at times. The tests are tough since one little small mistake can mess you up due to the multiple choice format. Overall he can be vague at times, but he's just an average professor. 
                
                   Reihani was very competent in the subject. But he didn't always explain it in a way that people who were struggling could understand. has a slight accent but not bad. he is lowkey kind of condescending if you ask a dumb question. test were tricky but i got a 100 on the third one. if you do the HW and actually pay attention in class you'll be alrigh
                
                   Dr. Reihani was a great prof and a great guy, he just moved very slowly and confused us on everything. Class seams easy until you get to the test... then you fail, hard. Half of our class dropped. It was a long semester. Just don't do this to yourself.
                
                   His tests were tricky, including some small details in some questions that are easy to miss. Pair that along with some of the questions that you naturally miss and that is already about an 80 since the tests are 20 multiple choice problems. But, his lectures are very clear and he demonstrated exactly what to do in different kinds of problems.
                
                   He wasn't very helpful when people had questions. He always seemed like he didn't know what they were asking. He doesn't have a very heavy accent so he's not hard to understand. He tries to trick you on exams and quizzes. He spends the longest time on easy concepts and runs out of time for the harder parts.  I never used the textbook.
                
                   I tried ny hardest but I could have tried a little harder. The professor claims that he tries to help but he didn't behave like that.
                
                   The material is very clear and he teaches it well in class lectures, but the exams are very difficult. His questions aim to trick you, not test your mastery of the material.
                
                   Don't take him! He gives multiple choice exams, but the way they are worded makes them hard. He also includes information that he hasn't gone over in class. 40% of his two classes dropped. He's kind of hard to understand. He gives random iClicker quizzes, so you have to go to class. He will bump you up though if you work hard and show up to class.
                
                   Kamran Reihani was literally the worst professor I have ever had. He was not clear, nor did he teach. He was absolutely unwilling to help you and he was very rude both  in class and office hours. ABSOLUTELY DO NOT TAKE HIM, even if he is the only professor time available. You will 100% regret it if you do.
                
                   Ended up Q-dropping this class, exams were nothing like the lecture notes or homework assignments. Half of the class was failing miserably. He is hard to understand and sarcastic when answering questions. 50 minutes for a 40 question math quiz? no thank you... stay away, don't make my mistake. 
                
                   Very uninspired lectures: extremely monotonous and it feels like he explains concepts for 90% of the class, then does a single, very rudimentary example that doesn't really help you understand. He doesn't post grades online, and you will not know what you made on your final. Very difficult grader, gives little to none partial credit.
                
                   Dr. Roque Sol is a funny, easy going guy who knows his stuff when it comes to teaching calculus. However, he fails to clearly convey just the "need to know" stuff for exams, you're better off learning on YouTube & using the online HW. Pop quizzes in lecture so you have to attend. DIFFICULT final w curve at the end. Find another prof if you can
                
                   Not helpful at all but he is funny.
                
                   Roque Sol is a nice guy and has good jokes, but he teaches word for word from the textbook, which really isn't helpful at all. I had to go to another professor's office hours because he was never there for his. If you've  taken calculus before, you're  fine in his class, but if you haven't, I'd  suggest switching to another professor.  
                
                   Roque Sol is a nice guy and has good jokes, but he basically teaches word for word from the textbook, which really isn't helpful at all. I had to go to another professor's office hours because he was never there for his. If you've  taken calculus before, you're  fine in his class, but if you haven't, I'd  suggest switching to another professor. 
                
                   Really nice guy! His accent is a bit of a hurdle, but after a while I found it endearing. He gives good examples and teaches very clearly. If you work hard and utilize the practice tests you should do fine!
                
                   Roque Sol is a funny guy, kind of hard to understand. For 152 he had in-lecture quizzes so you could't really skip class. Personally I never listened in his lectures because they were confusing. I studied online notes and made an A on every test and the final. He is also cool to talk to in office hours if you have questions regarding grades.
                
                   This prof was the most helpful, caring professor I've ever had thus far. He's always willing to spend extra time to help you out, does a good amount of practice problems, and actually cares if you learn his material or not. He's also extremely funny if you can catch his undertone comments.
                
                   Hard to understand, not very exciting or interesting when teaching to keep your attention, and difficult tests. Enjoy.
                
                   Terrible. He does not teach the material by working out examples. Instead, he reads off of Power Point slides. No fill-in notes like most other math profs have. He has a heavy accent and is very difficult to understand. I don't recommend him at all.
                
                   Roque sol is all theory and little practical knowledge. This is less than helpful when it comes to doing actual problems. You'll learn everything you need to know doing the online homework and attending SI sessions that another teacher gives. Thankfully, he gives multiple choice tests.
                
                   For the sake of your grade do not take him!!!! Trust me.. I worked hard for a C in this class. He is very hard to understand due to his accent and only reads from his slides. He will only do the examples on his slides as well.
                
                   Terrible professor. Doesn't reply to emails, difficult to understand accent, and doesn't hand back quizzes or upload grades online so you have no clue what you're actually making in the class until you receive your final course grade. Tests are tough and require a ton of studying to do well. Got a B in this class but I do NOT recommend taking him.
                
                   He is very hard to understand at times. He moves through the material quickly, but most of your learning is done online by yourself. I went to a lot of extra tutoring and still did poorly on his tests. He is a nice guy, but doesn't teach math very cleary. I wouldn't recommend him if math isn't your subject.
                
                   Terrible Prof. I tried very hard in this class and couldn't pass an exam. Teacher is difficult to understand and reads off a power point.
                
                   He's nice and funny, difficult to understand at first but you catch on quick. Tests are pretty difficult, you have to study alot. I highly recommend going to his Week-In Reviews- very helpful and you get more face to face question time. On the whole not bad for a math class. We didnt have any in class worksheets in my Math 141 class with him.
                
                   This was an easy class and he was a nice guy! He was really helpful and I kind of enjoyed the fact that he didn't really lecture! The only problem that I found was that it was rather difficult to understand what he was try to say at times.
                
                   Really nice guy, but I have no idea how he teaches because it is basically an online class. He just hands out worksheets in class and does not teach.
                
                   So hard. This class is backwards because you do homework in class in groups and learn the subject at home. He is very nice, but the class is hard and he can be hard to understand.
                
                   The class is based on online homework and in class worksheets. If you don't understand something, talk to him about it during class or his office hours. He is easier to comprehend one on one. You can tell he cares so ASK QUESTIONS. The tests don't count for much, but a lot of the questions are from the online homework.
                
                   Kind and approachable professor who always has interesting research to share with his class.  He spoke quickly and said a lot of things, but he would write down on the board everything that was important.  Good at explaining concepts and quick to help in class, office hours, or via email.  He's fantastic, especially once you get used to his style .
                
                   He is not very clear when it comes to lectures, very fast pace I'm good in math but he made me hate math not recommending him!
                
                   He is nerdy and knows what he is talking about. Grade is based off of 2 tests, homework, writing assignment, journal (he gives topics to write on), and a final. I think he is a good prof and would recommend him.
                
                   Professor Scarborough is a very nice lady who obviously cares about her students. She is always in a good mood and keeps the class entertaining with interactive questions in class. Tests are hard but if you go over her old tests that she posts on her website you will be fine
                
                   This professor seems to teach well and writes very thoroughly on the board, he claims to not know how to use calculators. 
                
                   Professor Saroglou is a very nice man, and he definitely tries to be a good teacher, but I found his teaching style not helpful at all. Honestly, by the end of my semester, there were maybe 10 students still sitting in his lecture- many went down the hall to another more helpful professor, and still many others dropped. Take that as you will..
                
                   Great teacher, tries to make you understand the concept (and sometimes he even succeeds). If you get lost don't wait until it is tho late, and visit his office.
                
                   The class is extremely challenging. The professor is a genius and doesnt always realize his students arent as smart as him. Tests are difficult but do-able.
                
                   Great teacher. Study the reviews he gives and you'll do great. Final was exactly like past common exams he gives you to review. Usually 10pt curves. Gives quizzes every Friday over homework from the week before. I would definitely take his class again. He makes everything very clear and is always willing to review in class. Go to office hours, too!
                
                   Honestly, if you live and breathe Calculus, you will do great. He is pretty confusing only because he'll write down the wrong thing on the board and confuse himself. Also, he may mistype questions or answers on the test  - though he will give extra bonus points for finding it. Knows his stuff super well though and is beyond intelligent. Good luck!
                
                   Concerned that student understand, funny, entertaining 
                
                   Very concerned whether students understand, very approachable, funny, makes classes interesting, even if it is Calculus   
                
                   Very friendly, always helpful,   concerned if students understood. Sometimes a bit too much on the theoretical side, but what else can you expect from a Math prof.
                
                   Very friendly, encourages to ask questions ("you can ask whatever you want, you paid  for it"). Good preparation sheets for exams, but asks you to state definitions and theorems on tests.
                
                   One of the best professors i had at Texas A&M. Very entertaining class. Picked on me lot often. We had back and forth humorous interaction. If you want an 'A' start on the review as soon as possible.He has two test, one final and 10 quiz. Test are out of 110. so you only need a 80% to get an A.
                
                   I really love his teaching style. He is really likes teaching and funny. If you want to receive an A just visit him in his office hours.
                
                   Overall a great professor! His class is a little difficult, but I did very well with studying. He is very humorous, so I am always entertained. He has an awesome German accent, but he is definitely not difficult to understand at all. I wish I could take him again.
                
                   Overall great professor.  Sometimes difficult to follow as he goes through proofs, but always willing to take questions.  Office hours visits are helpful, A+ was helpful, when it comes to tests study exclusively the material on his prep sheets. I scored a low C on my first test and still able to rebound and score an A in the class. Very fair prof.
                
                   Demanding but helpfull
                
                   Attendance not mandatory,  but he gives pop quizzes almost weekly, asking material covered the last hour. But quizzes are  very highly  curved. Does every thing to make you learn the material beyond simply knowing how to do the problems. Overall very good class.
                
                   Instead of teaching you how to do the problems, he wants you to memorize the theory. For each test we needed to learn a page or two of definitions and theorems.
                
                   great class!
                
                   Does not know how to communicate with students on their level. Does not understand why students don't get what is going on.
                
                   He even makes Calculus entertaining
                
                   Great Guy
                
                   
                
                   Not a good professor. She seems nice,  but she's actually pretty rude if you don't know even the simplest of calculus. That being said, office hours aren't helpful. She uses the same examples from lecture in office hours, and doesn't help much, obviously. If you're taking calculus for the first time, I would definitely NOT recommend her. F.
                
                   She posted all the notes online and worked out lots of problems in class. She definitely taught what would be on the test and prepared you well. She doesn't curve but her final was really straight forward and if you do the work you will be well prepared
                
                   Fair lecturer and teaches topics from a different angle. May help or hurt you depending on the teaching styles you have had in the past.
                
                   -ALWAYS went over lecture time so slightly annoying -flexible, pushes back homework dates if needed -slight accent, easily understandable -if youve taken calc in high school you should be fine even tho the course moves fast -answers questions in lectures -overall, very thorough and a good teacher -easy (ish) final
                
                   Dr. Sengupta is an AMAZING professor. She is very clear and thorough, and always answers questions in class. However, you need to put in a lot of work to make an A. If you go to class and take notes everyday, make sure to do all the homework, and study a little before the tests, you will be well prepared to make an A. She sets you up to do well.
                
                   Her lectures were a little long, and she always went over the time. She wasn't as bad as some other professors were. She kinda didn't always show us the easiest ways to do the harder concepts.
                
                   If you ask a question, she answers thoroughly & ensures you understand- never blows it off. Theres corresponding practice problems and tutorial videos to help w/ HW. Required max 1.5 hrs work/wk. Goes quickly in class but you can ask for help after class/office hours to clarify, and she posts notes online. Pretty easy A, esp. if you've taken CalAB
                
                   Dr. Sengupta is a fantastic professor. I would ask her questions almost everyday after class and she would always try to help and answer the questions. I can actually look back through the year and say that I have learned a lot. Definitely recommend to everybody and want to take her again for Math 152.  ( She is super nice as well!) 
                
                   Lectures covered all the material that was on the test. There is homework every week for a grade but it helps to do as study material for the common exams. Sometimes went slow and got behind the course schedule but ended up barely covering everything by the end of the semester. Great job of teaching and had great test scores across her whole class.
                
                   I absolutely LOVED Dr. Sengupta. She was by far my favorite prof. of my freshmen year. She explains things extremely well. She is really good about asking questions which she answers thoroughly until the concept is understood. Class is fun and also, if you talk to her outside of class, she is super awesome and funny.  Would take her again X 100000
                
                   Dr. Sengupta is overall a good professor. I would recommend her to anyone. She's even just as good as JD Kim or Amy Austin. She's very helpful with students and cares whether you pass or not.  
                
                   Am taking sinijini again because I liked her way of teaching. Go to recitation for the quiz. The tests are easy to get an A on, just do past exams to study and make sure you review your answer on the test at least twice. The class isn't curved, test averages are usually a 77.  She moves homework if she feels she doesn't cover the material well.
                
                   I love Sengupta. She's pretty chill and tends to crack jokes to lighten the mood. 
                
                   She really isn't a good teacher to take if you don't already know most of calculus.  She moves extremely fast and although she'll ask for questions, she makes you not want to ask any since she looks at you as if asking, " How did you possibly get into this class?"
                
                   She speeds through calculus on some days. Some days shes slow and nice and some days she just go super fast, but she makes sure you know the essential stuff. She writes the essentials for you so copy them down if you can keep up. Otherwise shes kinda cute imo. Anyways, if you know cal, then youll be fine, youll like her. if you don't know cal sorry
                
                   Dr. Sengupta is a very intelligent and helpful professor. If you didn't take calculus in high school, expect to have some trouble keeping up. She will be there to help but you will get nowhere without practice on your own time. She also brings lots of personality and enthusiasm to the class. 
                
                   Dr. Sengupta rocks. She knows what she's doing, she listens to her students (but is still firm enough to hold her own), and does a fantastic job being thorough and ensuring no student was left behind. If you want to do well in her class, she allows you every opportunity to do so -- but keep in mind that your grade is EARNED.
                
                   She's a slow grader, but willing to go over the tests, homework, and anything in general if you come in for office hours. She'll sometimes give extra credit if you show up for lecture, and she gives a lot of examples which is extremely helpful for the webassign.
                
                   Very clear on course material and nice and helpful. Tests are difficult but passable. She helps and is nice yet drags on lecture.
                
                   She goes very fast during lecture, if you zone out then you'll be lost. She is helpful in office hours and answers most questions asked in class. Occasionally she doesn't cover all concepts for the homework in lecture which makes it difficult. Also she doesn't curve, so if you don't do well on the common exams you will suffer in the class.
                
                   Amazing professor, but only take him if you are serious about learning the subject thoroughly. Always does his best to explain the topic at a level everyone  can understand. 
                
                   he is a really good teacher. 
                
                   HW is easy if you have chegg, without help on hw it is pretty hard. tests aren't bad if you're prepared. gives practice exams to help you study. besides turning in hw, going to class is not necessary if you don't want to go.
                
                   Brilliant, funny professor. His highest priority is to make sure the students are learning, and more importantly, gaining a deep understanding of the concepts. Very difficult, but if you are serious about learning mathematics, totally worth taking his class
                
                   This is my favorite course I have taken. He will go the extra mile to accommodate students to ensure they understand material. His class is challenging but prepares you VERY well for upper-level courses. Reviewing notes is essential and he has an amazing sense of humor, hosts a true passion for math and will make an impact on your education.
                
                   Sivakumar is one of the best math professors you could have. He knows what he's talking about and he's great at explaining all the concepts. His class is one of the hardest classes you will take, but it will prepare you for higher level courses in the future. Ask questions! He wants his students to learn, but you have to go to him for help.
                
                   Great professor, but your grade is reflective of the amount of work you put in. Super helpful; he'll teach you as long as you are willing to learn. His first priority is helping you understand the subject and the concepts, not giving you the grade you want on a silver platter. I'd reccomend him to anyone who would actually like to learn mathematics
                
                   Siva is one of the best insturctors I have ever had. He really does care for your learning of the subject, specially if you are going to be going further in your Math Major. Go to his office hours! I wish I would have gone earlier in the semester because he is extremely helpful. The class itself is difficult but he is a great lecturer.
                
                   Siva is a wonderful teacher! He truly cares about the education of his students, and will go to most any length to help you. BUT you MUST be self-motivated and seek him out. He's not going to spoon-feed you ANYTHING. Knowing how much he cares about you makes it harder to discuss your failures with him.
                
                   Dr Sivakumar is myfavorite professor ever! He actually cares you understand and learn the material and incredibly passionate about what he teaches. Tests are hard, but doable if you attend class and see him in oh. I have learned so much in his class and after taking it, I have gone from hating math to switching my major to it. Glad I have him again
                
                   Dr. Sivakumar is, undoubtedly, among the greatest instructors I have ever had. His immeasurable expertise in mathematics is only matched by his wit and willingness to aid in understanding. A true renaissance man, I felt as if he taught in order to inspire future students. His lectures made the complexities of calculus understandable and clear.
                
                   Dr. Siva makes learning the material extremely interesting, presenting content in such a well organized manner that one can't help but to enjoy his class. Challenging homework and intensive tests help to train you to be a better mathematician and problem solver. He is one of the kindest people you'll meet certainly, the most intellectual. Take him.
                
                   Best Professor I've ever had. He believes in instilling in his students the same appreciation of the subject matter that he has. Everything is lecture.  You will be expected to have a sophisticated enough appreciation of the material to apply it to new situations. He will expect more from you than you think you have to give; he'll make  you better.
                
                   Siva is a good professor, but expect to work your hardest and still get a C. Office hours are essential to passing and he is more than willing to help you with something if you ask. His tests are hard, but about a third is memorization. He gives one homework a week that you'll need  help on. To succeed you'll have to be an independent learner. 
                
                   Sivakumar is easily the best professor of mathematics I've had in college. Everything in his class is rigorous... You will struggle and put many hours in for mere 50s or 60s on exams. He is blunt, honest, and hilarious. Siva cares about his students, and I only regret not having his class for Cal I and Cal II. Be prepared to work hard.
                
                   Siva is by far the best math teacher I have had in a while. He is always willing to meet after class to explain anything you are struggling with. He has very high expectations and his tests are tough but fair. He follows his notes when making the tests. Overall I'd recommend him! 
                
                   Siva is a hilarious, witty, smart man. And a horrible instructor. He expected the world out of us without him actually giving us any sort of preparation for his tests. Literally all of his emails this semester were either not-so-funny youtube videos, or him angrily yelling at the class for our poor performance. The test averages were always 55.
                
                   Dr. Sivakumar is by far my favorite professor I have taken. Siva knew my name before the first time I ever spoke to him and ever since he was a great professor. His tests are tough but have a built in curve and hw is manageable. He is a professor that really cares even though his course is difficult. Siva is very smart and always willing to help.
                
                   The homework is alright as long as you go to the TA, but when it comes to the tests theres no help unless you've done the practice problems in the book too inside and out. He is a super nice guy, intelligent and funny, but doesn't know when to slow down and teach the info step by step. You MUST know how to teach yourself or you won't pass.
                
                   I took his for Math 221 and all comes down to his tests and they are hard. He teaches with an old school method so a lot of his terms are old that have been changed and he focuses on proofs. You will have to study hard and make sure you completely understand when the tests come. He doesn't give a review for them either. 
                
                   Dr. Siva is an amazing, personable professor. He is perhaps the best calculus teacher in existence. He is both formal and thorough. His tests closely follow his homework and lectures. If you ever need help, you can always go to his office hours and he will get you to the answer. You will learn something in his class, as he always says. 
                
                   Intellectual, light, and dignified. Take his classes if you can, you will learn a lot from this guy. My advice: pay attention in class, read, and go to office hours. Also, if you're a hippie, you'll enjoy his class.
                
                   His class is difficult, but cal 2 is no matter what. If you work at it by going to class and seeking help on homework, you'll be fine it. You will learn a lot and he is quite an entertaining prof. He truly cares about teaching students and was one of the first profs at A&M to take the time to learn my name.
                
                   He never really seems to explain anything concrete. He focuses on abstract proofs and hardly shows any examples of how to apply the course material, yet that's all that the tests are. Also, if you don't know Matlab, start learning, as he doesn't teach students how to use it and just expects that students already are proficient in it.
                
                   His lectures can be weird and confusing because he explains a lot of proofs but it all comes together in the end and his class is amazing. Highly recommend it, he cares about his students and his office hours help a lot. He's a funny guy and his class isn't that hard if you pay attention and do the homework.
                
                   Hmwk due every week, 3 midterms, and a final. The material taught in class was not what the homework was over that week. Google was my bestfriend. The book and internet helped more than lecture. Very helpful if you go to office hours. Exam questions come from the homeworks. Does things differntly like: refuses to use ln, he likes log (base e).
                
                   Dr. Smith has a really hard time connecting his explanations of Probability to how you actually are supposed to solve his problems. The class is entirely computation and no proofs, which sounds nice, but is difficult when you have no idea how to approach certain problems. I often found myself multiplying random given numbers and praying.
                
                   LINEAR ALGEBRA WAS A NIGHTMARE WITH THIS PROFESSOR. HE ONCE TOLD ME I COULDN'T BELIEVE A PROOF THAT I USED OUT OF THE REQUIRED TEXTBOOK. FOR THIS REASON HE GAVE ME A &quot;B&quot; INSTEAD OF AN &quot;A&quot;. HIS NICKNAME IS &quot;KILLER KIRBY&quot; FOR A REASON...
                
                   I didn't like him at all! He wasn't helpful and wasn't very clear when teaching. He gave really hard problems for homework also.
                
                   average research professor.
                
                   This guy is totally brilliant.  The class was inspiring but I had to work hard to do well.
                
                   
                
                   Frank (he tells us to call him by his first name) is just a great guy. He will help anyone who asks and is there for his students. He occasionally gets off topic but this is oftentime the result of off topic students. He expects you work hard and if you do he will reward you with a high grade. One of the nicest professors I have ever had. 
                
                   I  am a student of University of Ibadan, Nigeria I was fortunate to be in professor frank sottile's class when he came as a visiting lecturer He was taking us something on higher dimension .Everything scattered at a point but he explained again and we got it. He is funny and fast .Trust me if you don't follow what he is doing  you are down there!
                
                   Prof Sottile is a great professor, you can go to his office hours and he will be there. His tests are extremely challenging and he knows it, but he works with the class on this. If you put the effort in and learn the material you will do well. He works well with students with disabilities which was really great. The homework is challenging but fun.
                
                   He's a nice guy and very enthusiastic about math, but he's really scatterbrained and hard to understand
                
                   Was in 151 Honors course.  I guess they figured that since we were honors students, we could deal with a terrible teacher.  Impossible to follow what he's doing.  Would also show us how to do a problem in class but would deduct points off of our tests if we worked the problem like him.
                
                   Math is a clear subject, but it takes practice.  It takes time to solve, and also to do proofs.  The Matlab portion can be dependent on programming skills, and I saw that Udemy offers Matlab short courses online.  Don't procrastinate, nap before doing problem sets, and learn to code.  Prof Steinhauer is a nice person and here to help.
                
                   He is very helpful if you are willing to go to his review sessions that he holds outside of class. He really wants the students to understand the material and is willing to stop class to nail down a topic that he thinks the students aren't understanding.
                
                   Does not work examples! If that's how you learn math I would suggest not taking him. Online help was my best friend in this class. Three group MATLAB projects that are pretty hard and worth 30%. Tests are tricky and very hard. Dustin is a nice guy who's pretty fun but not very good at teaching imo.
                
                   Very good prof. interesting and very helpful
                
                   Very bad prof. I would not take the class rather than take him. Tests are very hard. 
                
                   DO NOT TAKE HIM UNLESS YOU ABSOLUTELY HAVE TO
                
                   Possibly the worst math teacher I have had since my middle school algebra teacher. I call him a teacher because professor is too heavy a term to describe this man. In no way does he prepare you for the tests he has designed to be impossible. He doesn't stop smiling which makes the fact he is slighting you at every corner even worse.
                
                   His tests were really difficult and they often only covered a small portion of the material taught the quizzes were nice but overall I wouldn't recommend him to anyone. Over half the class failed the first test with grades around the 50's with only a few a handful of people making an A or B. 
                
                   Good professor, but very strict grader and asks very challenging questions in quizzes and tests.
                
                   Very nice guy, but his teaching style was not the best. He wrote down the major definitions, and then let the class solve the example problems with little guidance, which wasted a lot of class time. The take-home quizzes were nice, but the tests were all free response, no multiple choice and were completely comprehensive.
                
                   Very smard and a good prof, but his quizzes and tests are very challenging. Sometimes, tests don't really reflect what was taught in the lectures, but it was a very interesting class, and if you're up to the challenge, i recommend the class.
                
                   He's really good.
                
                   Boring. Not difficult. Gives 3 question quizzes.
                
                   You are bombarded with quizzes from a large array of homework assignments in which you barely have time to get done. Did I mention that the homework isn't for a grade? There is no room for error in his class. If you make one mistake then you're grade is shot. He will fly through his lecture and you can't really ask questions. He uses Maple.
                
                   Made A's in all my math classes, and this is the first class I've ever dropped.  About 50 HW questions a week, and the quizzes are on homework and lecture.  The weekly quiz is over the homework(few lecture examples) or the lecture (doesn't help with HW). At first students gasped when he assigns HW, but then doing 30 HW problems in 2 days is normal.
                
                   He is a very bad teacher. Avoid him as much as you can.
                
                   This professor reads verbatim from the textbook for his lectures. Tests are based on book problems, as is the homework. I'm disappointed in this class however, because differential equations is very interesting, but I couldn't get into it because of this professor. He is not nice, and I've never seen him smile. His final is very hard too.
                
                   Writes the book on the board. The book does a terrible job at explaining and is written for Math Majors. Test are easy so far, homework takes a long time. Material is difficult. Go an hero if you get this proffesor.
                
                   Find another professor. He was an extremely nice guy, but he literally just wrote the textbook on the board. I understand that he was new,  but his teaching style was sub-par.
                
                   Dr. Toby is nice, LOVES stats, and helpful. Class is pretty easy as long as you attend, do the homework which is super easy, and keep up with the notes.
                
                   She's kind of a wierdo, but it's unbelievable how much outside help she offers to those who will take it.  Her material is highly organized, and if you keep up with the class, you really can't fail.  In fact you'd have to be pretty dim to get a c.
                
                   Tests aren't too bad. She helps a lot during the quizes. And the major grade project at the end is pretty much an easy 100. She is really nice as well.
                
                   Dr.toby is a great prof. She's very enthusiastic, always happy and wants you to understand the material. do hmwk,practice exams. Go to office hours she will do the hmwk with you. Project no too hard but talk to her in advance and she will help you with it all.
                
                   Heavy accent, speaks with low volume. Stopped going to lecture after the first exam because it was long and I felt like my time would be better spent reading the textbook/ other professor's notes. Eventually ended up attending JD Kim's lectures (his test reviews rock). Seems like a nice guy who cares, but not a very good prof. Do your WebAssign!
                
                   He is honestly confused all the time, never prepared, doesn't know how to teach and is always in the lingo!!!(doesn't know whats going on) His TA min wang is absolutely useless and does not help you with anything, even if she did know the material. This professor is WACKKKK!! Didn't even attend his lectures; i went to amy austin's during my lecture
                
                   Nice dude, means well, but his constant explanations of trivial proofs get old real fast. Stopped going to class and started reading the textbook, i would suggest one to do the same. 
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Took in Spring of 2015. He is easy to approach, although his teaching style/ explanations didn't work with the way I learn. He is very down to Earth and a normal guy who always wears Holister shirts. lol Tests are rough but manageable.  I was always prepared for the wrong material for the tests.
                
                   Slightly difficult class to begin with. He was a great professor. EXTREMELY helpful. Go to his office hours, he is always there and will help you no matter how long it takes. Is really funny without trying to be. Gives a lot of notes. Be ready to write. I was well prepared for all tests, final was a little tricky in parts. Overall a great class!
                
                   Fairly easy class. Great prof. I would recommend him. His tests weren't too bad, his final was easy, and the homework wasn't bad either.
                
                   I really enjoyed her class, she tried to make it clear for students to understand and always accommodated to students' needs (she would push the homework back etc.). Silence your phone and pay attention, and you'll be fine.
                
                   Would not recommend. Very boring, monotone, really does not care at all about anything. Difficult to stay attentive in class. Lectures are just doing examples and copying down, no explanation or help to understand process. Probably learn best by the textbook, or I learned basically everything by youtube videos.
                
                   I would not recommend this professor to anyone. If you are not strong in math, even if you work very hard, you will fail. There is a TON of homework and she is monotone and boring. She also showed up late to class everyday. She does not really care at all.  Expect your textbook to teach you, and even that is not super helpful. 
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS PROF! I strongly warn anyone who is not strong in math to not take her she doesn't ever explain what she is doing but just works out the problems in the notes and has you copy them done. The Homework load is pretty heavy 3 assignments a week with 20ish LONG questions. She is a nice lady but a poor teacher!
                
                   I took Math 152 Honors, and the class wasn't that bad. The examples in her lectures are pretty much test-material and the material isn't hard. Calculus in high school helps big time. 
                
                   I took her for Math 142 and I had the worst time with the class. I was not offered calculus in high school and most of the math is based off of that. I played catch up the whole year and it was a very hard class for me personally.
                
                   Professor Vorobets was the best math prof I have ever had! Her accent does not make her hard to understand at all. She explains the content in a way that anyone could understand, and she is extremely helpful. The material is not difficult if you took calculus in high school, and she posts all notes (with problems worked out) online. Def. recommend!
                
                   She's super helpful and awesome but her tests are tough. 
                
                   Dr. Vorobets was probably my favorite professor this semester, I went to her office hours 1-2 times a week and built a strong relationship with her. She is extremely helpful and tries to make the class enjoyable I would definitely recommend her. You do have to work for your grade. Her accent was tough to understand at first.
                
                   Dr. Vorobets is a great professor! She is very approachable and extremely helpful.
                
                   She is funny. Difficult to understand at first because she's Russian, but you definitely get used to it.
                
                   Mariya is the nicest prof I've had. She is a bit hard to understand at first, but once you get used to it its no big deal. She is very helpful and tries to be funny and entertaining. Would def. recommend her and i would take another class she teaches!
                
                   A little hard to understand at first but great once you understand how she does things. Very very helpful.
                
                   Recommend! Fantastic person in general. Must go to class and pay attention the entire time. Miss one tiny thing and you're lost. It's not easy but he does a good job and isn't out to get you. I'd take him again.
                
                   Dr. Vogel is a very good professor. He makes everything easily understandable and explains clearly. He is very helpful, and his tests are extremely straight-forward.  His final seemed to be a slight jump in difficulty, but otherwise his exams are very clear-cut problems almost straight from the notes or web-assign. I would definitely recommend him.
                
                   He's very likable and has a sense of humor. He's also very helpful and able to explain things in a way that is easy to understand if you ask him. He's very devoted to making sure students are learning and that they do well.
                
                   He's a good professor. Just make sure to do all of your homework for your preparation for the exams.
                
                   He's boring and not a people person, but he definitely knows what he's doing. He gives a review for the test and goes over the review problems.
                
                   Very nice guy, but teaches examples straight from the book, which includes mostly conceptual problems that do not apply to the WebAssign homework, and has hard to read handwriting and used math notation that we are not taught in earlier classes. Doesn't understand that most of us are engineers and not math majors. Tests easy, HW very frustrating
                
                   The class was very hard because most of the time he would go mostly conceptual leaving the class lost. He would do some example problems helpful for the WebAssign HW but they could be explained better. I recommend a different professor because for the most part I was a scribe in class and learned it on my own through other profs notes and textbook
                
                   makes the class fun and she genuinely cares about her students
                
                   Jenn is a very nice and understanding professor. She cares about her students and is very approachable. She will go a long way to clearly answer any questions you have.
                
                   Jenn's the best! Wish she was teaching Math 152 next semester! She's really good at explaining things and will work out problems in class based on what the students have questions on or are struggling with. She also will make extra office hours when needed and helps out the students whenever she can. Would definitely recommend!
                
                   I've taken calc before but she explained things very clearly and gives you everything you need to do the homework and for the tests. She is willing to move due dates depending on other classes and student feedback also. Her office hours are helpful to and she is concerned about helping students who haven't taken calc before!
                
                   No need to buy the textbook because it's available online. Immediately you know she is a pretty chill teacher when she asks you to call her Jen. She's really there for students and tries to make sure that her students have seen every type of problem on the exam.
                
                   Jenn was amazing. She's super fun in lectures and does all she can to help you. She explains the material at an elementary level, I had previously taken calculus but she explained things in a way that made things easier to understand. She pretty much gives you all you need to know for homework and tests, she also does in class test reviews. 
                
                   She's the best professor ever. She seriously cares about her students, she wants to see you grasp the material. She is a harsh grader on tests (workout portion), but she will well prepare you for the test. Take her! She explains every step thoroughly. I wish she taught Math 152!
                
                   She is highly interested in her students, if you ask for help she would most definitely try her best to make you understand. Doing the suggested homework you will be fine. Funny and laid back.
                
                   Very helpful. Funny, keeps your attention, gets to know the students. Laid back.
                
                   Great Math 151 professor. Apparent that she actually cares if her students learn. Very approachable and has a good personality to go along with her knowledge of the subject.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   If  you pay attention and do the suggested homework, you should do fine. She is a fun prof and gets to know the students. Very approachable and answers questions.
                
                   He made some of the tests in Fall 2013 much harder than previous years. I thought he was not a very good teacher. He does a poor job of explaining things. He is bad at drawing 3D graphs, which can be crucial to your understanding of the material. I didn't learn much from him, but I'm really good at calculus so I still made a 100 on Test 1, 2, & 3.
                
                   He truly cares that you learn and understand the material.  His lectures are pretty easy to follow and are entertaining.  His tests are a little tricky but not unreasonable.  Overall he's a great professor, and I would take another class from him.
                
                   She's super nice, but a little aloof. I would seek outside help if you need any. But otherwise, pretty chill teacher with relatively do-able tests. Our TA was awesome:) And recitation quizzes were super easy - if they were ever harder, you could just ask the TA or fellow students - basically a group quiz.
                
                   Very hard to follow in lectures. Many other classmates including myself had to seek extra help understanding the materials. Her lectures are very hard to get through and the way she words things and explains is very hard to understand and is very different from other math instructors. I have heard the other professors are better for this course. 
                
                   If there was ever a teacher that could teach kindergartners abstract algebra, it would be her.
                
                   Doctor Witherspoon was a great professor! I would definitely recommend her to all looking to take MATH 171. She really takes time to explain theories well and answers all questions thoroughly.
                
                   Felt just like a highschool class, and was pretty easy having taken calc in highschool.  She teaches everything you need to know during class, and the tests aren't bad. Calculators allowed, recitation quizzes are basically group quizzes. Overall a super chill class.
                
                   He's very difficult to keep up with. He generally does half a problem, or jumps around a lot. Although, he's very eager to help with any confusion you may have. I personally wouldn't recommend it, but hes not the worst teacher. He's also a really cool dude.
                
                   Sometimes hard to understand, doesn't answer questions very well, but if you go to class and take good notes the exams are alright
                
                   His English is awful. If you don't know a good deal of information about contemporary math, don't take Zhou. If you know all the topics, then you'll enjoy the class because he tries so hard to speak English and is hilarious. Otherwise, worst teacher I had that semester. He tried to help but cannot communicate. Can't control his class. 
                
                   He had broken english which made him hilarious. He is so willing to help only if you ask. Do not buy the text book. Tests were easy if you went to class. Take notes from the power points he supplies. Final exam was cumulative and was significantly harder than the other exams. Overall we loved him!
                
                   Dr. Zhou is SUCH a sweet lady. She really is one of the nicest professors I have ever had. BUT she does not explain things well, and puts questions on the tests that are incredibly confusing. If I could go back, I would not take her, take Sheether or someone else. 
                
                   She never worked out any problems in class. If she incorporated that into her lectures then maybe we would know what  she is talking about. She literally reading ppts and copies problems out that are already calculated for her from the publisher. She did not even know how to use a graphing calculator for stats. We had to figure that out! 
                
                   I wish I would have taken it at a community college the prof is really nice but once it gets to the second test material the instruction given is not very clear. The class winds up being more terms and definitions instead of an example being given and solving it like the first half of the semester. I would not take this class or recommend it.
                
                   Professor Zhou does have an accent. However, it isn't too hard to understand her.  I found her class pretty boring but on tests she allowed you to have cheat sheets.  The homework she gives is really easy to make a 100 on since you can try each question 5 times. Doesn't really curve because of the cheat sheets.
                
                   This teacher is horrible. I received tutoring off campus, got extra stats help on campus. No matter how well you know the material the tests are extremely rough and she doesn't teach the material clearly. Take it at a Junior College. Wish I had.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Go to class and pay attention and you'll do well in her class. She gives a good review prior to every exam. Also willing to help outside of the class. Fair grading.
                
                   He only teaches at night but its worth taking. He makes it seem easy and you actually learn, I passed with flying colors and he goes out of his way to make sure you pass. Get to know him, it could good for you!!!
                
                   One word- AWESOME
                
                   One word: AWESOME; she is truly one of the kind. She makes math simple and fun. If you fail it's your own fault. This class was hard, but she goes above and beyond to help the students. Wish she gave more study sessions, those helped me A LOT! Well dressed, pretty to look at.
                
                   I am taking this prof right now. Math has never been my fave subject, but she explains it easily and makes it fun. Besides she is so hot, I swear that is one of the major reasons I keep going to her lectures. Helpful, professional, great sense of humor. I recommend!
                
                   Dr. Aslan is a lovely man and so helpful.  I quite enjoyed going to his class.  I think the fact that you have "hotness" as a factor indicates the values of the current generation of students.  No wonder the entitled generation found him "difficult".  Maybe their parents can hover around the door and help them with the homework.
                
                   Go to class, pay attention, write down what he writes on the board and ask questions if you don't understand. Do all of the assigned work and pay attention to the examples in the book, this will come in handy for the tests.
                
                   Uses questions from the examples in the book for all his tests and for the final. Easy "A" if you understand the Examples. I'm strongly recommend him and I will try to take the rest of math classes with him. ;) 5 stars
                
                   Professor is really good and treats us fairly. He is so kind to everyone!!:)
                
                   I dont know why people were so upset with this guy. If you pay attention you can understand him. If you are mature and do your work and practice the stuff outside of class you will make an A. His tests are exactly like the problems you do for homework, and he gives extra credit after every test. Easy class just do your work.
                
                   easy A
                
                   Only professor I've ever had who will put questions on the test that aunt listed on the study guide or taught in class, after saying that's what you need to know. He only goes over one or two problems per class period, and expects you to stay late to receive further instruction, which is an issue if you have a class after his.
                
                   Most classes I wondered if he was ever really &quot;going to get to the point.&quot; Rambler. He literally wants you to teach yourself - and I did. Upside - problems addressed in HW similar to tests. HW serves as attendance; it's not checked. Partial credit on tests. Some curves. Tests make up final. His TA is far far better!
                
                   Unless you want 2 work your butt off and get a C, don't pick this professor. I loved math prior to this class.  He is hard to understand and don't answer you &#63;'s.  He works problems really fast and then realizes that it's wrong and erases half the board, then picks back up instantly. You have no time to catch up or erase your useless notes.
                
                   Very helpful. I took this class on my third try and he was very helpful. Just show the initiative and ask for help he will pass you with a C if you need a C.
                
                   Willing to help out
                
                   Math has always been my favorite subject. This teacher changed my mind about math. I don't like it anymore. He is very hard to understand and when you try to ask him a question, he just says somthing weird and doesn't answer it. He told me that I shouldn't try to get help anywhere else like math lab.  I had to teach  myself. Makes no sense.
                
                   Pretty fair teacher.  I had him for both classes and got a B in each one.  Very hard to understand when he talks, but helps you out alot towards the end of the semester on the last test and final.  Tries to be funny and bcuz he sounds so ridiculous it is funny.  I would take him again.
                
                   He is a very hard teacher. I'm decent at math but could not understand him at all. He gave no homework and when I went to him for help he told me to do it on my own. I strongly encourage others not to take his class!
                
                   very helpful the most fair math professor i have ever had
                
                   His teaching ONE or 1/2 a problem in 50 MINS.is ridiculous.I tried asking him what I should do cause I wasnt making good grades on his 6-8 question tests. His exact words &quot;drop the class&quot; no help or anything!He tells his students every semester this is his last semester.If you know your math:take him;if you want to learn:take someone else.
                
                   Aslan was tough but fair and I learned a lot in his class. Plus, at the math meet this year, he was so proud of the Calculus Bowl team he was practically glowing.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I've always made A's in math until I got this guy.  I could understand him in class, and when I would go talk to him after class it wasn't any clearer, just much louder and closer.  I feel like I wasted my money for him to talk loudly in jibberish.
                
                   I think he's a good teacher. His accent isnt to bad, tests are easy as long as you come to class and do your homework. He gives extra points on your tests. If you know how to work out side of class you will do fine.
                
                   He's a great professor and incredible at teaching the material, however I felt like the tests were way too difficult compared to the quizzes and homework. I would say he's one of the top choices when it comes to calculus professors, but be prepared to put in the hours of studying. 
                
                   great professor, tough material . I failed the course but I learned a lot. 
                
                   Thus class is extremely hard, but I learned more in this class that all of my other math classes. He is knowledgeable and he will help you if you need it. Find someone who has taken the class before and use their old tests as study guides, this makes the class a lot easier.
                
                   He teaches mostly straight by the book. The examples he works are from the book. He assigns homework and asks students to solve it on the board, but he never takes it up for a grade. If the students can?t solve the problems, he will give hints, but hardly ever actually answers the question. I would say he is not bad, but not the best either.
                
                   I took basic calculus from Dr Anderson in the mid 80s, and occasional classes after that. He teaches methodically with a fair amount of clarity. His tests are of moderate difficult, with bonus points for clarity of proof. He's enthusiastic and willing to help outside of class. His jokes are extremely deadpan and utterly corny, though.
                
                   I enjoyed his class.  I like his sense of humor.  I also like how he demonstrates how to do things step-by-step.  He explains why you do something, instead of just telling you, this is how to solve a problem.
                
                   His statistics class was dry and boring. He read to us straight from the book. We never got any new expamples or anything that wasn't right out of the textbook. He is funny though! In a dry sense of humor kind of way, and he does care for his students. Overall, not bad...
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I took Dr. Anderson's 179 course about eight years ago. He is, without question, a clear and entertaining teacher.  He is able to explain difficult concepts AND help you work the problems.  There is a reason why he is the head of the math dept!
                
                   he was not too tough for someone in math education and is entertaining.
                
                   He is one of the best math teachers ever. He does a good job of bringing everything together. You can really see the connections.  He learns everyones name,and continues to me friendly and helpful, even semester after you have taken his class.
                
                   By far the best in the department I've had so far. Clear, friendly and helpful
                
                   Pretty good for lower level classes.  Not too hard.
                
                   Pretty good classroom insturctor for lower level classes.
                
                   O.k. at being entertaining but what about actually teaching math that is useful and advancing the field&#63;
                
                   Very humble, excellent teacher!  I have no idea why someone would say he is conceited.  I learned more in one week of his class than I did in a whole year of calculus from a previous teacher!
                
                   Extremely well versed in mathematics, enthusiastic and tells the story of history of mathematics from both a historical and numbers perspective.  Connects advancements and setbacks in mathematics to world events.  Take the course if interested in math.
                
                   Interesting subject.  I wish he would talk louder, and give more direction for exams
                
                   I hated this class. Anderson acts like he is suave. He trys to put on a show of look at me, I am so great.I have no idea how he does research, he seems not to be that bright and quite timid.
                
                   OVERALL GREAT TEACHER! "ALWAYS" there for his students. Listen to him when he says, "Study, study, study" Give him is 45 MINUTES !! He makes you work hard for your grade. I never really cared for math nor was I good at it but I got an A because he brakes things down very well. As he would say let me be "Pedestrian" I'm from Lonestar college not a&m
                
                   Honestly he is one of the best math teachers I have ever had. He's extremely easy to understand and incredibly funny. You couldn't miss his class even if you wanted to. His class is fun. Do your work and study. He's an amazing professor.
                
                   Great teacher !! There for you when you need help. I would take him again if I needed another math class. He's very uplifting, but he makes you work hard for your grade  so that you will remember but it's  a good pain especially if you really want to Learn and EARN YOUR GRADE. JUST GIVE HIM HIS 45 MINUTES TO STUDY THE MATERIAL AND YOU'LL PASS
                
                   Best teacher I have ever had, EVER!!!! "if you do what I ask, you will pass." Sometimes the work gets frustrating but all he says is study for 45 minutes a day and you will pass, and I did. I took College Algebra with him and he made it exciting to learn and on top of that he is funny as hell. I suggest not missing class or u'll miss a lot. 
                
                   BEST TEACHER EVER. 
                
                   Best Math Professor I've ever taken, I'm still currently taking his class. He's very inspirational, pushes you to be better and to understand how his assignment applies in the real world. He's a very clear out problem solver kind of guy, his notes are extremely clear and helpful. I hope you guys get a chance to take his class.
                
                   M. Bruce is a good teacher even though his methods are a bit strange. He made College Algebra interesting.
                
                   Great teacher, great guy. Willing to help and understand.
                
                   One of the best professors on Earth! First of all he is so cute! His class is really easy just pay attention do the work and it'll be an easy A. He will do anything to help you. Took his class during the summer. He's really funny. So take him.
                
                   An excellent teacher. Attendance mandatory to pass class. And studying 45 minutes after class is necessary and office visits are often necessary as well due to semester time frame constraints
                
                   He is the best math professor I  ever had. He is really funny and his class is always interesting.
                
                   While Mr. Bruce's methods of teaching are a bit unorthodox, they are however highly effective. Mr. Bruce taught me more than just math. He cares about his students and will do anything to help them succeed!
                
                   The best math teacher, teacher in general, I've ever had. Made the material easier to understand and cares about the students! Very fun and funny teacher!
                
                   Hands down the best math teacher I have ever had. I would still be a math major today if I would have had more teachers like Mr. Bruce. He's passionate about what he teaches and truly wants he students to learn the subject. I would definitely take another class with him.
                
                   This professor is very passionate in what he does. He will do his endeavor best to help you under stand the material. He is also the funniest teacher I have ever had!!! The class is not boring at all! He takes learning to an entire new level! Take him if you can!
                
                   Easily the best Math teacher I have ever encountered.  Always takes the time to help students and ensure the material is understood. If you don't understand pre-calculus after taking his course, it is because you didn't seek his help.  He goes above and beyond to provide clarity on any and all sections.
                
                   Actually cares about his students future and if they pass. He is also very very funny!
                
                   Funniest teacher ever. Really enjoyed his class.
                
                   Mr. Bruce is an awesome Business Cal professor. He makes class fun to attend and he goes above and beyond to help. He says some off the wall things but he just tries to keep everybody interested. The class is really difficult in general so the main thing is just having a professor that wants to see you succeed and he is that professor.
                
                   The best teacher I ever had. If you put in the work and see him in his office for help, you will do very well in the class. He goes above and beyond to help you with all of your questions.
                
                   I really like having Davenport for as a math professor.  He trys really hard to make things easier for his students, which usually means that he only gives us a couple of problems for homework. Make sure you pay extra atttenion though, becasue there have been days when he nas called for an assignment, and I have missed it.
                
                   be prepared to take a lot of notes, but it helps. he's a great teacher who really cares about his students. the test material tends to come straight from the homework or example problems, so as long as you keep up, you'll do fine. attend every class, because he counts attendance and in-class assignments. overall great teacher!
                
                   Mr. Davenport is one of the most helpful teachers I  have had.  He is an excellent teacher and does everythig he can so his students succeed. I really enjoyed his class and I normally hate math.
                
                   He's a very helpful teacher, but the only thing i hated was the fact that he gives out homework before he even talks about that chapter. In general, good professor.
                
                   great teacher if extra help is needed...only &quot;flaw&quot; is that at times he assigned homework faster than the class was learning, but otherwise pretty good
                
                   What a great teacher. He is so nice and will help anyone who asks.
                
                   He has been one of the best math teachers I have ever had, I actually liked going to that class (unlike my friend who I had to poke with a pencil to keep from falling asleep)  He was always there to help if we had questions.  Best teacher ever.
                
                   nice guy i guess, just had him for one math class. obviously knows math very well, but hissense of humor and stories and tangents are very! boring.
                
                   Dr. Davenport was a great teacher. He will go out of his way to help you. Very clear. I learned a lot from his class.
                
                   Just an awesome teacher, vey helpful and easy to understand.
                
                   He is a wonderful teacher who actually takes an interest in his students.  He is really helpful and just wants to see his students succeed.
                
                   very good teacher.  he is very understanding and he makes math clear.   His class is the only math class I didn't fall asleep in.
                
                   JD is the best math teacher i have ever had and i am a math major senior.  Great guy, great teacher, loves teaching.  What more could you ask for in a teacher.  I would take his class again for certain.
                
                   Great teacher makes you understand your work.
                
                   Had to take the course twice, but had Mr. Davenport both times.  He helped me to pass the 2nd time around.  Nice person.
                
                   Very friendly ideal teacher... makes calculus understandable and gives partial credit... do your homework and you will be prepared for the tests.. very helpful!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The worst pair of attributes:  1.  Uses easy examples in class, does not teach - simply does the equation.  2.  Chooses the hardest equations for the tests, does not explain on the test why you lost credit....
                
                   Don't ever take his class. Ever. He will ruin your GPA and he's happy to do so, he would rather you get a B just to emphasize how hard cal 2 is supposed to be. Not that anyone in my class even has a B, this is just speculation because no one is passing at this point. I am an excellent student and have a 4.0 with 54 hours and I am failing. 
                
                   honest opinion: 1 have a strong background or some idea 2 DO THE HOMEWORK W/O CHEATING!! 3 talk to him during office hours 4 dont rely totally on him,you have to do major studying on your own 5 be on time, starts right away 6 very confusing most of the time & gets off track ALOTT!!..overall he is the sweetest teacher ever & he really cares about yo
                
                   never again...
                
                   Absolute worst teacher I have ever had.  He doesn't have his own notes, goes off the top of his head, can't always explain things to people when asked, abbreviates as much as possible and has horrible handwriting so you can't tell what he is writing on the board, and DOESN'T RESPOND TO EMAILS.  I could go on, but I think you get the point.
                
                   I am taking calculus 2 from him...his tests are hard..more than 70% students are making c or less..he treats students differently...he didn't take any of my late assignments even when i requested..but i was disappointed to see him asking a student to turn her late assignments..i didn't object because i fear that could count against myself
                
                   Teaches like you've already completed Calculus 3... You can be sitting with a tutor DURING the test, and STILL fail it. PLEASE STAY AWAY! I BEG OF YOU! I refuse to change my major because of him!
                
                   He does not explain things and he is alwayd talking about Xi* and some crap that does not make since.. I changed my major because of him
                
                   Dr. Dorsett was actually better than the previous ratings made me expect.  He didn't require a lot of homework, but you do get a few problems every night.  The only reason attendance is mandatory is because he takes up homework randomly and won't accept it late.  Besides that he was pretty good.
                
                   Probably the worst teacher I have ever had for a math class.  If you don't work the test problems the exact way he wants you to, then he will only give you 1 point credit if you have the correct answer.  Overall would not recommend taking a class from him unless it was absolutely necessary and then I would reevaluate your definition of necessary.
                
                   This man is horrible I had him for college algebra and he didnt do a thing to help his students he didnt care his tests were hard and the HW sometimes he wouldnt even take it up so i'm telling you dont take his class this man is unhelpful
                
                   Gives horrible lectures.
                
                   Took Bus Math I & was a disappointed b/c it was more of an excellerated Algebra course (and I was taking this course to avoid taking Algebra) with maybe 2 chapters of business math. He tends to get off subject during lectures, but he explains the material well.  Lots of homework but it counts as a test grade in the end.Helpfull and understanding
                
                   There is tons of homework. He is so boaring, get yourself a tutor.
                
                   nice guy, but boring and dull. put me to sleep.
                
                   He is very boring and his class is difficult. If you learned to do algebra by calculator in high school, forget it, you cannot use it in his class. He has to choose the hard way of doing things and doesn't explain things very clearly at all.
                
                   One of the nicest men on the planet. He truly cares that each student understands what is being taught. He will answer any question seriously, no matter how dumb you may feel asking it. His homework assignments aren't difficult, and his tests are straightforward. They are basic problems you covered in homework, with no curveballs.
                
                   he's boring
                
                   Awesome teacher...
                
                   Explained everything until everyone understood. Good teacher. Homework assignments were easy.
                
                   Dr. Dibbs is a very progressive teacher. If you look at her research, it's all about math education and improving it - her instructional methods definitely reflect that. This course focused on small groups and I found that it was very helpful to learn that way. She's very helpful if you're ever confused, but her coursework is definitely not easy.
                
                   Best math professor I've ever had. Definitely one of my favorite professors overall. Sometimes the class will get hard, but she'll be more than happy to help you understand it. Tests were on the same level as the lectureshomework. Not a ton of homework which is nice. Actually enjoyed taking calculus.
                
                   Cons: Condescending, Pedantic at times, Gossips about teachersstudents, NO LATE SUBMISSION, Math Labs can be difficult, wears clothes that leave half her belly hanging out.   Pros: If you are smart or good at calc it is easy to be on her good side, offers a lot of extra credit and test corrections, good test review and doesnt try to trick you. 
                
                   Idk why Dr Dibbs has such a low rating on here, shes one of my favorite teachers Ive ever had.  She isnt the best at explaining why to do something, but youll know how & when! Theres tons of extra credit given and you can earn half of your points missed on a test back by correcting it. My only complaint is she goes too fast through some material
                
                   Horrible, lacks interpersonal skills, gossips about students and faculty during class, completely unprofessional. No knowledge gained, complete waste of time. 
                
                   Doesn't care about student understanding or success.  Lack of clarity and structure makes it virtually impossible to understand what is expected of students. 
                
                   Very unprofessional gossips and puts down staff and students during class. Doesn't care about student understanding or success.  Lack of clarity and structure makes it virtually impossible to understand what is expected of students. 
                
                   Absolute worst prof I've ever had. She's condescending and claims she is one of the best calc teachers in the United States. Hah no. Constantly downs other professors on campus and claims their decisions are awful and that she would do a better class. She has no professionalism at all.
                
                   Dr. Dibbs is hands down, the best math professor I've ever had. I wish more professors and high school teachers instructed the same way as she does. You'll have to show up for class and do the work, but she'll make sure you have a solid calculus foundation. 
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Bimal was the best math teacher I've ever had. 
                
                   A very helpful teacher.  Always have a positive outlook on everything, even when things aren't going his way. He have a great sense of humor and always make us laugh, even when he isn't trying to. I appreciate him for caring so much about teaching us what we need to learn and preparing us for our careers. He is the greatest teacher I ever had!
                
                   He is the best Teacher I ever had! He teachs very good and is a cool guy, always ready to help you to understand materials.  He got a lot of knowlegde, knows what he is talking about and force you to learn math. Because of him I did major in Mathematics. He also got a good sense of humour. I enjoyed every single class and learnt a lot!
                
                   Great teacher. Really helped me and stayed after class if needed. Also gave opportunities to get points back on tests. Great teacher overall. Am really glad I took him my first semester in college.
                
                   Can't control his class. Students coming and going as they please. He teaches ok, works with you if you need it. English is slightly hard to understand.
                
                   Can't control his class. Students coming and going as they please. He teaches ok, works with you if you need it. English is slightly hard to understand.
                
                   She's rude! I left class early for something important and she called me out like I was the only one who has ever missed class and wouldn't give me the homework. Other than that, I like the way she teaches. Just teaches with examples so if you want to know where formulas are derived from, you won't like her. If you study the reviews you'll do fine.
                
                   Stuff she teaches usually is nothing like the review and she reviews easy problems. She moves a little fast. And she is a bit quiet. Test are a little hard since she takes points of for not doing all the steps not even points for trying! Wouldn't take again
                
                   She is not so lenient she will take of points if you miss a step no partial credit for trying. She is a nice lady and if you ask will help her reviews aren't very helpful because she puts hard questions on the test and easy ones on the review you get your hopes up until you see the test. the class is boring for sure tho so be aware
                
                   Decent teacher. If you at least tried, she would try to help you out. She taught pretty fast, but if you had a problem with something, all you had to do was ask. Must attend class to understand material though.
                
                   This class was an easy A for me.  She was very helpful and explained things clearly.  If I had a question she would answer them in detail.  I would even go to her office to recieve help before a test.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great teacher. Enjoyed being in class and have a better math grade because of her.
                
                   not helpful if you can stay out of her class do so. Doesn't Know how to teach and is not helpful but expects you to know the material and if you don't down grades you. Shouldn't be a teacher at all does not know how to deal with people
                
                   Not a very clear teacher
                
                   This teacher does not know how to teach. She just works out the problems and she doesn't tell you how she got the answer. She is not helpful. Just because she knows the material, she expects you to. She is a new professor and she sucks. She had fifteen people drop her class at the same time during o
                
                   Most homework was online which was alright. Ms. Kuzat is a very respectful woman and teacher. To make an A just do homework, study for tests, go to tutoring, and show up to class. It really was not that hard.
                
                   I did not pass and would not take it again with this professor.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very nice, Helpful, Clear teacher. Wish he taught more classes!
                
                   I have taken MATH 192, 401, 335, and 502 with him. I believe he is the best Mathematics professor on campus. His tests are very challenging, but he usually gives you ways to make more points on them. He doesn?t give too much homework. You will learn alot if you take his classes and work hard! I wish I could have all my classes taught by him.
                
                   Great teacher
                
                   Flat the best professor I've ever had. I've taken Discret Mathematics, Number Theory, and Difference Equations from him and he is hands down the best all around teacher in the department. His classes are tough but the learning is unparalleled. Would recommend taking him to anyone for any class.
                
                   The guy is not personable at all, but with that said, I learned much from him which is more than I can say for most of my classes.  He was refreshing in a sea of &quot;give them an A for coming to class every day&quot; instructors.
                
                   A math fanatic.  Awesome teacher.  I would encourage everyone taking a math class to have him.  His enthusiasm is unmatchable.
                
                   learned a lot from him
                
                   not AT ALL organized.  he is not easy, and sometimes gets frustrated when you ask questions.  Has serious favorites.  Hope you are one, then you will get an A.
                
                   Very Busy, Very Smart, not organize at time when he is busy and tired.  He is willing to provide extra help to students outside class when you make an appointment with him in evenings or even weekends.  Learned a lot from him.
                
                   Very nice guy, who knows his stuff.  Tests are long and intense, but he is very fair and a really good TEACHER.
                
                   busy man.  but when you do catch him, he will work with you to make sure you understand.  very smart, MIT grad.
                
                   He knows what he is teaching and he is very good at it.one of the best i have seen.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I am horrible at math and finished with an A. Homework is every class, long, and hard. But the tests come exactly from reviews. So as long as you study and understand the reviews you should do well. She is quite sassy, but I am taking her again because I believe I will do well again. Takes a lot of effort but good grade is fairly easy.
                
                   She really knows her stuff and is a great teacher. Expect homework almost every class but it is not difficult as long as you go to class and pay attention. Tests come from review. Highly recommend.
                
                   I struggle with math as it is, she is a very nice lady! She is good at what she does but goes very quickly through the material and doesn't leave time for us to either catch up or try and answer the problem ourselves. She is a VERY tough grader, if you don't pass your tests you will not pass the class. I would take her if i was good at math 
                
                   Ms. Newton was a great teacher! She's there for you. You do have homework due every class but they're straight from the notes. Tests were very similar to the review and homework. I would definitely recommend her for any class.
                
                   Great teacher.
                
                   Great Professor! I have always been horrible at math, but got it this semester. She will dumb the material down without insulting your intelligence. She is easy to find and responds quickly to emails. If you miss a class, email her and she will give you the notes. I highly recommend her!
                
                   Best math teacher I've had (and I'm horribly bad at math classes!).. Willing to help, and easy to approach..I passed with an A, and knew exactly what I needed to get done on tests and everything.
                
                   Excellent teacher.  Good communication.  Very encouraging.  Very approachable and willing to work with you as far as giving you notes if you miss class for good reason.  Can't say enough good about her.
                
                   She is a good teacher but she is a ridiculous grader.  I get every question on my test right and then I end up with a failing.  We are not all math majors.  If she wants to teach math majors don't teach a basic math credit course.
                
                   Dr. Ou is a really nice guy. Accent isn't all that bad, especially once you get used to it. Handwriting can be a little confusing, but from context you can get it. Taught the material very well and showed a love for math. I bombed the first test, and towards the final I came to get help with my grade. He said he's considering dropping lowest test.
                
                   I made an A in cal 2 with my other instructor come to cal 3 with Dr.OU and make the lowest math grades in my life ask for help just looks at me, I go to get him to sign my drop form and tells me to do it on the computer I tell him I'm a freshmen and he has to sign my form  then looks at me and say why is a freshmen in my class great professors!
                
                   Good teacher. Knows his stuff. Made Calculus III really easy. Finished the course with almost a 100 average. Easy A!!!
                
                   The man knows his Linear algebra but fails to convey it easily to the students.  Tests heavily on theory not practice.  Tested on subjects that had not been taught yet and defended himself stating that the students should have been able to figure it out from the information in the previous sections.  Then taught the sectuons two days later.
                
                   He is a very good teacher. I don?t think his accent is that bad. He gives too much homework though, and then only grades 1 problem per section. His tests don?t seem too tough. I would recommend taking him if you plan on going further in Mathematics.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I think she is a great teacher.  She helps anyone who needs it they just have to ask.
                
                   Very helpful teacher!! She really cares about her students success!! Will go out of her way to try to help anyone!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Homework due every  day (MWF), quizzes every Friday, never cancels class. You will not understand the material unless you go to tutoring. Is not interested in your name or how well you understand what she is "teaching". Show up every single day, be there for all quizzes/tests, turn in all projects/hw, get all tutoring hours, and you can still fail.
                
                   She is such a wonderful person but a really bad teacher, she is not clear, usually questions herself, and rarely available. I learned more from the tutoring center than I did from her. Her tests are not meant to be finished in 50 minutes and are not like the homework. Don't take this class with her specially if you're PSA.
                
                   She is terrible. I made a D in her class and didn't learn anything. I retook it and got an A with someone else. She will not help, and is the most difficult professor I have ever had and ever will have. Do not sign up for her, ever. She was googling how to do equations during class. 
                
                   Only the strong will survive and she is incredibly unclear and is very unhelpful. The reviews do not prepare you for the test!!!! 
                
                   You have three tests and a final. No makeup work allowed, homework is assigned everyday, and quizzes are every Friday. One competency exam, worth a lot. Must study hard to pass, and a lot of hard work. Make sure you've done research on all your teachers, especially this one.
                
                   I'm really bad at math and this course was no exception. I always have to go to the math lab and ask my friends who have other teachers for help. Her lecture style isn't the most helpful in my opinion. She gives textbook homework almost every class and quizzes every Friday. She has never canceled a class before and is pretty serious about her job.
                
                   Sweetest woman but doesn't really know what she's talking about some of the time. I really struggled in that class. Do the homework and go to the math lab because that's how you'll learn anything from this class.
                
                   Great professor!  Accent is a little hard to understand at first, but you get used to it.  I had him for Calc 2, Calc 3 and Linear Algebra previously.  He gives reviews very similar to the tests and also gives extra credit problems.  Make sure you attend class or you will get behind.  Highly recommended!
                
                   Great professor! Though make sure you attend class or you will get behind.  I had him for Calc 2, Calc 3, and Linear Algebra previously.  He cares about his students and gives reviews very similar to the tests.  He also gives extra credit problems.  Highly recommended
                
                   He is a pretty easy teacher, but I think he teaches even the harder topics, he just doesn?t test you on it. He likes talking, it?s nice to sometimes stop working to hear a story about when he lived in Bulgaria.
                
                   He wonders why students pass everything and then bomb the final.  Gosh, could it be because the vast majority of students have to cheat to pass his class&#63;  Cheating makes it super easy because he always asks the same questions.  The reason why students bomb the final is that the final is never returned to the students.  It is the true indicator.
                
                   he is very good professor
                
                   He is the Professor,who teaches based upon the students knowledge. Understands the students problems.We can learn a lot in his class. I like hi teaching
                
                   The class material was extremely difficult, and his teaching style didn't make it any easier. He gave too few examples so it was hard to understand the material. He gave reviews that were exactly like the tests, with minor changes in the numbers. His class is easy to pass, but you won't learn much.
                
                   more than fair, he's a great teacher to enroll with.
                
                   Dr. Sirakov is sincerely interested in all of the students succeeding and understanding the material.    He makes himself available, beyond standard office hours, for additional help if needed, and is consistently professional, fair and encouraging to the students. (Time, money & effort well spent)!
                
                   I like this professor. Works well with the students. Bends over backwards to make it accomidating for the students. A little problem with his handwriting and accent. (his 4 and 9's look like g's and other such thins.)
                
                   Super tough grader. When she isn't lecturing about math she is talking about her kids (which is a lot). She is kind of all over the place and not very organized.
                
                   She's a real sweetheart and I really enjoyed her class. There's a lot of work involved, but you'll learn a lot from her. She knows her stuff and is really aware of the changes the education system goes through, so her lessons are up-to-date as well.
                
                   Mrs. Singleton is a tough grader. If it's not her way then she will count it wrong unless you can prove to her that your way makes sense as well. She teaches math to the very core and focuses on hands-on strategies. She will make you work for that A but in the end you will feel accomplished. 
                
                   This was probably my favorite professor in college. I had her for 4 classes and made As in all of them. If you have a very poor math background you may have to work in her classes but the key is to just show up, do your homework, and follow directions. She goes above and beyond to prepare you for the classroom. I would definitely recommend her. 
                
                   Mrs. Singletons classes are about new and different methods for solving elementary math problems. Her tests and homework are very detailed. If youre willing to learn a new way to solve the problems, than you will get a good grade. Mrs. Singleton is a hard instructor but Im going to be a GREAT math teacher because of her!
                
                   I started out liking the class but as time passed I began to hate it and dread it. She is an slow grader, which is ridiculous since a student grader grades most of her stuff, too picky and isnt very nice or helpful when you have a problem. Her test reviews are useless and buying the book is a waste of money,I never opened it.
                
                   Picky & slow grader. You are supposed to use previous tests to study for the final yet we never got them all back to review. Still don't know my grade in the course.
                
                   This class was very very hard! She however is a good teacher very picky but you will leave that class knowing more then when you walked in! I don't know how but I made an A in this class! So it is possible if you work hard!
                
                   Her grading is terrible. If you get the answer correct, but the work isnt the way she wants it, its wrong. If you turn in ALL homework and study for ALL tests, your grade is never what you want it to be. You could be a straight A student, and her class will be that one where you make a C or lower.
                
                   I have had this teacher more than once. I have tried avoiding having her as a teacher. She never has anything graded. We have yet to recieve back homework from the beginning of the semester. She tells you that students learn differently and there are more was than one to solve problems, yet it is her way or the highway.
                
                   Though very picky and teaches extremely fast, Mrs. Singleton is the by far the best Math 350/351 teacher. You WILL know the material and will be able to teach anything math related K-8. Grading is a bit slow, but she is always around to answer questions and tutor. LOVED her!
                
                   She is an amazing teacher who challenges u. If u want to learn take the class but if u want to slack off & hope for a curve dont bother she wont be nice. Shes a tough grader but is always willing to answer questions & gives u all the tools u need to pass so study hard and u will do fine. She will make u become a better teacher in the end.
                
                   In this class you only use the book to write reflections from it. That she does not grade or give back to you until the end of the semester. She does not grade her homework her aide does. She also doesn't give homework or any graded papers back until the day of the test. And not good with emailing you back.
                
                   None! HORRIBLE
                
                   Had her for 351. Was extremely helpful. She really wants you to be able to properly teach math, so she's a bit of a stickler for correct vocab use, etc. People that failed our class skipped a lot and didn't apply themselves. Those of us that passed were there every class and worked hard. When you pass her class, you KNOW the material!
                
                   Mrs. Singleton is fair and a great teacher. True, her classes aren't a cakewalk, but she teaches step by step and was always available to help. When you pass her class, you know that you KNOW the material!! From my class with her, the people who failed were the ones that didn't apply themselves fully or skipped alot.
                
                   This was the 2nd time to take Math 350. I needed a C. I worked hard and was always in her office trying to get help, but she counts off for every little mistake. If you do not set up a problem in the exact form she likes,then it is wrong even though in reality it does not matter. She is out to fail everyone. SHE IS TOO PICKY!
                
                   She does not make directions clear and the projects are all just paperwork and don't count much anyways just study the old test. Hated the class!!
                
                   She does not make the directions clear.  If you go to her, she'll tell you one thing then change it on you.  You have to attended class even if you have a dr note. You are always wrong and never will be right. If you try to prove her wrong, then she'll single you out.  If you have to take her, sit down, shut up, study your butt off. You'll do fine.
                
                   She is not impersonable and degrades you! She is helpful during tutorial time but gets distracted when people come into her office. She is not understanding to and shows no mercy.
                
                   I thought Heidi Staebler-Wiseman did a good job teaching this class.  Unlike what one rater said, homework is assigned, but it is not due until two class periods after that. Actually it is not due until 5:00 PM that day. If you can follow directions, do the homework, and study once in a while, you will have no problem with this class.
                
                   She was very hard...gave TONS of homework. She grades VERY hard on the test!! I would never take her again.
                
                   This is the worst &quot;teacher&quot; I have ever had!! If you ever have to take a math class and she is teaching it DO NOT take it. All we did was LOTS of homework stupid pointless papers over math magazines that she did not grade until a month after they were due, and give us extremely hard tests that you could not possibly finish in the class period!!
                
                   I liked her and her class. My only complaint is that she was very condescending when you are having trouble.
                
                   If you like a lot of homework take her class. You will definitely be given many problems to work out and have plenty to do taking this class. Homework is assigned and due the very next class period. The homework not only includes math problems, but papers summarizing articles that are handed out. Need lots to do she will definitely plan it for you.
                
                   Worked hard in this class, and thought that I should have had a high grade compared to the rest of the class, but got a C.
                
                   She is terrible. She doesnt explain with clarity and you are completely confused. You can make an appointment with her and still leave confused.
                
                   I have never had a prof that I learned less from. In school as a student I loved math, now I despise it. You will not learn a thing. She is unhelpful, condescending, and unqualified (she has never even taught elementary students).
                
                   Don't take her class! I learned nothing. Not helpful at all. She's out to get you, I promise.
                
                   I took many of Underhill's classes as an undergrad. He teaches very fast, but with a clarity and preciseness unmatched at ETSU. His tests are easy if you've attended class and have even moderate math skills. He's the nicest guy ever outside of class but not that great to talk to about class-related problems.
                
                   Will not help students - very hard class; Mainly a pain to deal with; Unfair grading as well. Do not take Underhill!
                
                   An easy class if you do the homework and go to class. He goes over any problems you want him too and will help out until you and everyone understands. The final was very hard but he may have curved it a lot. I'd recommend him.
                
                   I took this class my first semester here and it was just fine.  I worked hard.  He is a good teacher and is very smart.  Those who do poorly should probably stick with college algebra.
                
                   i'd take his class again
                
                   This is by far the hardest professor I have had since i started college 3 years ago.  He goes over a lot of material but doesn't really explain it at all.  If you have him, drop the course.  DO NOT TAKE UNDERHILL IF YOU ARE WORRIED ABOUT YOUR G.P.A.
                
                   very very thorough in his lectures.  fair.
                
                   Dr. Un is the best Algebra professor! She is so sweet and wants you to do well in her class. I really enjoyed taking her class, and I highly recommend Dr. Un.
                
                   Dr. Un is an amazing professor! You may have to write a lot of notes down because she likes to get things done, but she gives you photocopied handwritten notes as long as she can. She gives her students opportunities for them to pass but there's no extra credit. I am currently in her class and I got a 103 for exam 1 and 104 on exam 2. 
                
                   I really enjoyed having this professor. She really puts her students first. She is also compassionate, because I have an awful heart condition and she would let me take my tests on different dates if needed to because of my heart. Very sweet, even gives you hand written notes. 
                
                   Love Dr. Un!! She will work with you if you are struggling. Her exams & quizzes  come directly from the homework. Although she is a tough grader; she gives on points on exams if you do problems on the board. She also allows calculators on exams & quizzes. I would highly recommend her for MATH 350 &351.
                
                   Dr. Un was awesome! Assignments were pretty easy to do & quizzes, they were just like the homework. Her exams were identical from her assignments. She is a picky grader but she does give partial credit. Basic or scientific calculators allowed on tests & quizzes. She gives points on exams for doing problems on the board. No project notebooks!
                
                   Dr. Un is a very good and thorough educator. She explains the problems very clearly and it is very easy to understand. Do the work and she will help you. Cell phones should not be an issue. You shouldn't be on them anyway. You are suppose to be learning. Then you blame the professor for your failure.
                
                   Dr. Un was an excellent professor. She worked very hard to allow students to make a good grade if they were willing to put in the effort. Homework was on My Math Lab, and she gave study guides for the tests with similar questions.Exams graded based on work shown. She is very strict about cell phone use though. Very friendly, caring professor!
                
                   If you're like me, and have to learn math from the basics, then this is the teacher for you. She makes concepts seem very easy! I thought I was hopeless in math, until I made an A in her class! It takes work, you can't miss a day of class, do the math lab. Text book not required. Just show up to class. I went from failing to passing when I did that
                
                   I don't like her! She is very hard to understand and doesn't really cover material, she talks about it but when I  ask her for help with something she never actually answered my question. Also she hates cell phones! She will walk around the room and count how many she sees and won't teach unitl they're gone. Waste of time!!! Don't take her class!!!
                
                   She's funny! Very helpull. Show up to class & you'll do just fine! Read your notes before class! Study review and you will pass the test! Same questions diff numbers lol
                
                   Awesome teacher, too bad she had so many kids in her class that didn't care enough to put in the effort. I really learned Algebra with her.
                
                   She grades really really hard on the exams its almost impossible to get a 100 but I guess you just have to study WAY MORE than in most classes. I had numerous people complain in her class and talked behind her back alot!! She does have more potential to have a class that is not as stressful but as far as I know many people hate her grading style!
                
                   Definitely a great professor,makes sure everyone understands what she is teaching. She has an accent, which is understandable, but cute because she sounds like a little girl sometimes. homework is always good practice for her tests.
                
                   One of THE BEST professors on campus! People complain about her accent, but she was completely understandable. She speaks Cantonese and English fluently. Get over yourself if you think her being bilingual makes her a lesser person than you. She knows the subject well and is a great teacher. She pokes fun at the class, but she is just joking.
                
                   Very helpful, and nice. Tries hard to help you understand.
                
                   defently not very nice teacher..can be nice sometimes but is very straight forward with your grade..doesnt really like to give you breaks..cant really speak good english either..wouldnt recommend takin her if you want the easy way out of math..!!!
                
                   I have to admit I had a crush on her.  Her class is perfect for people who don't know about Computers, however us advanced computers people might find the class boring.  As for preparing you for bring technology into the classroom, she owns up that for sure.  Excellent class if you want to stay ahead of the old teachers who don't know computers.
                
                   Her class was good to help me learn more about about computers.  I just had a little trouble with her accent.
                
                   She is very nice and helpful and knows about computers. You learn alot in her class
                
                   Teaching at UAA now. Very hard! Grading is hard, test are long, doesn't do any reviews. Take a different teacher! It doesn't matter if this is the last course you have to take to graduate, do everything possible to stay clear!!!
                
                   Also known as Stabler. Very very hard. Gives a lot of homework (worksheets, word problems, and book problems) everynight. She also makes you write a lot of papers. Tests are a little overwhelming..very long. Tough grader.
                
                   Horrible. I hated her. I didn't learn a thing and she made me feel stupid when I asked questions.
                
                   didn't learn anything--complete waste of time.
                
                   I hate math.  But Sasha made this class interesting and as fun as math can be (which is admittedly not very).
                
                   I hate math, but I made an A in this class because Sasha seems to want her students to make good grades.  The tests were 10 question, take home, multiple choice tests.
                
                   Class was sooo very easy. Sasha is very clear and very concise, not to mention the material was a breeze as well. Very young and very laid back. Doesn't believe in keeping the class the whole period, which is goood and bad...
                
                   I hate math but her class was laid back and fun.
                
                   She is very understanding and has a great way of teached to where you can really understand math. She is the best math teacher i have ever had! Gives you LOTS of extra credit if you need it!
                
                   Geeze.... would it have been so hard to actually TEACH the class instead of always bolting off as early as possible&#63; Not all of us are math wizards!! Is willing to help you in her office but what good does that do when you don't even know what to ask&
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Shes an easy teacher.  Wished there were more teachers like her.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great teacher, great sense of humor.  Too much homework for me, but it helps.  She is the most clear math teacher I have ever had.  She is always there to help.  She lets the class out early, that's my favorite part!
                
                   Doesn't teach well according to the way I learn. Very thick accent. Lectures are terrible. Always skips little things that are important.
                
                   Sweet man but barely speaks English. He understands the material on such a high level that he doesn't know how to dumb it down for those of us who don't get along with math. I had to teach myself the material and the tests are hard, and a lot of homework. 
                
                   Great professor! He is one of my favorite professors of all time. He will help you out if you are struggling, all you need to do is go to his office hours. I would recommend taking him. Started off with a 50 in the class but managed to get a 88 in the class.
                
                   Talks VERY low, and looks down when teaching the class. Very hard to understand and worst of all NO textbook all powerpoints that make no sense. TRY AND WORK YOUR WAY AROUND THIS CLASS!
                
                   Dr. Abudiab's class is hard to follow and can be frustrating at times, but it's doable. One group project and only two exams (plus the final) means to be sure you do well, they're weighted pretty heavy.
                
                   He has an accent and he mumbles when he speaks and usually looks at the floor. He does go over examples. He uses an online textbook and personally I didn't like it. He is a helpful person and he does accept late work. He isn't too bad of a teacher.
                
                   Dr. Abudiab is the best math teacher I've ever had. Hes a very soft spoken, hard to hear if not paying attention. He encourages learning the conceptual ideas, then applying them to real world scenarios.
                
                   This is the best Professor I have ever had. Attendance is not mandatory, but he gives you the grade you deserve and attendance is a big part of that. Only reason that I would consider Grad School at TAMUCC is this man. Absolutely loves his job and lives for it. Always on campus, and is extremely friendly.
                
                   AWESOME AWESOME INTELLIGENT MATH PROF. Bent over backwards to make sure you really understand math. Some students are so lazy and judgmental. If you take this class and willing to work you will have tremendous knowledge from him
                
                   THANK YOU. I enjoyed taking your class. Wow this professor is a very smart, nice guy. He will make you feel very comfortable and get your attention to learn REAL MATH. Thanks Dr. Abudiab
                
                   Horrible class. Would have been better off teaching myself. The classes don't make sense and neither does the group "project". The group work doesn't make things any easier either.
                
                   Awesome , way to learn. Love this professor. Can't wait for next upper math. Many got A, most were B, C's. I got C and I know why. Keep up all your hard work Dr. Abudiab. Every time we have a question, has an open door policy. A+++++
                
                   Best Real Math Professor. Choose him to be my advisor. Thanks Dr. Abudiab
                
                   Best Of the Best Over Here At TAMUCC. I Took Dr. Abudiab's All Classes. If You Take Others, You Will Not Learn Real Math. Thanks Dr. Abudiab
                
                   Not really an easy course. Gives extensions on homework. Gives extra credit for attendance.
                
                   I've taken cal 1 before and I would've been maybe a bit confused first coming into this class prior, but he does teach the subject, perhaps a bit quietly, but he is willing to take time after class and help and also his office hours are usually empty, he's not that easy, but, for sure,is not that hard.
                
                   I took him for 1324 and 1325. He's not very helpful, and I learned nothing in the class. The worst part is the group work. He holds review sessions for the test and they do help. Almost everyone who sticks around in the class gets a B.
                
                   Not a good teacher.  If your group is no good your grade will be no good. I had 5 people in my group and me and an asain girl did all the work. Worst teacher in math dep.
                
                   If you take his class, sit up front by the desk, otherwise, you won't be able to hear. Make sure you pick a good group - your entire grade is based off of that.
                
                   He is extremely difficult to take a class with. I had a very hard time understand because his accent is so thick, he speaks very quietly, he never makes eye contact, and his &quot;book&quot; consists of 2 huge PPTs that are long and muddled. My whole group got the same grade, which didn't make sense based on test scores... Do not take him if you can help it.
                
                   Best math prof I've ever had. She welcomes students with her beautiful smile .
                
                   LOTS of homework! Like 20+ questions on each section of the chapter. Hard tests. Sometimes a review, sometimes not. Also alot of quizzes.
                
                   Mrs. Abudiab really cares and does her best to make you learn. Her tests are beyond hard but it prepares you for later courses. Highly recommend. Take her if you can get her. Just study for the tests, because they are really hard.
                
                   She is an awesome Teacher! Great professor and very smart, but very demanding and a challenging course.! Really good at explaining difficult subject matter. Actually one of the best teachers I had there at A&M. Would definitely recommends her!! She will help you out a lot, but you do have a bunch of work and studying to do!
                
                   Wow...Best of the best and thanks for all hours, explanations and help you provided to all of us. Took this class with 2 different prof. and the way Ms. Abudiab teaches is unique. I barely got C, but I learned a lot. A+++++ professor.
                
                   She is the most amazing, most wonderful human being ever! Attendance is mandatory, but go and you will learn a lot. Be honest with her and don't take advantage of her kindness. I have the utmost respect and love for pro. Abudiab. Take her for math 0398, 0399, 1314 and whatever she teaches.. She will bless your life.
                
                   Professor abudiab gives more real-world, helpful examples than any professor I'll probably ever have. She works as a BEE in addition to teaching, and it shows. The only downside is the assignment on the MYLABSPLUS that was set by MATH DEPARTMENT, but if you show up, take the quizzes, and pay attention to what she said is important you'll do fine.
                
                   Excellent mathematics professor; teaches to real world and not to tests or text, loves her teaching, extremely friendly. She has her own style of teaching, welcomes you to reach her all the times. strongly recommended.
                
                   excellent professor! Explains the material in her own way that can be related to the real world. Best math professor that I ever had yet! Has hers own way of teaching that helps students remember the material. Is very understanding and helpful if you have any questions. Also, she has a great sense of humor! Highly recommend!
                
                   SUPER-DUPER PERSON TO TAKE MATH WITH!! HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!!! THANKS AGAIN MRS. ABUDIAB!
                
                   Worst teacher I ever had, we had 40 kids in our class, by the time i dropped the class was down to 21. She makes the most useless references that pertain nothing to algebra. She teaches you a completely different thing from the online course that goes with the class, but expects you to take the courses test. dumb.
                
                   She uses analogies that relate nothing to the subject.Very disorganized. Much to much work at one time. Is not helpful at all. 75% dropped the class.
                
                   i didn't learn anything in her class.
                
                   If you are respectful, pay attention and show up, you will do very well with this professor. Tardiness is not tolerated and attendance is ABSOLUTELY MANDATORY!
                
                   Worst teacher I've had in a long time. She assigns way too much homework and lowers your grade for missing class. Very unorganized and hard to understand. Really don't feel like I learned anything useful from that class.
                
                   worst teacher i ever had, i will never forget her and for the wrong reason
                
                   Do not take her class. She once described the x and y axis as &quot;a growing baby-first you crawl then walk, just like x and y!&quot; She likes to teach based on these kind of analogies. I didn't learn a thing.
                
                   Very unclear communication. Uses analogies for explaining mathematical principals of which are unclear. Talks a lot about nothing during each session. If I didn't pick up a low level math book in the library a before registering, I would be lost in this class. STAY AWAY AT ALL COST.
                
                   some advice, the WORST teacher i have ever had in my life. She stresses you out ALLL year. I took a test to the tutoting center, did the WHOLE thing with them(she said we should take it them) and on only got 72! Shes the hardes grader, even though i was afailing she passed me .IDK how i passed.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Professor Cordova is so patient and her class is easy to understand. She doesn't teach math in a hurry and she takes her time explaining. I loved her!
                
                   Class wasn't very difficult or demanding.  She was easy to follow and was always willing to help.  She teaches at  Del Mar as well and doesn't have office hours here at TAMUCC.  However if you email her she will get back to you in a reasonable amount of time.  I'm pretty bad at math, but managed to get an A in her class.
                
                   Actually horrible. I had him for both business math and gave him a second chance in business calculus. Worst "professor" that I have ever come across. He was very rude, and I later found out that several other people had the same experience.
                
                   Nene is very good at explaining the material. However, if you can't get it down during class the homeworks explain everything really well. A large portion of your grade is online homework and quizzes. So if you just stay on top of that you can get away with a sub-par test (3 including final).
                
                   Nene does have an accent but once you get past that it's all good. He does take attendance and if you skip he won't send the notes that you missed to you. If you email him he is pretty prompt and responds in a timely manner. There are only two test then a final, he will sometimes tell you the type of problems to expect though. Overall good teacher.
                
                   Teaches very FAST. He just throws the information at you and doesn't explain it.  I would not be taking his class if I had a choice, but from what I have heard, he is the worst of the math professors.
                
                   once you get past the accent he is easy to learn from
                
                   He is a great professor & I've taken two of his classes. His lectures are very clear on what is expected on test but you must attend. He does have an accent but its not difficult to understand. Online homework and quizzes help me the most. Group Projects. He allows a page of formulas on test. I did my work and had an A in both classes. 
                
                   He takes attendance everyday. There is homework, quizzes, group projects, two exams and a final. He has a heavy accent, so it is sometimes hard to understand what is going on. Some people, like myself, learn more from the homework assignments than his lectures.
                
                   Heavy Accent. Does not answer questions. Group projects make up most of your grade and the projects directions are unclear. If you get a bad group then you will not do well (groups are assigned by last name). Attend class, he takes attendance every day.
                
                   Their is a lot of online homework and quizzes involved for a big percentage of your grade in this class. If I could have avoided taking his class I would've. He expects a lot from students 
                
                   I took this course online during my summer II session. This course does require alot of work but the work is very do-able. Coulibaly was also very prompt in responding to any questions with problems. Course was challenging but if you keep up with the work, you will be okay.
                
                   This teacher is awful. He is so rude when students ask for help. He never fully answers questions. The main thing that sucks about his class is the final, none of the quetions are the same weight, ie: question 1 is 10 points and question 2 is 2 points. Had all questions been the same weight or CLOSE to the same weight It would have been alot better
                
                   SAVE your self & take this class at community college.class average for test 1 was 54.I was one of the lucky ones to get high 70 on exams,Got C for the class,Many barely made it with 70.Majority got D. 2 projects about loan and business.Hard and Confusing. No bank people ever uses them to compute bank info.Has an accent,teaches FAST,laughs at kids.
                
                   I do not know why some of the students complained. Nene only required that you work hard, you are a college student, he does not give freebies. I did learn a lot from his classes. Very good professor. If you are lazy and don't study, you will fail his class, that is pretty much most college classes.
                
                   If you are willing to work alone on most items, in which you should and understand everything you should be fine. Only 5 hws,2 projects, and 3 tests including the final. He no longer allows a page of hand written notes on the test! Also no textbook same as 1324, VERY THICK ACCENT!
                
                   I would say Nene is an average professor. If you have a good work ethic you will make at least a B. You need to focus more on the projects as there are questions from the projects that are on the tests. If you're struggling with this class, nene is willing to help you.
                
                   If you are intelligent and have a good work ethic you will make an A. Nene is an amazing professor and only wants to bring the best out of his students. He is very fair only 5 hws,2 projects, and 3 tests including the final. He allows a page of hand written notes on the test! For those who complain of his teaching methods should not be in college.
                
                   The absolute worst professor I have ever had. Nene obviously knows what he is teaching, but he does not understand that he has to actually teach his students for them to learn it. The majority of the class can (and probably will) fail and he will do nothing to help the class succeed or understand the material. I suggest avoiding this "professor"
                
                   Worst teacher ever! The only reason I would go to his class is because he takes attendance and to see what he was attempting to go over in class. I literally had to teach myself the whole way through because he does not know how to teach. DO NOT get this teacher he's inconsiderate, and doesn't care for you whats so ever.
                
                   If you have a hard time understanding math, do not use this professor. He goes through lectures so fast that it is very difficult to keep up with him. The tests are difficult and even though the whole class makes below a 70 he still insists that the test is easy. If I didn't teach myself the material at home, I would not have made it in this class.
                
                   Not helpful what so ever. Didnt explaing anything at all.
                
                   Best professor ever!!!
                
                   Dr. Denny's lectures directly relate to the test. The review are essentially copy and paste of her test with different numbers.  The homework is hand graded so you get direct feedback to see where you need to improve and where you are strong. Would highly recommend Dr. Denny over any other Cal II teacher at A&M Corpus. 
                
                   Neither too easy nor too hard. I consider her difficulty as FAIR. She's better than any other math teacher at TAMUCC. I was retaking Calculus 1 for a better grade this time around and not only is it easier but I have been learning so much more with her. Third test was a take-home. She does test reviews. Always willing to help during office hours.
                
                   Homework is much harder than exam, you won't notice until middle of the semester.She's picky grader so be meticulous.Go to her office for homework help(Don't go to CASA).She'll work out the problems for you.Her reviews are exactly like the exam.The labs are easy but some homework problems from lab are tricky, go see your lab instructor.Easy class.
                
                   She is not the best teacher. Her notes come DIRECTLY from the book without any outside examples, and of course she writes those incomprehensible definitions down. The homework is often 10x harder than the examples & so that brings down your grade, BUT the tests are epically easy and since tests are a major grade, I'd say take her if you must.
                
                   Denny is awesome! I would take her again for any math class. Easy to follow, available outside the class.
                
                   She's an all right teacher. I found her definitions to be somewhat confusing (especially with the more complex material) but she is EXCELLENT with giving examples and explaining them. The tests are fair and quite easy. I'm gonna take her again for Calculus 3!
                
                   She isn't bad. Calculus is a hard subject to teach in itself, so you will have to do out of class work and studying.  Her homework isn't difficult and her tests are almost verbatim of the homework.  If you give effort, you should pass the class.
                
                   She doesnt put anything into a way that you can understand. I had to buy books outside to learn what I was doing. Even if you go to her outside of class she still seems to have a hard time helping you understand. I would look at other teachers for Calculus 1.
                
                   She isnt a very good teacher (multiple times she went to the board to work a problem and she couldnt solve it. But it is pretty easy to get a good grade. But you will end up teaching yourself
                
                   I took Math Modeling with her. She is a nice teacher gives little homework and a homework is due once a week. Her test are basically the homework put together. She doesnt teach in class very well buit if you go to her outside of class she is helpuful. I would take her again jsut because of her grading being easy.
                
                   No class control so if you're in a lecture hall, sit up front if you want to be able to hear.  Other than that, he explains things pretty well and grades easy -- nice guy!
                
                   An easy professor just really boring to listen to in lecture.  Too soft spoken to get the attention of the class and keep control.  Pretty easy on grading and tells you exactly what's going to be on the tests, lets you use a cheat sheet also.
                
                   Good guy, knows what he is talking about. He can be sarcastic but I thought he was interesting. He is kinda hard to understand at first but the class is very easy.
                
                   Great guy, but doesn't know how to teach. Although he did do a major curve by letting our class retake the first two exams. He made it easier and it was open notes, books etc.  I got a B in the class, but I didn't learn nothing at all. Regardless any of the Stats teachers here will be hard to understand.
                
                   Bad professor, he knows his sfuff, but doesn't know how to teach. This semester he's teaching interm. alg., which he refers to as &quot;kindergarden algebra,&quot; as if its an inconvenience. Dont take his class.
                
                   Accent was not to much an issue, but I don't think he wanted to be teaching int-alg and would rather have been elsewhere.  Nice guy, but really needed to focus on how to teach students.
                
                   Professor Garcia was horrible. Stats is a hard concept and his teaching makes it all the worse. The accent is hard to get around the first day but after that it doesn't really factor in. He obviously knows the material but he has no idea how to teach it and he is completely useless in helping out with questions. I would not recommend him at all.
                
                   He is very interested in his teaching and knows his stuff but his accent and the language barrier makes it very hard to understand the concepts sometimes and he can rarely answer our questions. The class itself is not that difficult if you dont mind learning it yourself through the online homework but the lecture is pretty boring
                
                   Took him for remedial algebra Spring 2010... its a computer course! I was so scarred in the begining, but then it turned out pretty easy! I passed and would not mind taking him again!
                
                   excellent teacher very helpful
                
                   Best math teacher I've ever had in college! The tests are exactly what they look like in the reviews. And you can do your homework online, which is nice. I didn't bought the book, and I managed to get an A!
                
                   Really nice and is willing to work with you. He says attendance is mandatory, but doesn't seem to care.
                
                   He is a great teacher :) Easy to pass as long as you do the work and put the hours in on Aleks
                
                   Amazing math teacher, I want him to teach more than math so I can try him out elsewhere.  Great guy, very approachable.  Need a math class&#63;  Try to take one he is teaching, you won't regret it.
                
                   Such a great professor!!!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This class used ALEKS, an online program.  There was no book, it was self paced, and all you had to do was put in your hours online.  There were deadlines, for the midterm and final.  He even set up helpful &quot;pre-quizes&quot; before the midterm and final, to make sure you knew what to really study before the exam.  Did I mention, there's no book&#63;
                
                   Great professor! Would take him again for another class. Absolutely no homework. Tests are what is expected and easy if you studied before the tests.
                
                   Ms. K is not the type to "spoon feed"you. Her notes cover the material but she keeps her in class examples to a minimum.  The reason for this is because she assigns online homework, which is very beneficial. The online homework is time consuming, but allows you to better understand the material. I advise you to  visit CASA and participate in class!
                
                   A 51 question exam review while doing homework is  a bit staggering, I did not have time for both. and Test are much harder than the reviews. No formula sheets, no notes, or fancy calculators. Lots of homework, so might want to consider someone else if you have responsibilities at home like watch a child ect ect.
                
                   Prepare to work! Assigns a lot of online homework in which are time consuming but are easy A's. You better show up to class because she does give a lot of notes in class. She's helpful if you talk to her in her office hours. Beware my word, PREPARE to WORK and SHOW up to CLASS!
                
                   Easiest class you can ever take, btw I am a math guru so don't take my word for it.
                
                   Ms. K is an extremely helpful teacher. She truly does want all of her students to succeed. She is always more than willing to help with the assignments. She does not like calculators!! Attendance is mandatory for her class. She does assign quite a bit of homework, I would recommend going to CASA. If you go to CASA she gives extra points on tests.
                
                   She is not the easiest teacher but with you can do it.Also with a little self teaching and going to the casa center will help you too.If you are having any problems email her or talk to her after class she wants you to do well even though sometimes you might think other wise.She also says "you should have learned this in high school"
                
                   So dreamy! I will miss him ;)
                
                   Not a very easy class but Dr. Lyons does a very good job presenting the material and he is very helpful if you need any help. I would highly recommend him to any student taking this class.
                
                   He is really nice, and his calculus 1 tests are extremely easy.
                
                   He may not be the best teacher in the world, but he seems to care about his students enough to make him a good one. He has always been very polite and is generally willing to slow down for harder topics. He takes his time to work with students and is fairly lenient when it comes to homework. If you actually try in his class you will likely succee
                
                   I thought he was a good profesor. It is a hard class so you will be challenged, however if you did not understand something, you could always go ask him about it during his office hours. I would take this proffesor again or recomend him to someone else.
                
                   He is an amazing teacher and I want to take more classes from him!! And he's hot so it makes it that much more interesting!
                
                   He is pretty awesome and very willing to help
                
                   To poster below: you dunno what it's like to have Linear Algebra. Homework is optional, NOT online. There are weekly quizzes. I only learned when he gave solutions for tests; it would be nice to learn BEFORE exams. Lyons was rude when I emailed him about my grade. Penalties for missing class, but showing up and trying doesn't add to the grade. Ugh!
                
                   Awful instructor. His lectures are don't help. I only learned from him when he gave solutions over test afterwards; it would be nice to learn BEFORE the test. The labs are vague and he barely helps. He was rude to me when I emailed him about my grade. You will be penalized for missing class but hardly acknowledged for showing up and trying. AVOID!
                
                   Obviously these reviews come from people who greatly struggled in the class. Yes, the tests are hard but if you complete the homework it is impossible to fail his class. You can do each problem until you get it correct.Such an easy 100.There are quizzes every week which boost your grade. even if you do not get the answers right, he will give partia
                
                   Horrible teacher. Did not give many examples at all, expected you to figure everything out and the labs were ridiculous. He didn't explain them before hand and expected you to figure it out on your own. Even if you go to his office he doesn't explain it much better. Test are nothing like notes/reviews.
                
                   His notes are pretty much useless! The labs are ridiculously stupid. He always threw us in the lab and was just like here do the lab, and he was no help at all. He pretty much told us to figure it out. He didn't really give feedback, if he did it was useless. Tests are nothing like his notes! He is NOT a good teacher.
                
                   DON'T TAKE HIM!!!  He is horrible.  His tests are killer and ridiculous.  He teaches one thing in class and then puts something totally different on the test.  He never gives extra credit and never curves grades.  DON'T TAKE HIM UNLESS YOU DON'T CARE ABOUT YOUR GPA!!!
                
                   DON'T TAKE HIM.  He is very hard.  His exams are extremely hard and he puts questions no one has ever seen.  He rushed through with the material.  He doesn't help much and he tells you go get a tutor instead.  He is horrible and only take him if you don't care about your GPA!
                
                   He is a horrible professor!!! His tests are horrible.  He gives no curves at all. He teaches very fast and is not helpful at all.  Don't take him.  I think since he is new he is trying to prove something.  DON'T TAKE HIM.
                
                   He is a very challenging proffesor that goes over the material but when it comes to the testing part, its a different story. You should at least put in 20 hours a week of study time. Very Tough Class!
                
                   This professor is actually very good, especially for people like me, who have trouble understanding concepts and keeping up with the lecture. As long as you actually apply yourself and study before exams, this class is a breeze. There is online homework with MyLabsPlus/MyMathLabs, and it?s not too bad. It actually helps me learn the material.
                
                   very much enjoyed his class relative to other math courses, was very helpful with questions, has a simple quiz every other day, the only hard part was the gateway derivative tests around the end
                
                   I found her to be a tough cookie. She can be rude at times and she can be condescending toward students BUT she is willing to help students if they don't understand the material. Relies heavily on mymathlab, which is a huge shame. I probably wouldn't take her again.
                
                   If you don't understand something, she will explain it but with attitude. She expects you to know Math from Freshman year HS and to be able to understand it the first time. If you don't do good on the tests she gets mad at the class for not doing better. LOTS of mymathlab online. I only got the grade I did because of online work.
                
                   She was very helpful and if you didn't understand it, she made sure you did. A lot of mathlab homework online, but her tests are so easy. I wish I could have had her for all my math courses.
                
                   His lectures are boring.  Every class meeting you have to get in a group do discuss. He is very rude when you answer a question. It's like only he knows the correct answer. For the exams 1 part is an essay, and other is multiply choice. Make sure to do the review. Essay as long as you do it he gives you 100. 
                
                   I do not recommend this professor to anyone.  He is terrible and expects you to teach yourself the material.  Spends the majority of class time berating the class for not knowing the information and stating repeatedly that he does not have time to teach all of the material. This professor is TERRIBLE!
                
                   he is willing to help.
                
                   Stickler in grading.  Final grade based mostly on exams.  Gives no homework, but you have to do your own homework to know what you are doing.  Not the easiest in terms of getting help from.  Last two tests online.
                
                   He can be very hard to understand at times. He's not very understanding if you have to miss or could not read, in fact he gets angry and berates the class. He expects you to teach yourself the chapter and understand it fully prior to coming to class. His tests are usually quite hard too. I would not recommend him.
                
                   Great professor, a bit hard to understand at times, but very smart and understanding.  He usually gives 4-5 tests a semester and then drops the lowest.  If you can keep up with the work, he's a great professor.
                
                   Awesome class! Mr. P is super helpful and willing to work with you on raising your grade. If you're not understanding a section, he slows the class down until every gets it. I actually passed math!
                
                   Gives lots of practice test leading up to the test which is very help full because you know exactly what will be on the the test, so no surprises.  Gives partial credit when grading which is great. He is pretty fun in class likes to tell stories, but still teaches you very well.
                
                   Gives a 100 for quiz grade just for showing up, so show up. can use note cards on test. good stories and he's helpful. teaches the material clearly.
                
                   Gives a lot of extra practice problems, highly recommended that you do it. Lets you have a notecard on exams so you don't have to memorize everything. Very clear, goes through new material fast so the week before a midterm is spent reviewing.  Work hard, practice as many problems as you can, and do his reviews, and you should ace his class.
                
                   Easy. Note card for tests. 1 page of homework a week. Tells you exactly what will be on quizzes and tests. Neither are hard. Would take again and again. 
                
                   Awesome Prof.  If you do the assignments your guaranteed an A.  He's funny too, just ask him about how much he likes baseball.
                
                   I'm not a math person but did really well by going to si sessions and always went to his office hours if I had a question. He is super helpful and notes and lectures are easy to understand. I'm glad I took his class. I would recommend his class to everyone.
                
                   I'm not a math person at all. He makes the lectures very clear and provides very good notes. Exams are not so easy, but it's manageable to do. Go to office hours for help if you don't get things.
                
                   Great professor. Material was somewhat difficult but he was very helpful. Really wants his students to succeed in his class.
                
                   I had to take 3342 stats and I hated it!! This professor is so helpful. He really went out of his way to help me. He does not anyone to fail this class, That being said the material IS VERY HARD. I did good in cal but stats is just another ball game. Do all the HW and practice HW before exams. Got a C and struggled
                
                   Awesome teacher! Tries to make the lectures fun and usually succeeds, while still teaching you a lot. His tests aren't overly easy but are pretty manageable if you have been going to class.
                
                   He's a great instuctor. Makes jokes and trys to keep material easy to understand. The class has a slow pace but it's easy to make a good grade.I wish he taught more classes that I need!
                
                   Awesome teacher really willing to help you. If taking applied stats first test is hard next two are easy. Will drop a test and average test with finals. Not hard to get a B or A
                
                   Best teacher I've ever had!! He makes jokes in class and you can use old tests and all of your notes on the tests. Tests are pretty easy and straight forward. TAKE HIS CLASS!
                
                   He's the best math teacher I've ever had. He wants everybody to get an A. He tries to remove as much Calculus as he can from the course. The only reason somebody would fail is if they got too distracted by his beard!
                
                   Great Teacher! he dumbs it down as much as possible and if you dont understand then ask and he dumbs it down some more. DEF not a a math person but I got an A, just do the hw and quizzes online. Tests are open notes. and come from the notes. VERY helpful outside of class.and he has an awesome beard.
                
                   pretty good teacher, the material is tough.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I hate math but I loved this class! He is really funny if you like that dry humor. He is very understanding and very helpful!
                
                   I hate math, but somehow I passed this class. Dr. S-B always made time to talk to us and help us with homework questions.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Go To The TLC!
                
                   Very helpful and clear in what he did and said..I think this was the first math class that was actually intersting and I could see a real use for
                
                   HE is there to help you. one of the few teachers that will do what it takes to pass you
                
                   he is a very helpful teacher!
                
                   This professor was clear during lectures but rarely made time out of class to help students who needed a better understanding of material. Also, if you miss a class for an emergency or any other reason recognized by the school as an excused absence, this professor won't help you to catch up nor work with you to make up missed assignments.
                
                   If you do your homework and go to class you should be fine, his test are pretty hard but if you study and go to SI sessions you will pass. He is really sweet and if you ever need help you can ask him. 
                
                   Show up to class, EVERY CLASS, or you can basically kiss away passing.   Dr. Tintera is an EXTREMELY GREAT PROFESSOR. Do your online homework and quizzes on time and you should get A's, show up to lab and you should get an A, and lastly, pay attention, ask questions, and you should be okay!
                
                   Dr. Tintera is really sweet. He's kinda awkward but is extremely insightful and willing to help if you just ask. I spent a lot of time in his office basically getting tutored by him and he never complained or pushed me aside. His class is easy, just try! He wants you to actually understand math, so thats the only "challenge" you'll encounter.
                
                   Good professor and person, but his cal 1 class is hard! His tests are ridiculous! He is very approachable so that's good and he's nice, but the tests... That's the only problem I had with him.
                
                   His class is so easy, he is really good with helping his students. He cares about his students and is very nice. The best class ever if you have a Tetrad N class. He should not be part of that teaching group just saying. Anyway overall AWESOME teacher!!
                
                   aww he was a really good math teacher.. the best I have ever had yay!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   great teacher,  explains every step, puts notes online, lets you take a sheet of notes for the test, will even give you extra time to do quizzes if you missed it. 1st reading quiz was open for like 4 weeks.
                
                   Easy class, can be a bit boring at times, but then again I don't like math. Homework is relatively easy, you get bonus for working in groups.  Tests are easy.
                
                   Dr. Tintera was a good professor and the tests were very straight forward. We were allowed to use a full sheet of paper for each test and he would give very detailed reviews. It was an easy test.
                
                   I spent the whole semester in the TLC...he is very boring and is good at putting the class to sleep. However, he does allow group work for the homework.
                
                   He is a good teacher.  Not that much homework, once a week only. If you do your homework and attend most of the classes, tests are not hard.
                
                   She is really funny, very knowledgable and will stay late to help any student of hers, I retook this class as a senior with Dr. Tintera since my previous worthless professor Nene Coulibaly was terrible in every way. As a freshman I received a D so I retook it with Dr. Tintera and did really well. One of the best out there.
                
                   The best professor on the TAMU-CC campus! She will help you to understand the concept of the material and wants you to come to her if you need help! She really cares about her students and their education. Take Dr. Tintera if you have the chance.
                
                   Really good! She explains stuff the standard way, then she'll show you the easy way. No homework
                
                   Dr. Tintera is honestly the best professor I've had, she will work with you to make sure you fully understand concepts. She's always in her office ready and enthusiastic to help you. On exams she test you on your knowledge of the concepts so show her what you know. When you are her student, you are not a number she will care about you.
                
                   She's a good teacher who works with the student to help them improve in class. She doesn't go too fast over the course work and she gives plenty of examples every time new material is covered. Would definitely recommend taking her class!
                
                   I took Dr. Tintera for the Maymester. She is awesome! She makes math understandable even if formerly seemed like hieroglyphics. She's super nice, funny, and sarcastic, and makes class really fun. I recommend taking her. The Maymester was definitely one of the best scheduling decisions I've ever made! 4 hours/day of math for two weeks was worth it.
                
                   The first test is kind of a shock. Most of the lowest grades were on that test. However, she did let you replace it with test #3. I took her during Maymester, and it was the best decision. She wants to get through it and she helps it go by way fast. TAKE HER IN MAYMNESTER!!
                
                   Awesome teacher, very helpful, and very hard to fail this class if you attend class!!  She will always make you laugh during class!! HIGHLY RECOMMEND!! I would take all classes she taught!
                
                   I guess she didn't like me very much because I can't believe these reviews! Never answered my emails, never provided info about tutoring sessions, never in her office hours, & to add insult to injury she was condescending towards me even though I attended every single one of her lectures and asked her how I could do better in her course. Stay away.
                
                   AWESOME Teacher. She explains everything so perfectly. Her students want to come to class because they know that she will help them to succeed. Dr. Tintera is the BOMB. If you choose any other professor, you're screwed. She also teaches higher level math.... :) Love you Dr. T
                
                   Shes an awesome teacher! She knows what shes talking about and gets the class involved by having them do assignments on the board. Also she gives study guides that are really helpful for the test.
                
                   Awesome Instructor! I am retaking algebra my senior year after my first instructor was not so great. I wish I took her freshman year! Makes learning fun and easy! Highly Recommended!
                
                   LOVE HER! she has been the best Math teacher I've had. It's impossible to fail if you attend class, she is super funny and goes straight to the point and she goes by fast. her tests are exactly what she teaches, you will need the book, assigns Homework but it's simple it you pay attention.
                
                   SHE'S THE BEST! After avoiding any course having to do with math...I've really become excited to progress to higher level courses because of Tintera. She teaches the easy way around things and never lays those &quot;trick&quot; questions on you. Everything you need to know she is very upfront about.
                
                   SHE'S HILARIOUS! Laugh out loud fun, and it's MATH!! helpful, friendly, utilizes study guides and daily assignments for extra pts. ON YOUR TESTS! a lot. Made learning EASY. There is a math lab open weekdays and sundays, take advantage if you need help! they are great, she is great, take her!!
                
                   I took College Algebra and Business Calculus with her. Calculus was far harder, but still much better than it would have been with someone else. Algebra was a breeze. She's so great, funny, and helpful. She has many ways to try to boost your grade and she reviews everything in class. Very great teacher!
                
                   By far the BEST teacher i have had, if you don't get math very well this is the teacher you want to go too. She's helpful, has easy reviews, and if you can work out her reviews, your set for her tests. Make sure you go to class cause she explains EVERYTHING you need for her tests. Overall Awesome Math teacher and would recommend her to everyoneee.
                
                   She is the most amazing math teacher I have ever had. I would say that anyone who gets the chance to take her will be happy they did.
                
                   She's the most easiest professor there is in TAMUCC. She's very old fashioned so you'll be doing everything by hand. DON&quot;T buy the book, it's too expensive and she's not going to use it at all.  I recommend this professor to every student that's not good in math.
                
                   Shes a great teacher, shes old fashioned and does everything by hand. She also teaches you shortcuts. If you are not very good with math i def recomend you take her over a computer program.
                
                   Course Content: decimals, percent, ratios & proportions, EXAM 1, statistics, probability, FINAL EXAM. Must attend Family Math Night (or alternate assignment), create group poster, present activity with poster, and write individual paper. I'm getting a BSIS in Math 4-8 and this class is basically a review of 4th-5th  grade math; very easy.
                
                   Her class was really easy, however I didn't learn very much about how to teach math. I felt like it was a review of 5th grade math rather than a class teaching me how to teach math.
                
                   She really helps alot, get ready to teach urself though. Most people who have a math def. will have problems here. Although no fault of hers the material is hard. I got a DIP for the summer because no way I had discipline to keep up. Makes u feel not like a tard explains very well tutors in class were great in helping. Only thing it is self taught!
                
                   Easiest Class ever! Show up get an easy grade for the day, do your homework, tests are like homework assignments, she makes Math (algebra) easy easy easy!
                
                   
                
                   She's the best teacher on campus
                
                   He is a wonderful professor. His accent is thick, but he is very eager to help you if you reach out to him or visit his office. I highly recommend him for Stats, and that if you take his class you introduce yourself and reach out if you have any problem at all understanding the subject.
                
                   Excellent trig teacher. The first two comments are from  students in the class who were consistently rude and disuptive in class. Since they had to be admonished for their behavior they spent most of their time spreading gossip about the teacher and making threats to him. Despite all this, Dr. V maintained his professionism, teaching a good class.
                
                   He's unprofessional, impolite, belittling, disorganized, deceitful, and immature. If you have a choice TAMUCC Students, try to avoid this teacher. He is constantly corrected for errors and did not cover the material in the syllabus. I DO NOT recommend this teacher.
                
                   the worst teacher ever....No one should ever have to take his class it is a joke
                
                   In addition to acting in an extremely unprofessional manner, Dr. V is never prepared for his classes, does not follow his syllabus, and has no place teaching even something as simple as remedial algebra. He is rude to the students he does not like and allows his personal bias to get in the way. I do NOT recommend him as a teacher.
                
                   Excellent professor.  Helps students at all times try to understand the material.  His curves on tests is excellent and extremely fair.  Always well prepared for his lectures.  Two early ratings are irrelevant and spiteful.  They do not truly convey the interest Dr. V has for his students.
                
                   Very smart professor. However, in many new material he ran straight through the problems without any explanation. Attendance is not reguired but useful and the only way to understand the class thoroughly.  Ask questions, at many times, a student had to correct him. Lots of curves:)
                
                   Dr. Valadez is one of the best teachers of math that I have met. His presentations are well organized and understandable. Dr. Valadez always asked if anyone had any questions during class. He was also available during office hours. When I went to see him he spent a great deal of time explaining a concept I didn't quite understand.
                
                   Dr. V is a very caring, interesting professor who will help those who need it and who show interest and enthusiasm.  Several students had so-so attendance and because of all the material covered every day, always seemed confused.  If we were to attend all the classes, we would learn a lot more and have a better idea of his exams.
                
                   Worst Teacher Ever... very hard to understand &quot;His&quot; methods. wasn't by the book at all!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I'm pretty sure I hate this class.  &quot;Away at camp&quot; is not the nicest tomato on the vine--and he reminds me of Norman from Seinfeld....I don't understand his grading, most of the time, and I'm a careful kid.  If you've gotta have him, heaven help you.  And his jokes stink.
                
                   He is the worst teacher I have ever had in my entire career as a student. He is unclear, rude, obnoxious,and unhelpful. He grades unreasonably, and even when I stay after class to seek help, I still come out with a terrible grade, and I'm a 'A' student otherwise. Basically, this guy sucks big time.
                
                   THICK ACCENT but who cares, all you do is copy her excel and thats it! no book required she has online asgn. but all you do is plug in the numbers from the problem in the excel you copy from her. the test are a couple questions from each asgn. so easy you get a cheat sheet to use on ur test too. really laidback 2 group projects again easy. A++
                
                   She does have a thick accent, but the class is pretty easy. I'm taking business math and she just types the problems into Excel and we copy her. The homework/quizzes are easy, basically just copying and pasting. The tests and projects are exactly the same. As long as you go and copy her, you will get an A, no problem. She's very nice and helpful.
                
                   I have taken two discrete math classes and it makes her material seem weak.  The class should be conducted on the chalk board instead of the computer and we should have a book in front of us.  Typing in what she types takes up all the time.  Her accent is a little frustrating. All of this causes me to get lost despite knowing the material already.
                
                   Class seems harder than what it really is. She's approachable but might be hard to understand because of deep accent. You get to use notes during the tests so that's a plus. I suggest you visit her during her office hours if you get confused, she'll help. She's a very nice lady.
                
                   This is a pretty easy class. The tests are just like the homework and you get to use your notes, so as long as you do the homework you should make an A.
                
                   She's alright. All the work you do is on the computer so, you can do the problems over and over until you get it right. You have to go to class every day though because she deducts points off of your grade if you miss.
                
                   Good teacher, not to clear because of accent but she will help you if you ask for her to.
                
                   I took his Linear Algebra class. He was sometimes hard to understand as he does have an accent and he tends to mumble.  Otherwise, I think he was a good teacher.  He always answered questions to the best of his ability. He doesn't give a review for exams, but he gives you examples from the book of the type of questions will be on the exam.
                
                   Nice guy. Funny. Great teaching style; wrote on an iPad that projected onto the wall. Real clear. I would take another class with him.
                
                   One of the worst professors I have ever had. He would mutter in front of the class and never took the time to make sure everyone understood.  He would also go on bouts of rage blaming the class for bad test averages and a homework system we had no control of. He never followed his syllabus and make up things all semester long.
                
                   Very good professor. Would take him again. Always willing to help. People who complain about this course did bad because they were lazy. If you work hard in this class it is an easy A.
                
                   Professor was unorganized and was unable to convey concepts in a manner that students could learn. Blamed the class for low grades on exams. He had no time management skills and did not follow his own sylabus. Do yourself a favor and do not take this professor.
                
                   This class was not so hard as long as you did homework, read your books. He was working so hard. He tried to make things better. There are always A's and F's in every class. It depends on your own work.
                
                   He never ceased to amaze me in his incompetence.When lecturing, he muttered incoherently  in front of the class, and when students asked a question, he never seemed to be able to answer it in a way that could be understood.He is immature and not good with people.He is a horrible at communication, which his accent doesn'thelp.Don'tTakeThisProfessor.
                
                   Not very helpful when it comes to learning material. Tends to change problems multiple times over the course of one example, making it hard to follow. The only grades in the class come from quizzes so its an easy A
                
                   He does know his stuff. He can struggle with graphs, so if that's how you learn, you will have to stop him and make him take the time to do them.  His handwriting is pretty bad on the board, and worse on paper.  Tends to get confused at times.  He is nice, and is good about letting you ask questions until you get it, though he does give you a look.
                
                   He is the math lab teacher and he obviously knows his stuff. He's a nice guy and is absolutely willing to help you in anyway he can. Every lab is a quiz, but he works out an example of every problem and leaves the note on the board to use for the quizzes.
                
                   no bueno. this guy knows his stuff but isn't the best teacher. Yi is a lot easier to understand and follow in class.
                
                   Very nice and helpful professor.  Notes are very clear and quizes are pretty straight forward.
                
                   If you take notes from the examples, there is no way you can fail.  Very clear.  This professor knows his field! A+
                
                   His lectures were sooo confusing! I had to retake his Algebra course with another professor. He is VERY smart but it doesnt come out clear when he tries to teach it. Nice guy though.
                
                   This guy is awesome, he does the best to help you out, very clear notes, if you want to learn math, take gracia!
                
                   GREAT IF YOU REALLY WANT TO LEARN, LAB IS PRETTY STRAIGHT FORWARD. HE LOVES TO HELP AS WELL!
                
                   if you ask him any questions he will look at you like you are a complete dumbass.
                
                   his class was a waste of time. i learned nothing from him
                
                   helps you understand the very basic concepts that you learn in class, but if you already know them, this class is of no help. the daily quizes are very easy, i made 4 or 5 out of 5 everytime.
                
                   Dr. Goodson's Math 141 class was great. You can get a relatively easy A if you do all of the homework, and pay attention in class. I highly recommend Dr. G! 
                
                   This class is really easy; if you pay attention, do well on his tests, and do the homework. Tests are somewhat easy, and there are not that many of them so you have to do well on them. Gives out homework everyday. Every once and a while he will get extra credit. He is a little weird. 
                
                   Dr. Goodson is the best professor that I have had at TAMUG.  His lectures are clear and he lets you know what he expects on the test.  His tests match what is on the homework, so do the homework.  If you go to his office hours he will be there for you to answer any questions that you have.  He goes over homework questions during lab time too.
                
                   Homework essential to be prepared for test and easy grade booster. He will work with you just don't be lazy. A little off-topic sometimes but also a really relaxed and non-stressful class. Barely missed points on the last three tests once I did the homework. 
                
                   Homework is a 100% as long as you do it. partial credit is given on tests. Sometimes in his lectures he will over complicate things or leave something out but he is always willing to help go to his office hours if your having trouble. Understanding the homework is the key to doing well on the tests.
                
                   You don't need to do homework but it is extremely helpful for practice and understanding. You get a note card of help for tests, but it is a little tough.
                
                   I took his class for Math 141 and 142. Great professor! He has a different teaching style, but if you get it, then you are golden. He lets you use a notecard on all your exams and he is very fair in grading. Really enjoyed his class.
                
                   Made an A, listen to him and let him teach and it will pay off. Never did one homework, but study the pre tests. They are just like the real things with different numbers.
                
                   He's a nice guy and never looked at our homework in Math 151. Do the practice tests because he uses the same questions on his real tests. You can coast through this class and get a B or C but an A is also very possible if you put in some effort.
                
                   Its engineering math, what do you expect. hard right&#63; well he is the best at tamug! He gives you a notecard to write all the info you want front and back! also he gives you a pre-test! SAME MATERIAL so do it, didn't ever do homework, but its recommended...other loves to talk and don't talk while he is talking pay attention and you will do fine
                
                   Cong Kang is a great professor. He has an accent but after awhile you get used to it. He gives pre-tests before all his test and also lets you use a note card so his tests aren't impossible. You should be able to pass the class if you just show up to every class. For those who are already good at math, this class should be an easy A.
                
                   He has an accent, but is very nice. hates when people talk in his class during his lecture and prefers to answer questions after class. He gives hw but does not grade it. he has one open note quiz every week and gives you a similar pre-test for each test. . He lets u use a notecard,front and back for each test. TAKE HIM!! IT TAKES WORK FOR U 2 FAIL
                
                   He is hard to understand first, but if you pay attention and sit up front. He is extremely helpful... especially if you go to his office hours. If you rework all the quizzes and the pretest, his tests are very easy and you will ace them but you have to do the hw. The hw isn't graded but i f u don't u won't pass. He is funny too lols
                
                   can't really understand him at first but you will eventually
                
                   he's pretty well
                
                   he's nice when you get to know him
                
                   He was a very good prof and would go all the way back to algebra to help you understand. If you can take him
                
                   Great Prof. As long as you show interest in math, he will do everything he can to help you excel in the subject. Most of the students who did poorly in the two classes I had with Kang were lazy whiny babies.
                
                   He has a very slow way of teaching. I become bored in class and sometimes sleep. Teaching style is easy to understand though. I wish he would go faster though. If you ask a question, he will go overboard with it and answer more than you want. He will see you after class if you need. If you like slow teaching, he is for you.
                
                   I can't understand him at all. Avoid him.
                
                   Yes he has an accent; but he goes slow so it's not hard to understand. If you pay attention in class he explains everything very clearly; right down to the basics to make sure that everyone can follow. If you don't, you aren't paying attention, and it's your own fault since you can visit him outside of class and he's awesome then.
                
                   Extremely hard to understand through his accent. He uses unique ways to make you learn certain concepts but you must constantly study the book to have any idea of what is going on in the class. Very very very boring lecture.
                
                   Very hard to understand. I just had him during the hurricane and thank god the remaining class was taught online. His lectures are hard to follow but on the plus side his tests are straight from the material
                
                   Professor is terrible. You can't understand him and he is completely intollerable towards students with questions. He would rather embarass the students that have questions than actually consider his questions are confusing. Avoid at all costs.
                
                   Hes really hard to follow in class but if you visit him during his office hours he makes a lot more sense.
                
                   One of the best and clearest instructors. Makes you work hard but you learn a lot. Absolutely the best math teacher I ever had.
                
                   We started the class with 23 people, by the first test we had six people. You have to go to class to turn in homework, which is a test grade. He is a super confusing teacher and the worst lecturer I've ever seen. Study the pre-test inside and out and you should get a B. I would take someone else if possible though.
                
                   A very poor teacher overall. I'm a decent math student and so were many of my class mates, but he would go off on rants and lose everyone. A very intelligent man, but just has a hard time teaching. Turn in homework's and study the pretests and he's an easy B.
                
                   Very Good teacher. His explanations are clear and he is very helpful. However, he makes you work hard for your grade.
                
                   was condescending to american education system and kept stating that russia has better students. not friendly prof. not friendly to other professors in his department.
                
                   A very good teacher. Makes math easy to follow. A lot of hard work required, but it is definitely worth it. I have learned more in this class than in all math courses before, combined.  Thanks!
                
                   A very brilliant teacher. Makes math easy to follow. A lot of hard work required, but it is definitely worth it. I have learned more in this class than in all math courses before, combined.
                
                   Not the best at explaining things, but his tests are very similar to his reviews. If you can teach it to yourself you'll make an A. Hands down. Only thing I didn't like was homework was due every class period. Ain't NOBODY got time fo dat!
                
                   The Best Professor I ever had. Excellent explanations and you really get satisfaction from understanding hard material
                
                   He accused me of cheating and made me retake a test. If I didn't make a 100% on the new test I would get a 0 as a test grade. I did not cheat and he couldn't prove that I did. Lucky for me I did well in the math Olympics so he corrected my test grade. If you aren't a math person he will tell you that you are going to fail.
                
                   Excellent teacher  the best I ever had in math. Requires hard work, but you get satisfaction if you learn a lot aws I did.
                
                   Excellent teacher and you learn a lot.. Will be the right teacher for you if you study hard. However, if you want to take it easy this isn't the right prof.
                
                   If you are already great at math and can teach yourself, then take him in a heartbeat. If you need someone to explain and TEACH you, because you aren't a &quot;math&quot; person - he's just not right for the job. He gives pretest just like his test, and that's the only reason ppl pass.
                
                   Tests are EXACTLY like pretests. very brilliant professor, goes into a lot of detail during lectures but is very helpful. good teacher
                
                   I recommend this course. I came with little math background but was able to learn because he gives you an extra chance every time to make up the test. If you don't study hard this is wrong instructor.
                
                   enjoyed the course. He is very easy to follow if you study the book.
                
                   I have learned a lot in his class. He was very helpful at his office. I highly recommend this class.
                
                   This is the best teacher I ever had. I really love math as a result of this course (MATH 151) He is excellent!!
                
                   While he isn't the greatest teacher, he is really easy. His exams are EXACTLY like his pretests, just the numbers are different. I didn't bother going to class. I'd just go a little early to turn in the homework. Go to all the labs and you'll easily have an A. Also, the solutions manual is your best friend for the homework.
                
                   He's rude and doesn't know how to explain things
                
                   Personally, I could not understand anything she said except for when she pronounced words very slowly. This alone made the class very hard for me. Math has never been a good subject for me. I need a really good teacher. However, she does let you use a notecard on the test. She added points to my average at the end of the semester and saved my grade
                
                   She is a great professor. English was not her first language so she does have a thick accent but her handwriting is amazing and she writes everything she says so while in class it is not a problem. She gives random quizzes in classes that you work with people on that are easy points that really help. She does't give finals either.
                
                   If you go to class you will get an A. She is very nice, but can be difficult to understand. Id recommend trying to get a seat in the front of the class
                
                   She was a very helpful teacher and would help any student with any question. She talks very quickly so be sure to listen well and pay attention. The class itself is stupidly easy, but the online homework is tedious. Overall, a great professor.
                
                   She is usually late to class, always getting your hopes up that maybe it will be cancelled. she's very sweet and her quizzes are partner, and if you make a mistake, she tells you and you can fix it and get 100%. her tests are simple, as long as you study the material. she does A LOT of notes and examples. Over all, good class.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very difficult to understand, and does not know what she is doing half of the time.
                
                   Most of the quizzes are really easy but are nothing compared to the tests. Everyone in the class fails for a majority of the semester and you're lucky to get it up. I wouldn't have taken the class if I wasn't forced to... She's a good person but clearly needs to improve on her teaching... 
                
                   She gives homework and quizzes over stuff that will never be on the test so you have no way to prepare. She spends more time on easy problems then the problems that will be on the tests. She sometimes gets confused whenever she is explaining material on the board, and her accent can be hard to understand. When you ask for help she is sarcastic.
                
                   Does not provide assistance on problems. Offers tutoring that doesn't prepare you for exams. I cannot understand why A&M would hire such a poor teacher.
                
                   She is a good professor, had us do online homework that brought up low test grades. She gives out extra credit but you have to keep track of it or she will forget to add it to your grade. Once gave extra credo for owing to class because everyone skipped. Very reasonable.
                
                   Her accent takes some getting used to, but she  very eager to help her students. I loved her class.
                
                   I would only recommend this class if it is required for your major and if your GPA is not on the line. Avoid if so. The class average will be low C at best and chances are you will walk away with that grade. Tests are hard and its concepts are barely covered in the HW/lectures. Good person, not a good teacher.
                
                   The material was exceptionally easy on the homework and in the lecture. But the tests werent anything like the lecture and homework. In lecture she would spend 40 minutes explaining something easy and then 10 on something difficult and thats what would end up on the test. Got a 68.55 didnt curve it. Said would give extra credit but never did!
                
                   Very hard to hear cause she doesnt speak loud and it is also hard to understand her so sit very close to the front. Her teaching can get very confusing and sometimes doesnt know what she wrote. she uses the webassign.com site for homework. The homework is kinda easy online but if you dont know how to do it, it will kill you during the test.
                
                   Nice lady, but It is very frustrating that most of what she teaches you does not end up on the tests. She does not even expect you to use a textbook for her class,  If I had not taken pre- cal previously in high school I probably would have failed. I took this as a review course but it really didn't help much, avoid taking if at all possible.
                
                   I took her for Calc I over the summer at Lonestar College (Cyfair). Ms. P is really helpful and nice. I thought she did a really good job of explaining the material while still making sure that we werent bored. Ms. P tries to help her students and adapt to their desires. I came out of the class with a new found interest and respect for calc.
                
                   Very nice woman but not a very good professor. The average in the class was a low C at highest. If you did not take a precalc/trig course that was excellent in high school do not take her class. She will help you but it becomes a problem when the whole class tries to meet with her.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The best math professor I have had while in college. He works through examples very thoroughly and makes sure everyone understands the example before moving on. The regular exams were not too hard, but the final was a killer. Overall, he's a great prof.
                
                   The class was very hard because szucs wanted to help, but lacked the teaching skills. With that being said, Sean Hennigan's tutoring is what saved me in this class. I came out with an A despite not knowing what a derivative was one week before the test. When taking this class find him to help you! It is the best thing you can do for your GPA.
                
                   He obviously is a very intelligent man, but he just doesn't understand that we are not on the same level with math as he is. His tests were almost impossible and asking questions in class was of no help. I had to get a tutor and get with a study group and we all ended up with a C in the class thanks to turning in homework and our good lab grades.
                
                   He means well but his class is extremely boring and lecture felt like a waste of time. The only way to pass is to go to SI
                
                   At first, you think he is a terrible teacher but if you stick it out it gets much better. He is very intelligent, and in comparison to the other math profs and TAMUG, he is the best you'll find. The other teachers are either completely too hard or too easy and you don't actually learn. I hated him until I had another math prof.
                
                   HE NEVER BOTHERED TO HELP ANY ONE AND IF A QUESTION WAS ASKED HE WOULD MAKE FUN OF THE STUDENT!! N U CANT UNDERSTAND HIM
                
                   He is totally disrespectful to students who ask questions. I don't think he understands that as students we do not understand the concepts as well as he does, and it takes more for us to grasp them. The lectures are near useless, if you take his class you will be doing the majority of the learning from the book.
                
                   i loved Szucz as not only a teacher, but as a friend. He taught me more about life than about calc. He can be a little hard to understand, but with some extra private time after class, he will help you out with anything. He is a beautiful man that all should take. CB.
                
                   The tutors are the ones who teach this class his lectures are useless and his homework does not reflect test
                
                   I've never had a teacher be so disrespectful to students' questions. He will laugh and humiliate some students if he doesn't like the question. Atleast half his course work is useless to what's on his test. Thankfully for most, not many people take this class. I would avoid him if possible, but I don't know how he is for Calculus 1
                
                   I had Cal 1 my senior year of high school, so I never had to pay attention in class. I just reviewed what I knew by doing some of the homework. The tests were moderately difficult, but if you have never taken an upper level math course, I recommend Kang. Still, if you want to laugh, this guy is hillarious!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   His accent is hard to understand. Calculus is a pain!  Go to tutoring, and you will survive. He puts his old tests in the library, though. He has a funny sense of humor.
                
                   A wonderful teacher. Has a thick accent but just writing down everything he writes will generally get the subject matter down. He is very helpful in answering questions and will try his best to make sure that the subject is understood.
                
                   Worst math teacher to ever learn math from. In fact be prepared to teach yourself. He flys through everything and you cant understand a thing he says. Its really funny when he asks the class if we have any questions and everyone would just sit there and say nothing because they wouldnt even know what to ask. Over half the class was gone by qdrop
                
                   Amazing teacher. Yes he has an accent, but if you don't understand he tries really hard to explain it to you. Plus he writes everything on the board.
                
                   I loved Dr. Suen! He does have an accent, but he writes everything down to clarify. He is also very helpful if you have questions.
                
                   Good teacher, knows a lot but has a STRONG accent. A little hard to understand but writes everything on the board and will clarify if you don't understand.
                
                   Nice guy. Thick accent but if you write everything he writes on the board and actively try to understand rather than expecting it to magically sink in, you'll do fine. He grades homework assignments, so that should be an easy grade boost if you aren't lazy.
                
                   Can't understand a word he says, whEn a student asked him on a review day to slow down his answer was &quot;noa bee smarta&quot;(edited for accent)
                
                   I read the reviews here and expected to find a really good teacher. You can barely understand what he's saying. I tried taking notes but it's hard to understand them when you can't understand the prof. and he zooms through them. I had a friend teach me once, and they taught me in 3 hours what he taught in 3 weeks.
                
                   by far my favorite teacher at TAMUG!!! his notes are amazing, and he prepares you very well for his tests but you still learn a ton! I had him for Cal 2 and 3 and made an A in both.
                
                   An incredibly good teacher.  Classes always max out. Works slowly and carefully.  Explains well. Topics and grading make sense. Takes lots of time with you out of class.  A really decent guy. Wow, a great MATH class!
                
                   He's sometimes hard to understand because of the accent but the class is relatively simple. Homework is not mandatory but very helpful if you do it. He doesn't give you the grade you got.. He grades you on your progress, so if you got a 60 on the first test, 70, 80 and 90 on the next 3 tests then you'll end up with an A.
                
                   He's a little too easy for a calculus class, but if you just want to pass and know the bare minimum about the subject, then take him. Gives a lot of homework, but only 5 problems a time. Tests are very easy, they're just like reviews. The most annoying assignments are his computer lab projects, but if you do perfect on his tests, you can skip them.
                
                   Take him for Trigonometry. He doesn't give a lot of homework, and when he does,he gives you a whole week to do about 5 problems. Book is needed for HW and clear understanding of the material if you wanna review. If you ask questions he will answer them and go through the problem in class. Extra credit can replace even the Final, so do it.
                
                   This teacher is super prepared before every lecture. Write down everything she does and listen the whole class and CAL 2 will be a breeze.
                
                   HORRIBLE! I had him for calculus 1 and I hated his class. He would never go over homework when you asked him a question and he rambled on about pointless things. If given the option, NEVER TAKE HIM!
                
                   Very boring teacher. His class is easy, however he always goes off topic and starts talking about pointless personal stories. He gets mad if one person is absent and talks about distracting the class (when him bringing it up is wasting time). He is also very rude. His tests are easy but i would not recommend this professor whatsoever.
                
                   He is a very boring teacher. He goes on & on about very pointless things. He is not a good professor, and he is always making rude remarks to students. He gets mad at the whole class if someone is absent.His class is easy to pass, but he does not do a good job of explaining the topics. TAMUK should higher a different teacher for this subject.
                
                   Easy A for elem stat. He has open book, open notes, open homework when your taking a test. That's an easy gimme failing is not possible! He's really nice and has a funny sense of humor and can get very side tracked with his "disciplinary" stories.
                
                   Goes on in class endlessly about derivation of formulas and off topic subjects. He will have you do certain problems his way, so following the book exclusively will cost you. Doesn't grade too harshly though so do your homework and take notes and you should be okay.
                
                   Going to his class is pointless, he spends the entire class going over formulas and the examples he uses do not make sense, plus he is rude. Extremely boring class, but I guess he is the only professor that gives that class. The class is not hard though, just read the book, do the homework and you're good.
                
                   Good professor. A bit hard to understand due to her accent. I actually had to learn some lessons from youtube when she didn't make sense to me. The recitation helps alot. learned alot.
                
                   Bodjanova is really a wonderful professor. I know why people complain about her; I've had her for trig and precal and they don't like that she challenges you for your own good. If you want to learn, take her class and challenge your self. If you are like 90% of students and just want an easy grade, avoid this class. It's that simple. 
                
                   I went to class everyday and she was hard to follow. Everything to her is simple algebra? She'll ask the class for questions and every time she'll get mad at the person asking you if "you weren't paying attention"?! Hw is online and not too bad but  a must too pass! I learned 90% of the material online by myself. I wouldn't recommend this class.
                
                   I had Bodjanova for Cal 2.  She is a strict professor but understanding.  She won't fail anybody who shows up every day and really tries.  She lectures quickly but will go back over something if you ask her.  If you really want to learn calculus take this class.
                
                   Worst professor ever, She thinks she explains at class but you wont learn anything from her!, her accent sucks. She expect that you remember everything from calculus 1, a lot of homework, the only good thing about the homework is that it is online and they actually explain you how to do it, even better that the professor
                
                   She's a rough instructor, her accent and low volume don't help.
                
                   She goes over everything that will be in homework and tests so no surprises. If you don't understand she's willing to help. If you pay attention in class and do your homework it's not a difficult class. Some people say she is hard, but if you want actually learn the material, she's a great teacher. I only wish there was a cal 4.
                
                   She is a great professor. She may have an accent but if you go to her office she can explain things. The book is a good clarifier when you dont understand things. The homework is also a good way to understand concepts. I thought her class was easy as long as you take the time to do what is expected. Awesome professor!!!
                
                   Thick accent and not a very friendly person at all.
                
                   Horrible teacher! Might as well be signing your life away! AVOID HER!!!!!
                
                   very difficult in understanding what she is saying.  I would rate her a little below average.  she actually told me to not even show up to the final.  that hurt.
                
                   I thought i was going to fail this clas... really because i kept getting bad test grades BUT i always did well on homework and quizzes and always went to class so that must have helped out ALOT becuase i ended up with a B!
                
                   she has a strong russian accent or something, but if you can keep up with her notes and follow her she explains the concept extremely well.  she does not put up with slakers so if you dont like going to class or doing homework take someone else.  you will learn a lot and the tests are easy...just practice the homework and the review.
                
                   She teaches well but her accent sometimes gets bad. Shows how formula is derived before giving the formula so you understand the concept, but on tests (multiple choice), if you can't apply the concept to something almost totally different than you've seen in the homework (assigned everyday) then you are screwed. Extra credit quizzes help though.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She's actually a really good instructor, just give her a chance.
                
                   Awful handwriting.  She reviews you for the tests in groups.  They are easy.  However, there's homework every night and her lectures are sometimes hard to understand.  Tries to help though.
                
                   Everyone told me that she was very hard and to get out of her class as fast as I can, but it turned out to be not that bad. I really enjoyed that class and I found her to be easy. I guess it just depends on your attitude towards her.
                
                   Very Hard to understand.  Doesn't care if you get it or not.  You must speak Russian to take this class.
                
                   I have no idea what this lady was saying!  She needs to take a course in Communications and a course in English.  She is very intelligent -- but she can't communicate worth a dime!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Doesn't get the class involved very much, tests are heavy and leave very little room for error.  He's a good teacher, but he won't make or break you...You'll do that on your own.  Study hard for the tests.
                
                   The class was ok he wasn't the best nor was he the best pretty mutch just a median teacher. The test are not multiple choice but you get your lowest drop at the end of the semester, and the only contain 8 problems his reviews are helpfull and the homework is very short.
                
                   Always go to recitation and tutoring. The TA (teacher's assistant) explains it waaaaay better than her and doesn't treat students like they're stupid even when they ask a question. And she rarely lets us use the calculator :(. The last time I asked her for help, she berates me (sometimes). Well, at least she made some improvements.
                
                   Get out wile you can. Tough and goes very fast. Harder than any class I have taken. 
                
                   She was a great teacher!! She relies on student input and wants all her students to succeed!! She adjusted her teaching style and handed out notes to make it easy to follow her lectures. She has great office hours and is willing to spend time with each student until they understand the material!! Do the work and don't be lazy and you will pass! 
                
                   The lectures area lot of information but its understandable if you put the time and effort. She gives hw but it is not mandatory. If you want to keep up or get ahead I would suggest do it. Best thing about the class was her office hours. She was available basically everyday and if that's not enough she was quick to reply to emails as well! 
                
                   She is a great teacher, she Wants to be as helpful as possible. Most of the people in my class always complain about not plassing but I asked them if they would do The hw they said no. It's what you put in is what you get out. I promise just try your best and you'll pass. Her office hours are so helpful. Go to them
                
                   Gives HW but not mandatory but u should do it to understand whats going on in class.  Her offices hours are so helpful, if you don't understand go to them. she is there for you all the time. She gives reviews every class day on whats gonna be learned so thats super helpful. if you don't pass its because you were too lazy to try. Great teacher ByFar
                
                   Better have math before, 'cause that's the only help your gonna have.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Horrible teacher ... rude to students ... you only go over hmwk ... and you teach yourself
                
                   Umm...he didn't even know how to do the problems.  Do not take him! He is the worst teacher EVER. Over half of my class dropped, and most people that stayed in it failed.
                
                   Very good professor. Makes math very understandable. Highly recommend him. Very easy. As long as you study and stay on top of the work.
                
                   not a good teacher at all...he is extremely rude to students. be prepared to teach yourself for the class.
                
                   The class can be easy if you have a math background, but if you do not don't plan on getting it from this man he makes you feel dumb when you answer a question and is rude to students. All you do in class is go over homework then new work is asigned. The only postive is that test are multiple choice
                
                   Very difficult, but made it through! Just ask for his help and he explains everything very clearly.
                
                   her tests  are overy easy, she gives a nice curve that should get you an A. she also allows u to use notes... although she cant really hear you, u really dont have to ask her anything- sometimes shell get off topic- but dont let that bother.
                
                   She should be retrired, and she has a major hearing problem.
                
                   Does any one know anything about this prof&#63;
                
                   Always changing his syllabus and grading for class. Doesn't really care about attendance. Not helpful for help on problems and he always insist to look it up online. He's easy if you know what your doing.
                
                   he wasn't a very focused teacher. he often put equations on the homework and the quizzes that when you would ask him about he didn't know the answer. he often left the work to youtube videos taught by other professors. i do not recommend him
                
                   he loves chaning the syllabus, and quiz dates.
                
                   Dr. Mack knows what he is talking about but tries to be funny, it doesnt work out. He can be cool sometimes but most of the time he comes off as a butt head. He explains college algebra very well. But he likes it when you have questions to present him so do AlEKS.
                
                   easy class, mostly online
                
                   Great professor. Friendly, funny, and very easy to understand what he is teaching.
                
                   Excellent professor. All of his homework is online.Very considerate in extending an extension. Make sure you try to get good grades on your homework.It helps your grade a lot. Make sure you attend his class,he takes attendance. Hilarious humor and very nice,and helpful!
                
                   Excellent professor. All of his homework is online.Very considerate in extending an extension. Make sure you try to get 100 on your homework.It helps your grade a lot. Make sure you ALWAYS attend his class,he takes attendance. Hilarious humor and very nice,and helpful!
                
                   Just be prepared to think hard and ask him questions! His handwriting is very neat.
                
                   I have him for math proofs. He is an excellent professor, with a cool accent and a good sense of humor, but his class is not easy and you really have to think about what you are doing, because he doesnt give a lot of partial credit.
                
                   I just finished a year with Mr Perez,  college algebra and calculus 1. Mr Perez is the best teacher I have ever had. He says he saw quick that I could do alot and so encouraged me and followed my study. He encouraged me to skip a class my advisor said I needed before calculus and was right. I will take now more math and get a math minor.
                
                   This guy is a big teddy bear. He is super nice, and pretty much knows his stuff. He is big on attendence and being on time, but hes not mean about it.
                
                   He is hard, confusing, he is nice though but if there is any other professor take someone else. Tests are hard, not very clear, expects you to know more and it is confusing, plus the subject is already hard.
                
                   Dr. Sedory gives students every opportunity to pass from test corrections, extensions and he is in his office most of the day whenever you need help. He can be confusing at time but he makes it difficult to fail with everything he doe.
                
                   Not very clear in class, he tells you not to worry about finishing the problem then asks for the entire problem to be solved on the test. Assigns an online homework assignment for every class day and most are lengthy.
                
                   Gives great lectures and has a clear explanation for difficult concepts. His tests are comprehensive and really test your understanding. He doesn't give curves on the tests, but he allows test corrections for half points. If you need help, he is available during office hours to answer any questions you have.
                
                   Great teacher. Explains concepts thoroughly and gives lots of examples. Homework is almost always on MathXL. Gives reviews with plenty of time and goes through it days before test is given. Reviews are like tests. Would recommend.
                
                   Hard teacher 
                
                   Attendance, test corrections, and homework are critical. It is the only way to pass he will also curve. You can fail every test but if you do the corrections you will pass the class! His lectures are confusing but just use your book. 
                
                   Like everyone else said he knows his stuff but is horrible at teaching it to you. Take another professor unless you want to spend your free time in tutoring.
                
                   I only took this prof because he was the only one available. Maybe it was the fact that the class was at 8AM, but I hated it. He was not helpful, his tests didn't relate to the lectures nor the Math XL assignments. He's usually your only choice, considering the class is often TBA until the beginning of the semester! All I have to say is good luck!
                
                   Seems like he knows the stuff, but has no idea how to teach it. Homework was online, which added to cost of class. Tests were extremely difficult, and not related to homework. Lets you correct tests to get points back, which is about the only good thing about the class.
                
                   He was my statistics professor and was a horrible teacher.  I don't recommend him.  He started talking about Taylor's Theorem in a non-calculus based statistics class.  I thought I was spinning in orbit in his class. Don't take him.  You're screwed if you do.
                
                   I regret signing up to take his class. Dr. Sedory is very knowledgeable in his field, there's no doubt about that! However, Dr. Sedory is not fit for teaching. When he teaches, it does not seem like teaching at all. I always think, "he's not teaching us, it's like he's reviewing this stuff for his own benefit!" I feel that his point never gets across and that the time I spent trying to understand his "teaching" was a waste of my time. That's why I dropped the course.
                
                   do not take this professor! hard because he does not explain material well at all...i am a person good at algebra but his lectures were not clear at all and boring! i did good on quizzes and homework and failed almost all the tests and got a B on the final and ended up with a C as my final grade....do not take him unless you are good at teaching yourself algebra
                
                   do not take this professor! does not teach material well at all...and is not a clear speaker. Tests are hard because material is not taught well!
                
                   Very good mathematician, but horrible when it comes to teaching students. His exams are a lot more difficult then then the homework he assigns, plus he's a tough grader. Wouldn't recommend him.
                
                   Indeed he is a good mathematician, but  he is not good making himself clear. You learn more from the calculus book than you do from him, although in the end you end up with a decent knowledge.
                
                   Dr. Sedory is a great professor and very knowledgeable mathematician. He assigns a huge amount of homework problems but doesn't collect them regularly. Tests for this class were mostly definitions with some applications and were fairly difficult but he allows students to rework missed problems for credit, averaging the two scores somehow.
                
                   She's a great teacher and advisor. She expects students to learn the material without much guidance from her though and learn through inquiry. This makes for a very interesting class! I would def recommend her.
                
                   There are things she teaches that make you think in an entire new way!  She makes people who hate math, love it!  I hated math, but she made it easy to jump into.  I even re-took my Algebra course and made 2 grades higher because using her methods.  Great professor for anyone to take!
                
                   LOT'S of Work!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Finally... A math class I enjoy! I hated math before Sabrio, but she's taken it from a struggle to a snap! Easy tests- just like the study guide- and engaging classes . No surprises- what you see is what you get.
                
                   She is so nice and understanding, plus her tests are exactly like her test study guide.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He was a really great professor, loved the way he taught and explained the material. You really have to practice his problems and learn the material if you want an A but he's always there during his office hours to help students don't be scared by his appearance he's really nice and helping.
                
                   He is a great teacher because he explains everything in alot of detail and he is always willing to help you outside of class.  His tests are kind of hard but are passable.
                
                   He is an excellent professor that teaches at a fast pace but will help you out anytime. He is a tough grader, but I believe you will find no better qualities in any other math professor. He really helps you learn!!
                
                   i have no respect for this professor i do not reccomend him fore even my worst enemy he is a jerk with no respect towards his students he doesnt teach worth a darn and he called me stupid 2 days in a row and threaten to drop me for no reason i believe he had it out for me and i would ask questions and he would blow me off DO NOT TAKE HIM!!!!
                
                   Dr. Thurston is a very great professor, however if you do not have a background in Calculus you MUST find another professor. It is possible to get an A, but much hardwork and tutoring must be established. If you know your calculus it WILL be a solid A for you.
                
                   I don't know why all these people are all over Thurston.  He is the worst professor I have ever taken.  This dude would never help me out.  Honestly I think this guy hated me.  I don't even know what I did to offend him :( He is completely over rated by engineers.
                
                   I had Dr. Thurston as my professor 23 years ago. I teach Math at a college now and to this day I can't think of a better Math professor than Dr. Thurston. He was truly the reason I became a Math instructor myself.
                
                   Thurston is hard but funny and will make you learn. His brother is the guitar player for Tom Petty and the Heart Breakers.
                
                   Awesome professor!!! I highly recommend if you want to learn your material. Test fairly difficult, but able to pass if you studied your material. A+++
                
                   Best math professor in the department. He has high expectations for the class so all you get is a 4 point bonus if you do atleast 80% of your homework(which you need to do or you will probably not understand the material). Has a sense of humor and gives out candy if you come and see him during his office hours. Strict grader don't forget units.
                
                   Pretty good professor, he's very helpful during lecture so you don't have to go and see him after class unless you need additional help. Recitation attendance is required while lecture attendance is not.
                
                   Thurston may be one of the most demanding professors in the Math Department, but if you want to know Math, there is no better instructor. He is a God-sent for all engineering students. Thusrton will teach you Math the way you will need to know it for the rest of your college and professional career. DO YOUR WORK IF YOU WANT TO PASS THIS CLASS!!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. T is the best . if u really want to learn something that would stick in ur mind,join his class. u gotta be ready for a challenge though
                
                   Decent
                
                   Best math prof on campus! GREAT!
                
                   Cool!
                
                   Excellant Math Professor!
                
                   He's expecting you to be in every class. If you don't show up for class he won't help you on the topic he covered that day, unless the absence was excused. He's the best algebra professor though. I've learned more in his class in one semester(4months) than I did in high school(4years)
                
                   The class was on ALEKS so as long as you do your 3 hours in the Javalab and finish your objectives on time, you will pass. If you skip class enough times, HE WILL DROP YOU FROM THE CLASS! He takes roll every class so just show up and listen and you will be fine. I really liked him, very nice and tells students how proud he is of them. Take him!!
                
                   used ALEKS for everything
                
                   He's got the know how of a Professor and is willing to make sure you know it by either testing your knowledge or asking you as an individual to ensure that you do know it. Would take another class again!
                
                   I had Mr. Torres for Spring 2014 College Algebra. His explanations are easy to understand, and he is helpful. He may seem strict, but he is a great teacher and I would recommend taking his class!
                
                   I found Torres quite condescending and unnecessarily hard on his students. Once  he decides he does not like you dont bother seeking extra help or asking questions during class, unless you want to be shot down infront of the rest of the students. come to class, be quiet, teach yourself the math at home later.
                
                   Mr. Torres is an outstanding teacher! He takes the time to make sure you understand what he is teaching you and is willing to listen if you have any problems. Wonderful experience and would totally recommend him to anyone.
                
                   Have fun teaching yourself in this class, once he dislikes you forget about passing. Do not reccomend this class to anyone.
                
                   he's a very strict professor, but you will learn so much.he explains until you understand, great professor overall
                
                   Great professor
                
                   Mr. Torres is very stict but hes a very good teacher you will learn from him. All you have to do is take notes, do your home work and study for your tests. He wants to see you learn and will explain till you understand.
                
                   Mr Torres is a very strict professor but one thing for sure, you will learn your stuff.
                
                   Decent instructor and quite helpful, but a little strict and difficult. Would follow well with the course textbook but would move away from it a few times in the lectures. He is very picky in detail of what he wants to see on assignments or homework. If you do not follow every direction he tells you, he'll easily take off points on them.
                
                   Didn't always follow the syllabus. 
                
                   Great Professor!!! I'll be taking her for calc II. She is one of the easiest calc professors there on campus. Material is hard but you have to attend class every day and pay attention in order to pass.
                
                   Ok, So if your looking for an easy professor who just let's you slide by and pass the class, DO NOT TAKE Dr. Lockwood. However, if you want to be the absolute best calculus student possible, Dr. Lockwood will take you to the next level with your math and reasoning skills. She is very helpful and in fact let my class text her to ask questions.
                
                   Very tough class but well worth it!  Dr. L makes students work hard and challenges them, which forces students to use their brains and learn the material.  She teaches Calculus II exactly how it should be done!
                
                   Very difficult class, with little to no help from the professor.  She has very few open office hours, and will cut tests short/move the class so that she can go to meetings.  She does not put teaching first.  She did not give us the student evaluation forms, so I felt that this was the best way to say to her or anyone else: Do not take her class!
                
                   She was too busy with administrative duties. Students were second to meetings and university deadlines. Unnecessary amount of homework.We never knew what was next or what she felt was important enough to be on a test.Plays favorites and grades accordingly.
                
                   Good teacher, cares about students.  Knows her stuff.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I hate his class very boring can follow thru with calculus i hated his class he curves but then at the end depending on the original grade you get your grade
                
                   Refuses to fail a student
                
                   Wu is probably the best Calculus teacher here. He definitely knows his stuff. He's extremely easy, no homework, you don't use the book, so it saves you money and he's very helpful. The only thing is he has an accent that is hard to understand, but I guess that's what the SI is for. Sign up for his class before they fill up!
                
                   IF YOU DO THE REVIEWS HE GIVES YOU THIS CLASS WILL BE AN EASY A FOR YOU, AS LONG AS YOU ATTEND CLASS AND DO YOUR WORK YOU SHOULD BE FINE
                
                   I absolutely suck at calculus and i got a B. There's no way you can fail
                
                   Awesome, easy professor. Had him for calculus I and didn't even need the book.  Just took notes in a notebook and passed all his classes, also gives out plenty if makeup tests if you fail.  Guaranteed to never fail if you at least even try.
                
                   Awesome, easy professor. Had him for calculus I and didn't even need the book.  Just took notes in a notebook and passed all his classes, also gives out plenty if makeup tests if you fail.  Guaranteed to never fail if you at least even try.
                
                   Awesome, easy professor. Had him for calculus I and didn't even need the book.  Just took notes in a notebook and passed all his classes, also gives out plenty if makeup tests if you fail.  Guaranteed to never fail if you at least even try.
                
                   Awesome professor! Not very easy to understand, but tests are super easy. gives review & will repeat a problem 20 times if necessary until you understand it! Huge curve on tests & extra points added to final grade for attendance! Easy A! You literally have to try to fail his class!
                
                   Wu has the hugest curve on his tests. He should give out 4 tests, drops the lowest one, and gives a 100 to the person who got the most right. Since all of his tests are 20 questions, there was this one time when a guy made 15 out of 20 right and gave him a hundred. therefore, whoever made 14 right made a 96 and so on. Theres NEVER homework!
                
                   He's a SUPER EASY professor.  Multiple choice tests, gives review hand out.  Nice guy who is very understanding.  He also gives curves on all of his tests.
                
                   Awesome class.  You don't need to buy textbook!  Plus, tests are super easy.
                
                   Great prof there is not any reason one should not at least pull a B in his class. An A is very uptainable if you put the time and effort into reviewing. Dr. Wu gives you everything you need to know to pass. Take this guy if your one who hates math and struggles you will not regreat it.
                
                   Awesome teacher! You don't need a book. I missed about 2 weeks of class and still made an A. Sample test are just like real test. He also gives attedance bonus points. I got 2.1 out of 3 which goes onto your final grade! Take him!
                
                   He is a good professor. Gives sample tests that are very helpful on tests. Curves on tests and drops worse test.
                
                   Wu is the best math teacher in kingsville. His tests are easy, no homework, and you can still learn it if you want.
                
                   Dr. Wu is the best math teacher on campus!  His classes are simple...trust me! And he's just so adorable!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This man is awesome!! So maybe you can't understand anything that comes out of his mouth...but he knows this, and he curves the tests like no other.  If you like getting 10 out of 25 questions right and still getting a 'B' on the test...you should definitely take him.  He's awesome!
                
                   I don't know what those other guys are talking about, this guy is awesome.  Great test curves.  I think he explains things very well although it sometimes takes a minute to figure out what he is saying.  He gives great notes on the board.  I didn't even open the book once all semester.  I have an A.
                
                   Great professor.  Will be more than happy to help you if he sees you trying.  Tests follow the review, so no surprises.  Would definitely take him for another math course.
                
                   DO NOT!! take his class unless you absolutly need to. I sit in the front row and i can barely hear him. Doesnt explain things well at all. Had to go to the tutor to get help.
                
                   Really good at explaining material. Tests are not over the hardest material he covers. Final replaces lowest test grade. Homework treated as a bonus, not graded.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He teaches above everyone's level.
                
                   She is an amazing teacher! I HATE math and she really made it very clear for me. I would take her class again.
                
                   Very tough. Tests are extremely hard. 
                
                   Great!
                
                   Is not open to disagreements during discussions.  Seems to focus on gullible students to persuade and mold into his way of thinking.
                
                   So lucky I got him for statistics. I was so worried about this class and that I wouldn't pass. He makes class fun and interactive. He really explains the material and goes at the speed of the class. He cares more about everyone understanding the material  then rushing through the whole book. He doesn't go by the book. This semester was his last one
                
                   I recomand this teacher. He knows how to teach and he thinks highly about himself, which is funny. He gives out homework, two quizz, 1 midterm,and 1 final. THe grade you get is what you deserve. The class is easy if you ask question and like math. I would take other class with him. I just loved it. He is avery nice teacher and i admire him.
                
                   Moves extremely quickly.  You must attend class and pay very close attention or you will be behind in a second.
                
                   This professor likes to change his syllabus towards the end and trick students with his real expectations after his instructor feedback forms are turned in.Be careful. He can be cool and helpful, but he can quickly change his mind on assignments based on his desire to all of a sudden. It's possible to pass with a great grade though.
                
                   I'm more into computational math than theoretical, but this was a necessary class. Dr. Romo is a phenomenal teacher.  It is imperative that you attend class and do the homework.  He is very demanding, but that's ok because he wants to get the best out of you.  YOU WILL have HW and he's not easy.  You will feel accomplished when you're done.
                
                   Dr. Romo is an awesome math teacher. He makes you LEARN, so dont expect an easy grade. You will work for it.
                
                   Only required to show up for midterm. Pearson hw and tests. LOTS of HW but easy. Do the HW and pass. Simple as that. I skipped the presentation because I didn't care if I got a B. Available if you need help but easy class. Very forgiving of deadlines. GREAT ACCENT. Have to buy the text because you need the online code. Only downside to her class.
                
                   I took Dr. DeKock for a non-education math class. She has the knowledge to teach 3 and 4 hundred level math classes but she teaches them at a low level. She wants everyone to make an A, even if you don't learn anything new. Therefore she challenges only the lower level students. Take her only if you struggle in math.
                
                   The class itself used a Pearson based online book, assignments, and tests, which I do not much care for. Dr. Mienie herself helped through tutoring hours, online helps, and what she could do, given her schedule and business, and she even assisted when the Pearson online software was either too strenuous or buggy.
                
                   Dr De Kock is a professional. She is the kind of instructor that works hard to make her students successful. Brings in materials from other resources than just the textbook to help grow as a student. She is a very kind, generous, classy lady, and is 1 of the best mathematicians I know (over 50 of them). Definitely recommend her as an instructor.
                
                   Great people person, very understandable, makes every lesson as fun as possible. Devotes 100% to helping in and out of the classroom.
                
                   She is so sweet and helpful. We use course compass for homework and tests and we go over all the ones we didn't quite understand. I just enjoy her class and I am looking forward to Math 305.
                
                   Principles of Statistics was an easy class. She really knows her stuff. As long as you pay attention in class and take notes you can pass the class. Attendance isn't mandatory but unless you have someone who takes good notes for you than you may want to attend class.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I took him for Stats and he teaches this class differently than he teaches his other classes. He's a very knowable person and you can tell but I don't think he knows how to get what he's thinking across. More people willing to admit were confused the whole time and while he went through the powerpoints with us, we as students had to teach eachother
                
                   Great professor, easy A if you do all the work. he acts like a different person in a statistics and is a lot harsher, but for the other classes he teaches he is pretty great. 
                
                   Great professor! Definitely taking him again. Don't skip class! Do all the work! Easy A!
                
                   This is NOT a mathematics class, this is statistics! He goes over what you NEED to know for the real world, not boring formulas and manual work. He knows what he's talking about and tries to make the class interesting. You can tell he likes his job and I hope he doesn't change just for a few nay-sayers. There should be more professors like him. 
                
                   In this class, he is very themed with his power point presentations, television or movie related, and they aren't explained well for the assignments. All assignments are done online using the program SPSS, which he doesn't explain how to use. When you ask a question about something you don't understand, you feel like an idiot when he responds. 
                
                   Gets into his power points a little too much. Explains more about the theme of his power point (usually a TV show) than he does how to do the problems. 
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is a very sarcastic person, so you have to get used to his humor. However, he really is a good professor. Go to class because he goes through the work step by step and gives opportunities to ask questions about the homework. Go to his office hours and he will help you out as much as he can. Tests are tough. Do practice problems and ask for help.
                
                   GREG IS AWESOME. One of the only profs that gives no quizzes whatsoever. HW on Webassign but it's the same amount as the other profs. No written HW and all tests are multiple choice (around 20 questions). Does lots of practice problems & always spends time in class answering questions (including about HW). Attendence encouraged but he never took it
                
                   You have to put in a lot of work, but Greg is pretty good at explaining everything and gives lots of examples. Write down everything he says. His examples were simple and the homework problems were more complex, so I had to teach myself some. For the exams, study your notes and do the practice problems in the textbook, and you'll be fine.
                
                   Not a great professor. He knows the material but he couldn't really care less about teaching the material for the most part.
                
                   He is a very friendly guy. He is very understanding and if you don't understand anything during class just go to office hours. He is extremely helpful during his office hours and also his TA's are amazing. I would most definitely go to TA office hours. The exams are not that bad. Overall, this class is not hard but you do have to put in the work.
                
                   Greg was an amazing math professor. The other reviews do not do him justice. I am not a math whiz, but he dumbed-it-down and was always clear with what he was doing. Go to class because his lectures are great. WebAssign is very helpful. 4 tests total -- averaged a B on all of them (got a B in the class too). He is funny and is sarcastic.
                
                   if you go to his office hours at least once a week and go to the week-in-review sessions at the end of the week you will pass. You have to put in a lot of work for a B. Going to class is basically pointless because he does not explain well, but to complete the hw go to his office hours and he will help you finish it.
                
                   He is arrogant and sarcastic, but in a fun-natured way! Go to class, do the homework and ask questions and you shouldn't have any problem. Whenever I went to office hours he was always more than willing to help me. As long as you put in some effort, you will be fine! The test questions are direct and if you know the material, you be fine!
                
                   Greg can be very sarcastic, and make you feel stupid for not knowing something. There are only 4 tests (including the final which is cumulative) and the hw. So not much room to fix mistakes. Lectures are long, but worth going to. He offers plenty of examples and does try to make everyone understand. 
                
                   He constantly gives his opinion on things that have nothing to do with the material. He once ranted for 10 minutes about why he hated Subway, lol. Other than that he is a pretty average professor. He's very arrogant but he will teach you the material. Doing the homework helps too. Not the worst professor you could get but definitely not the best.
                
                   This class was especially hard for me. I like math, but I spent over 500 dollars on outside tutoring because Greg was no help. He was very sarcastic and made me feel so dumb every time I went to as for help. I would not recommend taking his class unless it was the last class left. 
                
                   Greg is an interesting guy, he tends to drag lectures out long but will solve any question you give to him. Webassign homework that isn't too difficult but if you can't figure it out you can usually google the questions. I did well on the first test but the second one I completely failed. Class isn't mandatory but go if you don't want to get lost.
                
                   He was very clear in explanations and always answered questions with well worked examples. He's kind of condescending and arrogant, but if you look past that, he is a very good professor. Recommend going to class if you don't want to get lost.
                
                   I don't ever actually write anything on rate my professor but after reading how badly people were explaining him and his class I felt the need to share. His class was not that difficult and he is the opposite of fast paced. He's a good prof and all you need to do is study your notes for the exam. His only downfall is his handwriting but he's a dude
                
                   He's pretty sarcastic and doesn't explain his work thoroughly.  You could probably skip class and just look at his notes online. The book is useless. Don't bother getting it. 
                
                   Go to every class. He explains a lot that he doesn't write on the notes. Overall he is an okay professor but not the best. Sometimes he pulls numbers out of what seems like nowhere which can get confusing but you can always ask for clarification. If you have a question yell it out, he doest look for raised hands much. Very fast paced lectures. 
                
                   The course starts off very easy. It gets progressively harder as it goes. The homework isn't difficult but the tests seemed to be. They are very hard to study for. Greg is a cool guy tho. Relaxed and awkward at the same time. Frequently goes on rants throughout each class on different aspects of society and it is quite entertaining. 
                
                   I liked him at the beginning of the year, and I thought the class was fairly easy. As the year went on, the material became more difficult and he became more of a jerk. Kinda an arrogant professor, but I currently have a 94 in the class with only Final left to take. I owe my success to my high school Calc teacher though, honestly. 
                
                   He's probably your run of the mill average professor. He does a good enough job teaching the material but isn't great. He has a tendency to ramble but also does a good job of teaching you everything you need to know for the test. Overall didn't love him, didn't hate him.
                
                   A lot of what people have said about Greg isn't true, he is honestly the easiest math 141 prof at tamu and requires almost no math by hand, all by calculator. Super funny too, but has a very dry sense of humor. He is a really nice guy & deserves more credit than what he's gotten. 
                
                   This class was literally impossible. Crazy hard... even though I never missed class .
                
                   Goes too fast. Only does example problems and assumes that everything should be "pretty clear" to everyone. More of a memorization of how to do specific problems rather than teaching the reason behind. Ok if you can keep up with what he's saying ... otherwise you will get lost easily.
                
                   MY FAVORITE PROF EVER! Easy to understand, not much homework at all, easy quizzes. Tests are almost identical to the review he posts online. If you do well on homework, quizzes, and do the review before tests, you'll get an A!
                
                   Reminds me of Raymond from the tv sitcom Everybody Loves Raymond. He's very good at explaining the material while at the same time, he does not fly through the material like some know-it-all professors. He's considerate of his students' &quot;math level&quot;. Likewise his tests are straight forward but not exactly easy.
                
                   Good professor! Explains problems well. Very funny. There are weekly quizzes along with a homework assignment. Multiple choice/free response exams. I almost thought the honors section had easier exams than the regular, although honors did have additional homework problems.
                
                   This professor made me want to quit engineering as a whole. Lectures are extremely boring, make no sense, and he ends up solving problems that take 3 pages and won't be on the test. By far the worst professor I have had to date. Do not take if you know what's good for you
                
                   I'm pretty sure it's due to the cultural difference, but he really does have a lot of sarcastic remarks. When you're in class and you ask him to explain something again, he sounds very agitated and annoyed. But then again, that is his job - to teach so I'm not sure what his deal is. I ended up dropping his class.
                
                   Gave no quizzes in recitation, bit hard to understand, writes out good notes to follow and help with hw.
                
                   MUST be in class for the quizzes. Tests are harder than expected.
                
                   He was not as bad as I expected. You have to know your stuff, but tests are very similar to the homework. You will get annoyed because he makes a lot of arrogant remarks and will lecture the class about talking when no one is talking. He has a weird sense of humor. By the end of the semester, I didn't hate him.
                
                   Although the math taught in the class is not hard, Onica has a hard time explaining things in different ways when students do not understand. He tends to have sassy and sarcastic replies to questions and though it is not his fault, his accent can be hard to understand at times. Homework was not hard but you have to do it to pass tests.
                
                   Gives pop quizzes at the end of class (we had 10 total), but they tend to be fairly easy. The tests are not terribly hard and are similar to the online homework he gives. Not a ton of work and the class is fairly easy if you go to class. He has an Russian accent so don't take him if you have a hard time understanding people! 
                
                   In my opinion, Onica is a very underrated professor. He accomplishes his task and his lectures are very straightforward but a little bit of a cultural difference makes his thought process a little hard to follow sometimes, but he is very good one on one. Homework was never too hard, do it all and you'll pass the tests.
                
                   Professor Onica provides easy and understandable notes. The homework is pretty easy, and there is even practice homework that is extremely similar to the real homework. If you study your notes really well, the tests should go well for you. Even if you struggle a little, there are help sessions 5 nights a week and a week-in-review. Take Onica!
                
                   A lot of people had trouble in this class but I didn't have an issue. He has an accent but its understandable. He is fairly rude and not well respected by students. Overall a dull but passable class.
                
                   He's really not that bad. I was prepared for the worst, but I was wrong. Yes, he has some tough tests. He tests your understanding of concepts as opposed to straight plug-and-chug. He can come off intimidating and a little rude sometimes, but I doubt it's intentional; it's more of a cultural difference.  He's very helpful and nice 1 on 1. 
                
                   I thought I was good at math until I took his class, I am apparently horrible at calculus. The highest grade I recieved on a test was a 75. He does not curve or give extra credit. He is a really tough prof, you have to do a lot of homework and I pretty much taught myself everything. He's not a bad professor IF you are good at math.
                
                   He has a Romanian accent so sometimes he's hard to understand, and he even told the class that he learned the material he was teaching only very recently, so he was hard to ask questions to because he wouldn't always know the answer. Week in Review held by another professor definitely saved me! However, it's an easy math class, so you'll do fine. 
                
                   Very poor at explaining the work that is not even close to what the homework presents. Does not answer clearly when asked a question. TA doesn't understand his methods. Perfect-or-fail grading basis (miss one thing, even a negative sign, and you fail). Forces students to communicate and never clarifies if the answer was right or wrong.
                
                   Overall, he's a decent professor. He doesn't really take his time to break things down and explain it. I had him for College Algebra. So, if you're a slow learner and need extra help, I wouldn't recommend taking him. I wound up tutoring most of my class because no one ever knew what was going on.   
                
                   I don't consider myself the best math student but this class was by far the worst math class I have taken. The worst part about the class is extreme disorganization. Nobody knows whats going on EVER. I mean from the SI leaders to the lab instructor nobody knows. His accent did not affect his teaching but his methods are far from classic. Stay away.
                
                   Horrible teacher. Disorganized. Never came to class with anything close to a plan, always at least 10 minutes late to class. Doesn't fallow class schedule. Never informs students of what is expected of them. Constantly contradicting himself so students are confused. Never answers questions. AVOID THIS TEACHER!!
                
                   He's funny but not a good teacher. The program's too slow and not clear.
                
                   He is a really nice professor. But he definitely does have his favorites. He is unfair when it comes to that. His class isn't really based off points but more based off of how much effort you put in. He rarely is in his office when he says he will be and rarely will be able to tell you your grade. I would NOT recommend him as a professor.
                
                   He is awful. If you have any questions in class he asks the entire class to explain it, then explains the wrong part of the question, and picks favorites so much its ridiculous. Easy enough class if you know it all beforehand, he is useless as a professor though.
                
                   Hard to understand....His method of teaching is working problems on a projector and saying see it makes sense... avoid him at all cost...He seems to be a nice person but not a competent teacher...changes his lesson plan and due dates....unorganized does not follow his own timelines or course progression...
                
                   He is a great professor. He expects hard work from all his students. The homework is extremely relavent to the lectures and notes for the class. I learned more about how to study than any other course. He is very organzed and his lesson plans are very though out. Learned what I needed to move on from each course I took with him
                
                   As with other commentors, he is extremely hard to learn from.  His technique is to let you banter with the other class members even when no one is right.  His reviews have nothing to do with what he asks on the exam, it is almost like he wants to trick  you.  He wants you to make his class your only priority.
                
                   this guy is soooo confusing ! he is not organized at all!!! he says he wants to help but he never does. DO NOT take him. he tries too hard only those who have the time in the world actually do good. if you dont have a life, try him. test nothing on whsat he teaches. more than half failed his class!!!
                
                   Homework is not very relevant, but counts very little toward the final grade, thick accent, very enthusiastic. He never curves, but has an altered grading scale i.e. 85% is an A. I enjoyed the class, but could tell others around me loathed it, and it was cal 2.
                
                   Terrible Accent, he teaches step, and it sounds helpful but it's not. it makes it more difficult and what he teaches in class has nothing to do with the homework and the homework or lecture have nothing to do with the test. I do not recommend Dr. Jose Giraldo
                
                   He doesn't return work in a timely manner. Even if the assignment is important for later classes. Dont bother to ask him a question he will either ignore it, or call you out and embarrass you in front of the class. Dont attend office hours either because he will tell you to do the work on your own, if you cant learn this way dont take this prof.
                
                   Very hard class. His reviews are not like his tests and it is very hard to understand him. He assume difficult concepts are simple. Aside from that, his extremely lame jokes and accent make him quite humorous
                
                   He is a HORRIBLE teacher. I do not recommend him to anybody. His tests are completly different than his lectures! The only saving grace from this class is the TA. More than half his class is failing and he is blaming the students.
                
                   Sets high standards but gives you every opportunity to do well. Hard working and very helpful, makes sure you understand the topic before moving on to the next topic. Loved having him as a professor.
                
                   HARD! Do not take him if you are not willing to work. If you show an effort he is more than willing to help
                
                   He is great at explaining things very clearly, but make sure you ask questions during class, I got the impressions that office hours were just something he had to put on paper. Testsquizzes were long, but plenty of practice material. Didn't do great in the class, but would totally take him again.
                
                   She is focused and respectful of her students.
                
                   I took honors math 152 with Dr. Pearlstein. She is a very nice woman and will help you if you need it. She tends to make many mistakes during lecture, however. I liked how she provided many examples. To succeed in this class you must do well on the tests, which were all free response and very tough. Expect to more more effort than you think.
                
                   Dr. Pearlstein is a fine professor. She is very sweet but can be unclear at times so don't be afraid to ask questions if you need clarification. The tests are common exams written but the department, but she does a good job preparing you for it. My recommendation is to go to lecture, even if you don't feel like you need it.
                
                   Pearlstein is a good professor in  my opinion. Whether you succeed or not depends a lot on you. The key to success in her class is to pay very close attention, ask questions in her office hours that takes place 3 times a week, do the homework thoroughly, do practice tests, review her lectures, and study hard.
                
                   Pearlstein is a wonderfully helpful and passionate math professor. She does sometimes get off topic showing examples of cool practical uses of the calculus you learned. She is very willing to assist or rework any problem you have. 
                
                   Dr. Pearlstein's class is tough, but very doable. MATH 152 is one of the hardest classes grade-wise at A&M, but she does a good job of preparing students for the tests, although the tests are 2 hour marathons. Homework due every Wednesday through WebAssign, easy 95%+ on each. Quiz once a week, you'll be prepared for those. Don't buy textbook.
                
                   She was an okay professor, only because math 151's test are common exams and most professors don't prepare you well for them. Now her final was annoying. She is a nice lady, but not the best professor. I would try someone else.
                
                   This is the worst professor I have ever taken in my life. In class, I taught her how to do most of the problems. It would have been worth accepting my AP credit instead of wasting my time with pointless, mind-numbing problems that even this professor could not solve. I love math, but this is not a math class, it is a weed-out class. Don't get her.
                
                   Good teacher I made a C but that was on me. A lot of people don't realize this class is not supposed to be easy. If you actually go to class, do your work, don't slack off on your studying you can do well. The tests are very difficult but if you're determined it's feasible to make an A without being a genius. You will have to put in work. period.
                
                   She is a good teacher. I enjoyed her lectures and she takes passion in teaching. She goes in to depth and proves why everything is the way it is. As long as you take good notes and attend lecture should be able to pass easily.
                
                   Here's the deal, I didn't put in the amount of effort this course requires in order to pass, however, there was some amount of expectations I had for the teacher as well. I want to know HOW to do the problems... Well that's all and good, but her teaching is example based and not theory based, which was problematic for me.
                
                   Pearlstein is a very confusing teacher. She tries to go over lots of examples, but just ends up messing them up in the end. The common exams are NOTHING like the lectures or homework either. Best thing to probably to is go to the week-in-reviews and before the tests, work the suggested homework problems. Good Luck!
                
                   Constantly makes mistakes in her notes and blames her students when the class test average is a 65. Has absolutely no concern for how her students do. I had 69 and she wouldn't curve me to a C, which I needed as a pre-requisite to move on. Take only if there is absolutely no alternative.
                
                   The tests are common exams taken by everyone enrolled in the subject.
                
                   She's a complete jerk.  Very rude and will make you feel stupid if you don't understand something and ask a question.  Not helpful at all and if you haven't taken calculus before you're screwed.  She teaches the material like everyone has already heard it before.  Do NOT take her.
                
                   If you didn't take calculus in high school, then you're screwed. She doesn't explain the topics well. She posts the notes online but they're just problems worked through in class. If you're new to calculus then get another professor, maybe they'll help you understand the concepts better.
                
                   The tests were way harder than the material covered in class although they are common exams so I do not blame the professor.
                
                   I personally do not think she knows the material. She did not go a single class without messing up her own notes and being corrected by students. She is not helpful plus her accent makes her hard to understand. She is rude and obviously does not care about the studdents and how they do in class. I recommend not taking this class at A&M at all.
                
                   Dr. Pearlstein frequently makes mistakes in completing her own notes, but expects her students to be able to complete much more difficult questions on exams. Would not recommend to anyone.
                
                   I don't doubt that Prof. Pearlstein is smart and knows the information. She is just awful at teaching it and relating it to the students. She gets her own examples wrong, skips the hard problems in reviews and then tests you only on the harder problems, and they are the ones that she cannot do. I've never been more disappointed with a class.
                
                   The class was very helpful for research statistics. The class only had two exams the entire semester but critical thinking skills are required and applied. I would take this class again because you actually use what you learn. Very helpful overall.
                
                   He makes himself available at all times. I was in his office getting help every week. He is a great teacher.
                
                   Very easy! Tests are take home & the final is super easy! The assignments are a little tough and i did not enjoy them, but you must complete each one to get at least a B and from my mistake I did not do them all and got a C+. If you do all the work you will get am easy A! Great professor and class overall :)
                
                   She is fair in grading. Assignments at first seem scary like any other, but once explained there pretty fun to do.
                
                   Very good teacher! Loved the class...she mafe it very interesting and fun! The class was esy if you read and attended lectures and did your milestone journals Learned alot! Would take any of her classes in a heart beat!!
                
                   She made class fun! Main focus was on the power points over the chapters. Tests were fairly easy, everything comes directly from the chapters. The study guide is very helpful and she posts the answer before the test. This was one of my favorite classes.
                
                   Always ready for class w/notes. sometimes to fair with chancs to pass. Had to go slo b/c of army dude. Would take again.
                
                   Laziest teacher i have ever had.. hardly covered 3 chapters .and really very bad attitude
                
                   Awesome geometry teacher. And his epic beard contains the secrets of the universe.
                
                   OMG this class is hard!!!!!! I'm a math major and I aced calculus but this class made my head HURT!!! Sinq is an awesome prof tho, no worries. His IQ is like a billion but hes patient and talks like a real person.  Take him and bring advil.
                
                   Mr. Sinq is an awesome teacher. He's always prepared and never makes you feel like a retard if you ask a question. He won't go on until everybody gets it. Rare around here. Take plenty of notes and don't screw around or you will fail. No bonus work at all.
                
                   Mr. Clewett is the reason I passed math. He is amazing! He always welcomes students into his office if they have questions and you can tell he genuinely cares. 
                
                   Mr. Clewett is one of the best math professors I have taken, he made me understand math which is a big deal because I dropped out once before because of math. 
                
                   Great teacher! Highly recommend!
                
                   Thorough and to the point. There is homework almost every night, but only around 12 problems each. Do ALL of the homework and you're golden. If you have problems, he's more than happy to help! Otherwise, check out the math lab when in doubt. Best math teacher at WT by far.
                
                   This is the easiest class I have ever taken! Highly recommended. Pretty interesting. Teacher is a jackass but can be funny. He also is pretty weird. But class is beyond worth taking. If you need a math credit and you want something useful that is generally easy and doesn't require a lot of work - this is perfect if it's offered in your degree plan.
                
                   Honest reviewer here, his class is easy if you do and understand the homework make sure to attend the lecture cause he answers homework problems and dont be afraid to ask questions hes ready to explain anything
                
                   I barely passed Cal 1, but I took Cal 2 with him and learned so much. He did assign a lot of homework, but it wasn't graded that harshly and all you have to do is take notes in class. He even does some of the homework for you. I'm taking him next semester for Differential Equations
                
                   He is very helpful. He will happily answer all your questions.
                
                   Only negative is that he speaks quietly. Sit close to the front. Other than that, his class is very easy and he always asks if anyone needs help on the homework (not mandatory, just practice) he assigns. He assigns 3 tests and drops the lowest one. These tests are 10 multiple choice questions, and he lets you take 2 pages (front and back) of notes.
                
                   very easy...he let us use a calculator even on the tests...we were allowed to use a calculator that let us work out every problem, not just a scientific calculator...
                
                   This guy's class is awesome he is so cute and funny.  He will be working out a problem for like 20 minutes and then realize he made a mistake its so funny. Take his class and buy the &quot;powerful enough&quot; calculator and study- he drops lowest test grade out of 3 tests.
                
                   Dr. Wang lectures come directly from the board.  If you do the assigned homework, you should have no problem getting a good grade in his class.  No done side, is that he speaks very softly, and can spend the whole class period working on a couple of problems.  He's willing to help w/ any hw questions, but you better ask @ the beginning of class.
                
                   He never said attendance was mandatory to be exempt from the final, but at the end of the semester he said I couldn't be exempt due to poor attendance (i missed 1 day).
                
                   very hard to understand you essentially teach yourself.  If you have no background in calculus good luck.
                
                   This professor is very worth taking. He is considerate, kind and most of all funny. He teaches you to use technology and his class will be easy to pass.
                
                   Good class just pay attention and make a good note sheet for the tests.
                
                   Dr.Wang (pronounced Wong) teaches pretty well and makes the tests super easy. He uses example problems from the book and the easy homework problems for his tests. He speaks very low so its best to sit as close as the front as possible.
                
                   Easiest class on campus.  Just show up go over the homework and attend tutoring sessions and get an A.
                
                   Had not taken math in 7 years, he covers the material very well.
                
                   Quizzes every week, if you don't know what you're learning you're screwed. Lectures then constantly corrects herself because she doesn't even know what she's doing. Everything I learned was off of the online homework, which there is PLENTY of. Homework has videos and guides to help out (sometimes). Don't recommend her. 
                
                   she taught the material like we were all math wizard. it a freshman level course so obviously i got lost in that class. i was better off not going to class and going to lab instead.
                
                   Very tough professor. i thought she teaching was up to par but her ways of instructing, testing was if you were only taking her course all semester. Had a tough time understanding what she was instructing sometimes. be prepared to do alot of hwk and not much partial credit given GOODLUCK
                
                   Took her during the summer session I, and she was by far one of the best math teachers I have had here. She's pretty easy to understand, and if you go to class and DO YOUR ONLINE HOMEWORK and study hard for your quizzes, you will easily pull an A or high B. I personally received a B in this course. I highly recommend her!
                
                   Great professor!
                
                   I really enjioyed this class, she wasnt hard but i do have to put effort into knowing the material. Give just a bit of effort and youll can easily pull an A or high B.
                
                   I LOOOVED Dr. Carroll!! The material really isn't that hard if you did well in College Algebra.  But if you didn't take it, she'll get you up to speed.  She's SOO nice too!  Love her!
                
                   This class was not that difficult because we didn't have tests during the semester. We has quizzes every week. Study for those and strive to do well on each one. In the end the final was a breeze. Don't hesitate to ask her questions in class.
                
                   she uses mathxl which is easy and helps you understand the material better...the tests are alright not to hard but not to easy. she seems to go off on tangents that dont make sense but as long as you do the homework on mathxl it is easy once you compare it to class notes
                
                   Dr. Carroll is a great professor.  I really enjoyed her class.  The homework is all on mathxl and its not too tedious.  She is not the easiest, but not the hardest either(sedory).
                
                   No Comments
                
                   easy class if you are good at math.. but make sure you practice your math problems otherwise you will be lost..
                
                   I did not really like the class, b/c she never really stopped to explain problems. she felt that you had to know everything before you got to class.
                
                   I hated Physics after taking his class, it wasn't until I took Hewitt's  class that it became much more interesting.
                
                   Long Live Campbell!!!
                
                   Campbell is an awesome calculus and college algebra teacher, but university physics was horrible.  The college physics students say he's really easy, so I guess he must grade a lot easier on them.  Over half of our class dropped.  Campbell is like gold compared to Cox, however.  Avoid cox!
                
                   Great professor, I took a class of his 4 different times for: Phys 2325, Phys 2326, Math 2313, & Math 2314. Cool guy.
                
                   Gives lots of x-tra credit. Keeps it interesting. Pretty good teach.
                
                   Very good teacher; funny and understanding.  Gives extra credit quizes every day.  The homework greatly increases your grade.  Curves tests.  Rewrite the class notes before the test and they are worth 60% of the test grade if I remember correctly.
                
                   Highly Recommended--gives odd numbers for assignments and 6-8 question test. Questions on test are ones he's given in class or assignments. Also very nice and understanding. For an older man, yes he's very handsome!
                
                   Explains things well; will help you one on one.  Easy going attitude.  Lots of extra credit opportunities.
                
                   this is the worst teacher that I have ever had! i got an A on his class, but I had to learn by myself. I could not understand him, he cant hear well, his tests are not multiple choice, he is very strict with his grading. you have to be very dedicated or a genious in order to get a good grade with him...Please dont take him!!!
                
                   Basically teaches you the test, and they weigh more than the objectives in ALEKS. She's very enthusiastic and teaches you the easiest way to get the answer. She actually made me love math. I DON'T LIKE MATH. haha she's cool.
                
                   Great teacher, I don't even like math much and she was very helpful and made math interesting.
                
                   This class is really easy, disadvantage is Aleks which is online. Aleks is basically the class itself, the only thing you do in the actual classroom is go over what you need to have done for Aleks. If you're good at math this class will be a breeze!
                
                   Dr. Ahmed is a good professor. He knows calculus very well. Very good at explaining the topic and doing various examples that apply to that topic. Gives a lot of extra credit but expects you to put in work. If he sees you putting in work AND ATTEND CLASS EVERY TIME  and your grades are so-so. You will pass. 
                
                   Helped me out a lot.
                
                   Excellent professor! take him! not an easy A, but knows his subject, challenging homeworks and easy exams! If you are able to do your homework by yourself, the exams are going to be pretty easy.
                
                   Very helpful and good teacher.
                
                   He is very helpful and nice. However his teaching is not up to par with other math teachers. He relies on definitions and one example problem per section to make it for the test, then assigns very hard homework
                
                   Amed is a great teacher. Has an accent but is pretty easy to understand. Show up to class, take notes, and do some example problems. Class isnt easy but he is good at explaining.
                
                   He's basically a BAMF.  His accent is the most entertaining thing you will ever experience in a class room.  There is homework and some is quite hard, however his door is always open and his is an extremely approachable man.  I would take any class he is offering in a heartbeat, regardless of if I need it or not!
                
                   He is a very good professor.  One of the few math teachers that I've taken that actually teaches rather than put problems on the board and expects you to do them.  Also, he has a cool accent.
                
                   He is the worst professor on campus, in my opinion. I found the subject rather easy, but that is because I've always understood math. If you are not very strong in math, get a different professor. He can't teach. The class has to correct his mistakes. He has even assigned homework from the textbook on problems that aren't in the book.
                
                   terrible teacher. you will most likely end up teaching yourself and plan on going to tutoring
                
                   Ughhhh you need to find a tutor if you want any hope of passing his class. He tests on things he WILL NOT TEACH YOU. Worst class I ever took at TAMUG.
                
                   If you're taking his class, be prepared to find someone to tutor you. He will teach nothing.
                
                   He can sometimes be confusing and messes up on example problems in class but he is willing to help if you see him after class and if you do all of the hw the tests are not that hard.
                
                   Very unorganized. When he lectures, he makes the problem harder then it really is, making it very confusing. He also makes a lot of mistakes during lecture, further confusing the class. You need to attend class to get the HW assignments, and to find quiz and test dates. I only recommend him if you are good at learning out of the book. If not avoid!
                
                   This is a hard class he is very hard to understand sometimes he is a very smart teacher but it is just a hard professor to take take some one eles for math
                
                   He's smart, energetic, friendly, and helpful, but forgets numbers when rewriting steps. You can get an A even if you're bad at math.
                
                   A wonderful professor!  Always in a good mood and its quite contagious.  Mathematics is made clear and easy.  A+ all the way!
                
                   Entered this class believing I was getting someone else as a teacher. I was sorely dissapointed. The other comments were right, he plays favorites like you woudlnt believe. Take this class if you already know alot about the subject. If you dont, dont bother taking it.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   His tests are totally different from what he goes over in notes and he's much harder than the other professors.  A real jerk that plays favorites.
                
                   She shows up late for class, and cancels class often. But hey, I'm not complaining!  Biostats is an extremely boring subject and her tests can be tricky. Though she will usually give bonus points. Not a bad teacher, but could be better.
                
                   ridiculous, lazy teacher
                
                   Will cancel class almost all the time.  But she makes up for by being understanding when it comes to test time
                
                   she is the best!
                
                   Shes pretty easygoing but lectures straight from the slides which are notes directly from the book.The tests are straightforward and overall it was an easy class but I didnt learn much.
                
                   She is really nice but the class is still hard.  It seems easy in class but the homework is hard.  If you can?t do the homework, you won?t do well on the tests even though they are open book.  The book is useless but you have to buy it for the homework problems.
                
                   The book is of no use because she changes the formulas, so its pretty much only for homework probs.  But of course you cant check your work against the answers in the back because they wont match. Attendance isn't mandatory but its the only way to learn it! She just kinda of outlines the material not really in depth and doesn't have enough examples
                
                   She gives you her cell number, just incase you need to call her for questions. Thats pretty awesome. Unless you absolutly suck at math, you're gonna get an A. The tests are open note
                
                   AMazing lady, sweet, fun outgoing. Easy to talk to and very willing to help. very understanding of problems, she is great. sometimes things are a little difficult to understand at first but it is pretty easy if you just do the homework. IF YOU DON&quot;T GET IT TALK TO HER!!!!! she has kids so she cancels class alot but  takes it into consideration
                
                   Patty is a nice lady and really outgoing but not the best teacher. She doesnt go over enough examples in class and often has to go over the ones she does two or three times to get the point across. She has kids and is working on a PH.D so she cancels class often. If you do the home work and ask questions and seem interested its easy to get an A or
                
                   This class is much harder than it appears. Pattie is a nice lady but when it comes to teaching it is just not enought. There not enought examples given in class to help with the homework. During class you think you understand but the homework is hard. The book is really bad, it does not help at all and she teaches the class differet frome the book.
                
                   Hard Hard Hard Class. Makes no sense out of mathematics. Exam averages were in the low 30s. Hard to understand at times. Lectures are nothing like the quizzes and exams.
                
                   Dr. Brown is the worst math professor i have ever had. Being an Engineering major, i love math and understand most of it! Dr. Brown does not teach, does not grade his own work, and the test is over material you have never seen before. Will not give partial credit, will not help you out, good luck passing this class. (Test average was 35)
                
                   His tests are extremely tough. You can tell he's extremely smart and loves math, just doesn't teach it in a very easy to understand way. His grader was very specific on the homework, and he assigns homework at the end of every class, which is to be expected from any math prof. Only take him if you're strong in math.
                
                   That was the hardest math I've taken. He over complicates things in class because of how brilliant he is. He grades very hard for HW and tests. Some questions are worth so much on the test it can fail you if u don't get it. Several people dropped, and several people made a D or F i think. Don't take unless your very strong in math. 
                
                   I don't know who I like less: Dr. Brown or his grader. He will claim to give partial credit, but never does, if you make a small algebraic error, expect to fail the assignment or test. The lab is very easy and helpful, however it's only worth 10% of the grade. In class, he only works out examples that are already worked out in the book.
                
                   He is not clear at all. He often skips several steps while explaining new equations. highest grade on our first test i saw was a 55. class avg was a 33. I studied the notes and numerous youtube videos over curriculum and got a pretty good understanding but his tests are a b*tch and picks the hardest stuff from each section. 
                
                   If you do all your homework you will make an easy B. If you put in the required work you will get an A. almost got an A. Unfortunately university doesnt have B+ or A- Prof was available in his office for as long as needed. Class loved him. He wrote the Algetriculus textbook. 
                
                   The only reason anyone would have a hard time in this class would be because they didn't show up to class and didn't do the HW. His lectures are pretty straight forward. Sometimes he goes into theory on why equations work, which is confusing. We don't need to know that though. The HW is hard only because Cal2 is hard. Good professor and so cute. 
                
                   Dr Brown is a brilliant mathematician! He just can not teach to save his life. His grader is awful, the homework is mandatory and graded stringently, and the tests are nothing like his lectures or the homework. Test average is around a 40. DOES NOT GIVE PARTIAL CREDIT! Avoid his class if at all possible!!
                
                   Tests are not like the homework or the lectures. You can pass this class with a good grade, but you need to be able to teach yourself out of the book. Very smart mathematician, horrible teacher.
                
                   I am a math major that transfered up from galveston to college station. And I must say that of all the math professors i've had, Dr. Brown was one of (if not singularly) the best. I feel i got a solid understanding of differential equations that set me up well for Partial differential equations.
                
                   I took Brown last semester for Calculus I. Though his class was hard, he was very helpful if you just talk to the man after class. When you study for the tests make sure you have a thorough understanding of the material. Ask him about the tests too, last semester he actually gave us copies of the old tests and his new ones seemed easier.
                
                   He's very thorough with his teach. After taking his course in Differential Equations I feel that I actually have a good understanding of the subject.
                
                   I really don't understand what all the fuss is about on this prof. Im taking differential equations from him and he lectures straight out of the book, does the examples with complete clarity, and gives corrections on your homework assignments. The homework can be a little challenging, but if you can work through it the tests are very similar.
                
                   The hardest prof ever. Tests are next to impossible. Homework problems are the hardest in the book and he only gives even numbers so you can never find the answer. Also grades the homework extremely tough. The class average was a mid 'D'.
                
                   Hardest math teacher I have had
                
                   This guy is a joke. Shows up late every day, confuses himself while teaching- not to mention his students. Then he finds the most difficult problems he can for his tests (which sometimes even he can't solve). Over half the class Q-dropped his course. Do yourself a favor: AVOID THIS GUY!
                
                   Worst Math prof i've ever seen. this is the guy that ruins math for most people. condescending, apathetic towards students, lectures are worthless and tests are impossible. in order to learn the subject i've had to pay for a private tutor. you'd honestly be better off paying for a private tutor and testing out of the class. TERRIBLE PROF!!!
                
                   For your own sanity, DO NOT TAKE THIS PROFESSOR.His lectures are worthless, his homework is impossible, and his tests do not cover what he teaches in class. He is honestly the worst professor i have ever taken! Test 2 the class average was a 40 and he did not see any problem with that average. He doesnt understand that he is the problem! AVOID HIM
                
                   Worst math teach I have had up to this point.  He makes a brief touch on a subject, shows a few &quot;tricks&quot; and then gives some qustions that require you to think out side the book.  Poor grading style (since when is a 65-50 passing) and unless your a wiz at math, stay as far away as possible.
                
                   she's so unclear on eveyrthing she says an she goes too fast
                
                   She is always in her office to help you if you need it. She gives very good reviews before her tests.
                
                   Carmen is a super cute, short lady... but her tests ridiculously hard. My roommate and I would stay up till the AM studying for her tests. You HAVE to go to tutoring to learn, because she doesn't explain things good. Also, just wait for her to be late daily and run into class saying "SO SORRY.. TRAFFIC" in her accent while panting. 
                
                   I ended up teaching myself a lot of it. She's helpful outside of class or in class as long as you ask questions. The tests are easy - multiple choice, HW & notes can be used - only 4 and no final. She does have a bit of an accent but she's still easy to understand. 
                
                   Make sure you know how to do the problems. She is kinda hard to understand, but you can bring homework to the test which helps. Test are pretty difficult though.
                
                   She was not the best at teaching I actually only went to class on test days, her grading scale is the best!!!!! If you do the homework and go to the test days you will pass she even lets you retake a test at the end of the semester so make sure to go to the class after the test to get your test back!!!
                
                   She gets very confused in class and some part it's over what she's teaching that day. With her accent it's very hard for I understand her. When you go to Her for help she does nothing! The homework that she assigns is nothing like the lecture examples so it's alot of self teaching. Do not pick her!!!!!
                
                   She is by far the worst math teacher I have met. Her accent alone hurts my head. And when she teach, don't even bother looking at her lecture notes cause they're nonexistent. She doesn't move her notes into the screen monitor so we can see it, and so we have no idea what she is writinglecturing. She goes through 2 chaps in 1 hour. Good luck.
                
                   She doesn't teach anything, she reads her powerpoint, you can't hear her
                
                   I like her she's very clear concise and straight to the point anytime that anybody needed help you with it very quickly willing to stop everything and look to help them. she gave me every chance you could to not only booster grade but too an extra point Or two.
                
                   I made an A in her class without even going except for on test days. The homework and tests are really easy and she is willing to help you as long as you ask.
                
                   She has a very bad accent and messes up a lot. Absolutely hated the online material, and it is never in sync to what material is being covered in class. She is terrible at explaining things and reads from a power point in class. However, she is a very nice person and will help you pass if you come to her a lot.
                
                   She does move very fast and she she does have an accent, however, it's not difficult to understand, and I never had any issues not understanding a test question because of her lack of vocabulary.ever. I have never had a professor so willing to put in extra time before and after class for tutoring. she is a great and I am taking her for MATH 141
                
                   this class is hard and her accent can be hard to understand but if you go to her office and ask for help she will help a lot. though she makes mistakes while teaching, she also explains the problems a lot slower than most math teachers i've had. i'm horrible at math and i passed with a decent grade.
                
                   She is incredibly hard to understand and talks way too fast. The homework is really easy but the test is a completely different skill level. But probably the nicest professor you can have in college
                
                   she is sometimes hard to understand but she explains the formulas and does an example then reviews each example. i'm very bad at math but i passed this class. if you go to her office or even stay after class to ask for help she will help you every bit she can. you will have no problem passing if you go to her for help.
                
                   Just an easy class. She makes the tests difficult. You can't understand her. She should be able to speak fluent english if she's writing tests.
                
                   She can't speak very well English. Heavy accent, mispronounces major words. Her mispronunciation can and will cause misunderstanding. She speaks too fast, doesn't interact with class. All she does is run through PowerPoints. Her tests have bad vocabulary. It will cause you to miss a question. Class is easy, but she complicates it.
                
                   She is very helpful, but the material on the tests are completely different than the lectures and homework. She doesnt engage the class at all; she just works the problems on ther board without lettng you try it on your on. This made understanding the material quite difficult especially when you dont understand her heavy accent.
                
                   Kind and sweet woman. Always willing to offer help. Seems to have communication difficulties. May or may not be language related. Just doesn't seem to grasp what I was asking. Works too fast in class. Doesn't engage students. Homework online, and different than tests. Unnecessarily difficult Overall. Not a good experience. Don't take this class!
                
                   Without a doubt the single, best professor I have had in college so far. Some professors are patronizing or unclear in their teaching methods, not Zimmer. Calculus III was very challenging and taught it very effectively, a new section of the textbook every class. She is very forgiving in her grading on exams & makes herself available at office hrs
                
                   I do not recommend her at all.
                
                   it hard at the beginning, needs to follow all materials. 40% of midterms will be given. nice person.
                
                   She goes through so much material really fast. I feel like the class caters to straight out of high-school Calculus AP students. She does explain if you ask questions. But good luck getting a word in through all the lecture. No cell phones very hard grader and her tests are KIller. I would avoid her unless you feel very comfortable with Integration
                
                   Dr. Zimmer is amazing.  You will learn to appreciate Math as she has a passion for the content.  Her class is a challenge; however, if your maturity level is high, you will not be disappointed.  This site is not designed in her favor - it built upon easiness.  Otherwise, she would be on top.  We need more teachers like her in the United States.
                
                   test are hard, make sure you solve the problem how she wants them to be solved, she'll count the entire problem wrong even if you show the all your work, have the right answer,and you cant use a calculator on the test. so dont use diff equ formulas to solve cal 3 problems.
                
                   She is not helpful in Linear Algebra.  Avoid her at any cost especially if you are a female. I would ask a question on lab and she would just tell me to read the instructions and my friend who was a male would ask the same thing and she would help him no questions asked.  She was like this with most females in the class except a select few!
                
                   I took here for cal II, very hard class. Went from 25 students to about 8. She is kind of mean too, 1 point off final grade if your phone rings in class. Very strict grader, the gateways are almost impossible to pass. Beware she will post sample old tests on here site which are really simple, but then the real tests are way more difficult.
                
                   Definitely one of the best professors at A&M. She is passionate about her work and knows her stuff. She explains the material very well and is willing to spend extra time in her office if needed.
                
                   Cal II: She moves extremely fast!  Lots of material covered in a short period of time.  Completion of homework is MANDATORY OR YOU WILL FAIL.  She is helpful, but very blunt and to the point.  Her tests are killers.  I think she's hiding a hot bod under her frumpy appearance.
                
                   If you miss a class you are royally 'stupid' for lack of a better word. She is tough, requires lots of homeword & moves very fast; but if you do everything she requires you will learn just about everything and make a great grade in the class.
                
                   I didnt want to take this class but I soon changed my mind after seeing how well Dr.Zimmer taught and how much she lieks math. She is helpful and very approachable. She seems mean at first but you just have to talk to her. The homework can be a lot but it helps cause the tests are based on it and the notes, but she gives lots of partial credit.
                
                   I also took this teacher, because of her ratings on here...I agree with the other comment, big mistake.  She does not explain things very well and you will spend most time in the Math tutoring center trying to learn the material.  The Class went from approx. 60 people to 13... I highly suggest checking around for other teachers..Good luck!
                
                   I took her because of these ratings. Big mistake. She does not answer questions but simply says talk to me after class,I already went over that, or that's what office hours are for. I never understand in class but understand later when I do the homework which is assigned everyday. Need to remember to do the online homework and quizzes. average for 
                
                   i just had her for a sub while my professor was out, the entire class preferred her method of teaching.  she is not afraid to answer questions, she goes over a problem in detail and will stop to explain IF YOU DO NOT UNDERSTAND!  she was great, i wish i had taken her instead of the professor i have now
                
                   she was so helpful and thorough in and out of class that i never bought my book and made an A in the class.  definitely was not an easy class either (calc 3)
                
                   She is a great math professor.... She answers questions you have on homework and quizes the next day before we start new stuff.
                
                   Extermly difficult class, lab, book, and daily online homework but she spends time every lecture explaing and homework and lab problems. The difficulty was moslty from the book and lab taught by a grad student that did not speak english well.
                
                   I am not a math person, and I felt I got a lot out of this class. I really felt I got my money's worth in this class. She is also very helpful and patient. HW is online and the course offers great tools so you can study for tests.
                
                   He's got a thick accent and talks fast, all semester I had trouble understanding him. He helps if you ask. I went to his office hours many times for help and I would still barely pass his test. His class is difficult b/c we don't practice AT ALL we just take notes then test. 4 tests each worth 25% that's  it. Would not take again! Don't take him.
                
                   Hes a nice guy, but not a very good teacher. If you dont have a grasp on pre-cal, youre going to struggle. His examples arent that great, and hes a bit confusing at times. Luckily, I had great teachers in high school, but still had to rely on the book quite a bit.
                
                   The Lab is a big part of your grade and this lab teacher is so easy. He gives you a 100 just for attempting the labs. Take him if u can!
                
                   It's Calculus. I have a weak math background but Melina helped out where she could. Gives out extra credit after the first 2 tests only. Lab instructor was pretty good too.  She does take attendance. If you have a weak math background like me and you skip a lot you can easily fall behind, usually go through one section every class meeting.   
                
                   Good teaching, There for you but will have to do your part
                
                   Wouldn't take her again. She is nice but she is not good at explanation. Needs more experience. 
                
                   Melina is a really great, helpful professor. She gives out extra credit on tests, which she grades based off of the work you show. There's only 3 tests. You have 12 online Homework assignments and Quizzes, but she drops the two lowest. She is super helpful in class, and during her office hours. If you don't understand something, ask her!
                
                   She is very clear and shows everything step-by step. 12 Homeworks (drops 2 lowest), 12 Quizzes (drops 2 lowest), 3 Tests (worth up to 110), and 1 Final. Reviews before exams. Hands out extra credit worth about 5pts. As long as you stay on top of the assignments and study the review, this class is an easy A. 
                
                   Melina is so sweet and is willing to help anyone you just have to communicate with her. She does have a very thick accent and is sometimes hard to understand. Homework is all online and super easy. You don't need the book, just the access code. Study the reviews and you'll do good!
                
                   Get Her! Homework basically gives you the answers. She's super nice! All tests you can 110's and she gives out bonus points like nothing! She's super easy and approachable. Reviews are just like the tests but harder so it makes the tests super easy. Go to class everyday and you'll get an A. She'll work with you if you need the help!
                
                   Go to class shes fun and its not hard! Homework online and a few tests in class, always willing to help. She's really nice and funny!
                
                   Awesome teacher! Although homework is online, it has plenty of materials that are very helpful. She gives a great, CLEAR lecture and if you copy down everything she writes you'll get an A. Lets you make a full sheet of notes to use on tests! Highly recommend for algebra
                
                   Great professor. Makes you laugh. Clear and helpful if approached. By far one of my favorites.
                
                   Explains everything two or three times, concepts are hard but somehow you will understand it by the time he's done explaining. Thomas' lectures feel a little like if your grandpa were teaching you something, hes extremely nice. He will answer any questions completely and will always try and get you on the right page. Tests are the review.
                
                   He is an awesome teacher! He explains everything clearly and is always willing to answer questions.  He does not assign homework.  He goes over a review before every exam.  You could probably get away with only going to the reviews and tests and get at least a B or even an A.
                
                   Its a tough class. I couldnt understand a word in the class, I recommend asking a friend who has taken the class before for help. There is no homework
                
                   I had hime for discrete math and I hated that class. All his references were business related and I am not a business major so I was lost! I would not recommend him to anyone.
                
                   I only showed up for the review a day before class, the test, and the day after to get my test back! Never took attendance, homework was optional.
                
                   Discrete was the best class I had. He is really laid back and awesome. He knows his stuff and just wants to share it with you. he's an awesome teacher. :)
                
                   He is very laid back, and grades none of the homework. The tests aren't hard unless you do not study at all. Just pay attention in class and review for the test & you will make an easy A.
                
                   Great teacher! Really intellegent; one of the smartest people I've ever met. Goes out of his way to give credit on exams. Uses the book for exams. Lecture is theory/pathology. Integers:&quot;Glorified cow-counters&quot;. Before final Fall exam:&quot;Remember, Christmas is coming.&quot; You'll get a B by just trying to work exam problems.
                
                   Memorize the problems in class and you should do well
                
                   Calculus III
                
                   Awful class. He is too smart and seems uninterested in teaching. He is clear on what he expects but exams are EXTREMELY hard. I did not pass and had to retake with a different professor. He assigns homework but its not graded. if you fail the first exam you fail the course. exams are heavy weighted as its the only grades! attendance is mandatory.
                
                   He is not very helpful. Sometimes he will get lost in his own work. Sometimes when you ask him what he just wrote, he doesnt even know. As far as tests. No calculators, no notes, and there is no review. Cross your fingers if you have to take him.
                
                   Can be a little hard to understand (accent, imperfect english, handwriting issues). He cares about student learning so ask questions. Homework is optional, grade based solely on exams. Liberal amount of extra credit on exams and from quizzes. Study hard for exams, memorize theoremsdefinitions, you will learn a lot about Lin Alg. Very good teacher.
                
                   Tough subject and you are expected to actually learn it.  Quizzes were much more difficult than the tests.  There are not a huge number of definitions but learn them as part of each test is properties of a defined term.  Lectures are not mandatory but treat as if they were as Professor Tarazaga's explanations are much better than the textbooks.  
                
                   made it very clear at the beginning of the class that he did not want to be approached with any questions. Assumed that the students already knew information that was not taught, and would not explain anything helpful during lecture or office hours. In the calculus I class I took with him, the students were not permitted to use calculators.
                
                   I am not a slacker and I am good at math but I found this instructor not helpful. In fact, hard to understand and rude.
                
                   DO NOT take linear algebra from Tarazaga! I am an excellent math student with a 3.8 GPA. I have never had to work so hard for a math course as I did from this professor. Here is a list of issues with the professor: 1. Stands in front of board constantly. 2. His teaching methods are atrocious. 3. I learned MORE from YouTube than he ever taught. RUN!
                
                   This teacher was the best teacher I ever had. He taught math like no other teacher. Thanks to his crystal clear teaching I made good grades on my test. Anyone who says hes a bad teacher is probably a slacker who wants an easy A without having to try. Trust me this teacher will imprint math into your brain and you'll thank him for that.
                
                   He is a very polite man but his teaching is very hard to follow, he doesn't explain much and all the homework that you do he doesn't take for a grade, so your test scores depend whether you fail or not.
                
                   the teaching's fine, and the labs are do-able, but his tests aren't really like his teaching.  he words things completely differently.  i've taken him twice now and it's always the same.  crystal clear in class and totally lost on the tests.
                
                   This professor did not teach me a thing. All he does is walk straight to the board and write problems. If his homework was made mandatory maybe it would have helped.
                
                   THE BEST TEACHER I'VE EVER HAD, EVER. This woman is amazing, hilarious, and overall gave me the best grades I've EVER made. I took her for Business Calc and Business math and made 98 in both classes. I've only made C's in every math class I've ever taken.. Crazy. I took her in the SUMMER semester. and she was so sweet, taught everything perfectly.
                
                   She is so sweet and funny! WARNING when you are taking notes and solving problems in class everything seems super easy. The tests are impossible if you do not study. NO MULTIPLE CHOICE.
                
                   best doctor I've ever take in this school !!! 
                
                   He does go very fast, but if you ever have a question he encourages you to ask. I really enjoyed his class and thought he was a good professor. You do have to attend class, but that is the case with most math classes.
                
                   He goes fast, but overall a really great math professor! You do have to attend class, but you do with most math classes.
                
                   Cool guy, but he goes really fast through the material. The homework assignments are tedious, but surprisingly his tests aren't so bad, which can throw you off. Be aware of his accent and on the board, if it looks like an 'n', it's an 'x'
                
                   If it weren't for cramster or chegg, I wouldn't have passed this class. Grade distribution for Diff Eq was 6%-A 6%-B 6%-C and the rest D or F. You tell me if this dude is teaching. My favorite thing he did was to give quizes on homework you hadn't even done yet.
                
                   He was VERY helpful and approachable. He does go a bit fast, and so I am not sure how much harder he would have been if I had not had a good memory of most of the material from high school. Make sure to attend class, and make sure you do the homework. Other than that he is a GREAT professor. I plan to sign up for his Calc 2 class.
                
                   Annoying. Pretty decent at explaining stuff, but goes way too fast and makes condescending remarks ("Didn't you learn this in high school?"). His grading on tests were inconsistent; you could have the same answer on a problem as someone else, but get less credit than he/she did. This did happen a few times. At least he's approachable in his office.
                
                   He's a good teacher, but DUDE he needs to slow down! We typically go through about 3 or 4 sections in one day of class. We had no feedback on our tests so that made it harder for studying. He assigns the hardest HW problems. But, his notes help sometimes when doing homework and he is VERY approachable. Not a bad teacher but not an easy one either.
                
                   Great teacher! Helpful in and outside of the classroom. Expects class to have good understanding of Calculus II concepts, but will regress to help if necessary. No notes on tests, just practice ALL of the homework given (once a week + a lab once a week). Overall, great prof.
                
                   Very monotone, but he really knew what he was talking about.  He explains it so you understand it.  Highly recommend this prof.
                
                   Homework is given online- you either love it or you hate it. I was somewhere in between. Having a graphing calculator is a life saver. Textbook? NEVER used it. I opened it once, and that was it. She gives 4 tests and a final. Attendance and taking notes is essential. it's harder to understand new material if you skip.
                
                   Professor never showed up on time for class, had EXTREMELY unclear grading criteria (class grade suffered because of this) and did not know how to handle disruptive students. I have never gotten a grade below a b+ in my life except for this course. Professor was not a good teacher
                
                   She is confusing when going over examples during class but so much more clear if you go to her office hours. Even though the homework is not a grade I recommend doing them because she uses the same questions for her tests!!!
                
                   Keep up with the mymathlab homework and quizzes! It's a nightmare to try to finish in two days before a deadline. Plus it's the only thing to study for a test. A calculator is a must because you learn how to make it do all the work for you. Write down the steps for calculations. The class is boring and the labs are even worse but power through it! 
                
                   Guordiola's class is pretty easy because he allows you to create a "cheat sheet" on an 8.5 X 11 piece of paper for every test. He has online assignments on mylabplus that aren't hard and are an easy way to boost your grade. He does have a thick spanish accent, but it is easy to understand him if you pay attention. Easy A if you do assignments!
                
                   He has an accent. Learn how to use the calculator. 1 page of notes to each exam and 2 pages for the final. I made one D and one C on my exams, but the other stuff I made A's. If your FINAL grade was higher than one of the exam grades, he replace one test with that same grade. I studied hard to get an A on the final and made an A  in the class.
                
                   I walked into Stat expecting the worst, and that's exactly what I experienced. Guordiola is a great professor, and knows exactly what he's talking about, but his strong accent makes it very difficult to pay attention. If you want to pass this class, do ALL of the online stuff! Try to get 100's on ALL! Go to EVERY lab and participate. Class SUCKS
                
                   Guardiola obviously knows his stuff and is excited about it but his THICK accent makes it impossible to even comprehend this course. If you want to make a decent grade in his class go to all the labs and do all the online homework and quizzes.
                
                   I admit, I walked into Stats expecting the worst, and let me say.. that's exactly what I experienced. Guordiola is a great professor, and knows exactly what he's talking about, but his strong accent makes it very difficult to pay attention and stay awake. If you want to pass this class, do ALL of the online stuff!! Try to get 100's on ALL!!!
                
                   He is super hard to understand with his heavy accent. After a while i just gave up listening. His tests are easy though. He lets you bring notes. There is lots of homework to help bring your grade up also. but i wouldnt recommend him.
                
                   Come to think of it, if it weren't for Professor Guardiola being so lenient I think his class would have been pretty much impossible for me to pass. He allows you to use a page of notes front/back for exams! (plus he never checks to count how many-hint!) I took him this summer & he kept giving us pushed back deadlines which helped a ton!!!
                
                   He is very nice, and willing to help students. Communication between him and the students is very difficult in both directions. The tests are crap- memorizing a computer program's menus is stupid and useless, but you have to. The short answers are graded subjectively. You MUST work out problems a certain unspecified way; correctness is secondary.
                
                   He's a little hard to understand, he's really nice, and wants to help you. His tests are a bit on the hard side, especially if you do not study. If you work on the homework and quizzes, do ok on the tests, you should have a B.
                
                   Easy Class to pass!!!! If you make at least 80s on the homework and 70s on the quizzes you will pass. On each test he allows you to take one sheet of paper back and front FULL OF NOTES. If you don't pass this class I don't know what to tell you!
                
                   He's really nice.  He has a heavy accent, it's easy after a couple of days.  The material is not very difficult, I just loathe it entirely.  You need to purchase the textbook/lab manual/online HW(MyMathLab) package, otherwise you if you purchase it separately you don't get the lab manual, which is definitely necessary.  You must do the online HW in
                
                   At first he is a little difficult to understand but after a few days it isnt bad. He is nice and willing to help. The tests were easy but it is a little difficult to keep up with all the homework assignments.
                
                   Contrary to others, I think out of the Stats profs, he's on of the better ones. He goes at a good pace to learn, but you need to be in class and pay attention...it is math! His accent is kind of heavy and takes a little while to get used to. If you don't understand, ask!! Quizzes are similar to HW and Midterms are like quizzes.
                
                   Doesn't speak english very well. His test are very difficult and he throws in random questions that we never even talked about in class. I would recomend taking this class with a different teacher like Mrs Zimmer.
                
                   As far as Math profs go, I believe hes been on of the best I have, I can honestly say I learned stuff in class, usually i have to go home and teach my self
                
                   The student shouldn't ahve to teach the professor how to do the problems, or correct him every five minutes at least.
                
                   The class is easy!  However, the teacher makes it much harder than it really is.  He dosen't teach well and his test have short answers!
                
                   Everybody says this professor is unhelpful, but he is. He does not teach in his class, but if you attend and physically ask him for help, he will go through every step until you understand it. His class is done on aleks and you do not have to attend, its very easy. I recommend, although i think its his last year teaching.
                
                   Doesnt teach at all but I am good at math so I thought the class was easy. If you are not good at math, beware.
                
                   I saw the ratings on this website and i got worried but I wasn't going to quit until I gave his class a chance. I went for the first class and it was bad so I dropped the class.  My friend dropped the class 7 weeks later it was too hard trying to teach yourself math by doing it online.
                
                   Aweful instructor and a nightmare of a class. Doesn't use a textbook; doesn't teach anything. He's only there to answer questions, but beware: he has bad breath! Wouldn't recommend him at all.
                
                   Basically if you want to learn,don't take him. He doesn't use the text book at all. He sits there and only answers questions, he doesn't give lectures or generally teach. It's discouraging when your in a classroom setting and you have to ask questions. Everything is done online, and you get two grades. Midterm and the final.
                
                   His help just confuses you more.
                
                   This class made my whole first semester of college the worst semester I've ever had. He was not a very good teacher. I had to go to tutoring everyday! DO NOT TAKE THIS CLASS!
                
                   I took him for College Algerbra. I am horrible at math and this teacher made it worse. He does not explain anything and I don't understand how it is possible to take his class. If at all possible take TINTERA. She is AWESOME! and easy.
                
                   He sucks at explaining stuff and he runs in circles. I don't recommend him I had to go to tutoring everyday because I never understood him! DON'T TAKE HIM!!!
                
                   Don't take him! He's a horrible professor! You learn more from the homework assignments online than you do from his lectures. Not only does he have a poor teaching method, but he's rude to his students. Also, the final exam is unreasonably difficult.
                
                   Worse teacher I have ever taken, teaches math from a power point and looks down the whole time, is no help at all, it was like i was teaching math to myself. Do not take him more then half the class failed his class.
                
                   The funniest and most down to Earth professor ever! I thoroughly enjoyed every aspect of her class. She is very helpful, energetic, kind, and makes learning Algebra fun and easy. She's a lenient grader and will even let you correct test's for half the credit back. AMAZING professor... take her, TAKE HER NOW! lol
                
                   She is amazing. She is so helpful. She will answer any question you have. She is very approachable. you can email with a question and she will answer back within a couple of hours. I loved this class. As a person who sucks at math. I learned a lot and i still remember most of it. If you suck at math then you should take she is so helpful.
                
                   She is very friendly and approachable. However, she tends to teach to the front or the loudest in the class. If you have a question or concern you better speak up.
                
                   Mrs. Nemec's lectures are easy to follow and she gives tons of examples. She treats her students like adults, doesn't bother you about completing homework or showing up to class. She is available for extra help or questions. One of my favorite teachers so far.
                
                   Awesome. Very patient and approachable
                
                   One must first understand that this guy has A LOT on his plate. He teaches at a local high school as well as at the University and has 5 children at home. He is a busy guy and still finds time to help out his students. Math is not my forte, but I still manage to survive in his course. It's not easy though, but then again I am not a math major.
                
                   i took his class (pre-cal) and it was an easy A class. he's awesome and a young, so he will help you in everything you want. the way he teaches is very clear and he doesn't give alot of HM. he gives alot of extra credit opportunities not like the other professors who don't.
                
                   I took him for 1351 and 3352. Awesome teacher. He is young and laid back. Willing to work with you. Doesn't assign a lot of &quot;busy&quot; work. Provides examples. A lot of hands on activites in class. Good teacher!!
                
                   very hard to pay attention in class because his teaching method is reading straight from a power point that was provided by Pearson company.. & don't know what to study for the exam because he never emphasize anything in class.. also he teaches at a high school therefore making it hard to get a hold of him during the day when you actually need help
                
                   He is a pretty good teacher. He is very willing to work with you to find a time to meet outside of class if you need extra help and can't make his regular office hours. He is more clear than most math instructors. He will tell you what is more important to study for the tests. The hw is very helpful, and if you do it this class is very easy.
                
                   He doesn't explain things too well. Make sure you obtain a high grade in mymathlab. Overall the class is pretty easy if you attend class. And well I am aware of his situation, but thats not my fault...
                
                   mr.champine was a very good teacher. if you dont understand anything, u wait till after class and he will explain it well. u other guys, do u know he has 5 KIDS! yea, including 1 teenager (girl) and hes works 1 other job hes a busy man so suck it up!
                
                   This is a very difficult instructor.  He expects you to know it.  If you tried to ask questions, he'd say, see me after class.  I wouldn't recommend him, unless you have had a 4.0 in math consistently.  There were several complaints about him.  One student said she took Chemestry and Physics and that those skills did not apply in any way.
                
                   What he goes over in class is nothing what is on the quizzes. The lecture material is easy to understand, but it will not help you later. Overall, the class was very hard.
                
                   He is an awesome teacher!!! I hated math and failed other classes but he explains things very well and his class is actually fun because he makes it that way. I would highly recommend him as a teacher!!!
                
                   He's a jokester. Keeps the class interesting and fun. He answers questions and is available for his students. He spends the class teaching the basic concept and expects you to adapt to the difficulty levels of the problems... but is there to help if you need it.
                
                   She is better than most other calculus teachers at explaining how to work the problems out. The test can be difficult, but if you are willing to do you work and listen in class then i would highly recommend this teacher. 
                
                   GREAT professor for Calculus! She makes you think about the problem rather than memorize equations. Has her own formula for grading based off of a GPA scale 0-4ptsquestion so you don't fail an exam for getting 1 or 2 prob. wrong! Very helpful! comes in early if you need help with problems! Homework and Quizzes often but easy bc its open note!
                
                   Professor is very knowledgeable, but tests are overly hard and "tricky." Class attitude is that students are being set up for failure.
                
                   She's one of the best professors I've had! In high school, i barely passed my college algebra class and now I'm passing with flying colors!! Amazing instructor! We only had 2 tests. She gave out reviews for both so they're super easy! All homework is online! However, she can be kinda rude via email sometimes. I highly recommend her to anyone!!!
                
                   i will say the truth about her.. the class is easy because she explains clearly. it is true she gives a lot of assignments because she wants us to understand the subject..and i don't think she is rude. thank you.
                
                   She is absolutely unhelpful, very rude most of the times. She grades like what seems to be with her eyes closed, she took off points for putting comas. If you email her she will treat you as if your dumb. She will not curve a 89.9 to a 90. She does not teach either, she sits down and asks if anyone has questions, and if not you leave. do not take.
                
                   You do a lot of teaching yourself, you might as well take the course online.
                
                   she is one of the best math teachers, I've ever had; she is very easy to understand, she is not too serious, the the review is the exactly like the test. she gives extra credit for attendance. she is epic
                
                   don't know why everybody says shes awesome, she was a terrible professor who constantly got example problems wrong in class. it seemed like she didn't know what she was doing, she had to stare at the book for minutes at a time to see what to do and still got problems wrong. Class was easy, but she sucked. also, Lots of Homework.
                
                   Such a wonderful teacher. Exams are either exactly like the review sheet or online. All homework is in MyMathLab. You don't have to be good at math to easily get an A in this class! Absolutely loved her.
                
                   Awesome Teacher!!
                
                   Great professor :) She made everything very clear which was good for me since I was in remedial math with her
                
                   great teacher, very funny. she uses access codes which are very helpful instead of the boring textbook.
                
                   she is seriously amazing,i use to really hate math because i didn't know what was going on,but now im really starting to like it!she explains things so well and does a great job of doing it.you should def. take her.
                
                   She is seriously the best math teacher I have ever had. I used to make C's in high school and now I making A's. I highly recommend her to anyone, she gives out a review before the test that are exactly like the test. Love her!
                
                   Amazing 
                
                   She is a very very good teacher.  She not only explains how something is what it is but she explains why.  I wouldn't say she  is easy or hard.  She is a good teacher.  
                
                   She is a very nice and sweet teacher! I would definitely recommend her.
                
                   Always willing to help. If she is teaching the class, take it!!
                
                   Ease isn't really the issue. It's an upper level math class, but she is a VERY good teacher and very thoughtful about how she presents the material. We always had a week to do the homework so we had plenty of time to ask questions. Couldn't ask for a better math professor!
                
                   Great professor. The class is not very easy but she will help.
                
                   Wonderful, wonderful, wonderful!  Dr. Webster is hilarious!  She was always very helpful.  Unfortunately, she's picky about your answers on tests, but she is very fair and understanding.  She's always there to help and is not uptight at all.  I'd definitely take her again.
                
                   She's great.  Easy to work with and always willing to help students in her office.  Knows her material and puts it at a level we can understand!!
                
                   AWESOME PROFESSOR!!!
                
                   She is a very good teacher. Makes things fun and she is very nice. Taker her if you have to take any of her math classes.
                
                   GREAT Professor, very helpful, and she makes everything VERY EASY to understand!!
                
                   She's a great teacher. I had her one semester and still went back to her for help in other classes...AWESOME!
                
                   very understanding and class was fun yet very informative.  you have to do your work and study but if you dou that, you'll do well.
                
                   I really enjoyed this class.  You gotta do your homework.  She was very easy to approach and would help anytime.  Good professor!
                
                   Lots of fun - keeps it light.  Very clear, helpful, sweet, and reassuring.
                
                   Great Psychology teacher! Very outgoing, funny, and helpful. Loved his class! I would take his class again if I needed to! I even recommended him to my friends.
                
                   Third time taking this class from other instructors. I am learning more this time. He teaches in a succinct manner, with emphasis on helping us understand the method for the math, not just the answers. He believes in logical shortcuts in algebraic equations. I too wish I could continue on as his student in my next class.
                
                   Mr. Swindell is an amazing professor.  He makes math easy to understand.  I'm terrible at it but with him helping me it was so much easier than it ever has been before.  In addition to that he's super cute. lol  I wish he could just teach me all the math I need to know for the rest of my academic career.
                
                   Highly recommend taking her class, especially if your one of those people that has a really hard time with math. Her teaching methods are a bit different but helps you understand and will work with you outside of class and always gives you a chance to bring up your grade. AMAZING teacher that actually proves to care about your grade in her class.
                
                   Gives at least partial credit on everything you do, emails you the test reviews, works on test reviews, takes and answers all questions. All in all a really good teacher
                
                   She is an above average teacher. Her lectures are not difficult and she is extremely generous on tests.  If you miss a day, you can get notes emailed to you as well. 
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is a wonderful teacher.  If you can take him for a class, do it you won't regret it.  His tests are hard, but you will learn more than you would by most other professors.
                
                   Easily one of the best teachers I've ever had. Stays after class as long as is needed to give extra help. He does so many extra things to help us understand the material. I would highly recommend him.
                
                   Hard to understand because he is Italian, but he is a good professor.
                
                   Tests are really hard, but he is so helpful.
                
                   He is a great teacher. He really knows Mathematics. He is hard teacher, but if you really what to know and understand mathematics take him. He his always willing to help, and he is really easy to talk to. Very nice guy!
                
                   He is really nice, but his tests are near impossible without as computer doing the stuff for you. He has a bad accent, but it is tolerable. Recommend use of TI-89, TI-92 or HP 19B
                
                   very happy to help after class
                
                   Very tough professor, but great at teaching the material.  Tests are a killer, but you learn alot from him.
                
                   love the humor in his lectures.  always willing to help.  tough professor, but an excellent one
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Killer Tests
                
                   Not very understanding. Won't help much.
                
                   I enjoyed the class.  It was the first time I got what I was doing.
                
                   Hated the class failed it 3 times and she was one of them, but damn she's hot.
                
                   very nice and helpful. She needs to be shown that you want to do well.... come to her help sessions or set up times every once in a while.
                
                   She can be helpful, but is easily irritated- especially when we dont understand. Also she can be lazy while teaching, but she also helps a great deal with extra credit for attendance & what not. Overall, it's fairly easy course.
                
                   Great teacher, he does get off topic quite a lot; but when he speaks about the subject he explains it well. Very easy course, basic math. Math 175 business app, he does use the book for homework questions, and they are VERY similar on exam. THANK him for not using dreaded MyMathLab.
                
                   Mr. Pleasant is a great instructor.  He is helpful and knowledgeable.  I started the semester with a strong dislike for mathematics and ended p loving his class!  I highly recommend him!
                
                   Mr. Pleasant is a great professor!  He is extremely helpful and very patient.  Let's be honest....Algebra can be a tough subject.  He makes it seem easy and I did better in his class than I have ever done in a Math course before.  He is very encouraging and you can't find a professor who grades more fairly.  HIGHLY RECOMMEND!!!!
                
                   This class was wonderful.  He is a very very excellent professor.  He explains WHY not just HOW.  
                
                   Easy, lets you write stuff on board for test.
                
                   not very helpful
                
                   Sometimes the homework is nothing like any of the examples he gave in class. He skips steps instead of breaking things down. He's not good at communicating outside of class. He counts off points on tests for the smallest most insignificant stuff. I honestly don't understand why this class is required. It has NOTHING to do with business. 
                
                   It is not so much that he was a bad teacher, it is the fact that he does not break down the material enough for everyone to understand. Yes, he is  there if you have questions, but the answers are irrelevant because he speaks so highly as if everyone is a mathematician.
                
                   Mr. Patterson has a stellar lecturing method and clearly has a passion for teaching. He is moderately considerate. This class doubles as an online and in person class. Test reviews are very helpful.  However, the material and homework shown online is given and due BEFORE it is actually addressed in class lectures. Overall, I enjoyed his class.
                
                   Great Teacher
                
                   He said we could take our tests online. We were delighted,while I got a 96. my suite-mate got a 100. Then, we were robbed. He said that our tests can't be taken online and they had to be proctored. Take the test again and got a 91. On the homework, he gives you no time and rushes you. Do not recommend him as he has no idea what he's doing.
                
                   He is an AWESOME teacher. I hate math with a passion but once I took his class I actually enjoyed math for once!
                
                   He is a little scatter brained at times, but overall he is a very good communicator and an excellent teacher.
                
                   Poor clarification skills. Constantly messes up equations throughout lecture, leading to improper answers unclear learning environment. Does not allow any retakes, or extra credit, and changes due dates for assignments on MyMathLab without warning. Overall a very poor teaching style combined with the inability to speak clearly and do correct work.
                
                   She gets easily annoyed with students who do not understand, she will just say to go see her in her office for tutoring hours instead of explaining it in class. The class can be easily passed due to all the assigments but if you're not a fast pace learner I would suggest a different instructor.
                
                   The second he walks in, "must be a Monday", "What's trending ok the Twitter world today?". Causes awkward silences with his jokes because nobody laughs. Only does problems from the text book but he never misses attendance so going to class is a must.
                
                   He was a really nice professor, thou a bit boring at time. He tries to change the mood by giving jokes. If you do the assigned homeworks and review them for the exam, you'll do fine. However, the assigned homework was like weekly, so quite a bit of work.
                
                   Heath is a great professor and his class is very easy as long as you go and pay attention. Highly recommend taking him! 
                
                   This was by far the easiest math class I have ever taken. If you show up to class and do the homework (which is pretty easy), you'll know what's going on and pass tests. Don't let the easiness fool you. You must put work in to get a good grade.
                
                   Professor Heath is a really good teacher!! Sometimes he moves really quickly through problems, but if you ask him a question or simply tell him you don't understand, he'll help you until you understand. He's also really funny. He'll stop in the middle of a problem to tell a joke. Sometimes the jokes are really corny, but you can't help but laugh.
                
                   Professor Heath was awesome and made the class a lot of fun. He has a great sense of humor that most people would find dumb, but you can't help but chuckle. You learn a lot in this class and the material is straightforward and pretty easy. Do the HW he assigns and you'll be fine. The exams aren't difficult and he gives you formulas/derivations.
                
                   Professor Heath was awesome and made the class a lot of fun. He has a great sense of humor that most people would find dumb, but you can't help but chuckle. You learn a lot in this class and the material is straightforward and pretty easy. Do the HW he assigns and you'll be fine.
                
                   The teacher hardly explained anything and the only thing he ever did was work from the book. Sure, it happens, but he never described anything. Assumed we knew everything already.
                
                   I was constantly trying to stay awake(this is the only class i have ever had this problem). he did not cover math theory, only what was going to be on the homework, and if you missed a day you were out of luck, that would pretty much guarantee a low grade on the next test.
                
                   I was constantly trying to stay awake(this is the only class i have ever had this problem). he did not cover math theory, only what was going to be on the homework, and if you missed a day you were out of luck, that would pretty much guarantee a low grade on the next test.
                
                   this class started out simple but quickly became very difficult. If you stay on top of homework and studying,youll be fine. Personally I thought he was very boring and he has a dry sense of humor- good luck
                
                   A kind of funny old man but I found the class exceedingly difficult. He moves quickly and can only do examples out of the book. He never taught theory or anything other than what was going to be on the homework. Attendance is nearly mandatory in that I don't know how you could pass if you didnt come to class. WILL NOT take another class by him.
                
                   Mr. Heath is a wonderful professor. He made the class very easy to follow. He is funny is a weird way! =) I would definately recommend for anyone to take him
                
                   Boring and can only do examples out of the book, cannot teach ideas or theory of math.
                
                   It might just be me but he was boring and it was hard to stay awake in his class. I had a better algebra teacher in high school that thought me more in a high school semester than I have learned in this class.
                
                   He's old and tries his best to be funny (not succeeding most of the time) but he's a very good teacher. This was the first math class i actually enjoyed.
                
                   He wants you to learn and he wants you to pass!  Great teacher!
                
                   class is hard, very hard, but he explains things well and DO THE HOMEWORK....he will help you out in the end if youve done it all. In class hes laid back and if he sees you outside of class hes sure too say hi b/c hes just a nice guy....take this guy....just try hard,......youll be ok.
                
                   Wow! Where was this guy when I was trying to learn Algebra 20 years ago&#63; One of the nicest, most caring professors you will ever come across. He made Math actually interesting. Psych students: you don't HAVE TO take college algebra, take this class instead. Great class and great teacher. Highly, highly recommend for the Mathematically challenged.
                
                   best math teacher ive ever had. he is very funny and he makes class interesting.  If you fail a test he will let you correct it to get a 70
                
                   She is very boring. To me, she seemed to only teach the basics and not explain why things are the way they are. Tests were easy and so was the homework. Overall, I think if you want to learn something well, try to stay away from her.
                
                   Awful class. She gives a lot of busy work that is not helpful in teaching a high school class. She didn't like me, but I can play the games of her class so I got a good grade. I wouldn't take her if I could avoid it. Crazy!!
                
                   She is a very hard prof. She is harsh and abbrassive. She expects you to study hard, and to work hard. You will learn a lot, but you must be willing to take time to study and do the home work. She will not give you any slack! She will make you a better teacher in the end, but it is hard to see the light at the end of the tunnel.
                
                   I feel that Dr. Faulkenberry is an excellent teacher in that she does ensure that you know the information.  She is very strong willed and does not come off as being warm and open, but she is willing to help you when you need help.  Also, the depth of the content discussed in this class will not be used in the middle school classroom.  It is stuff that will be slightly touched on.  Overall, she's a good teacher, but I do wish she was more warm and kindhearted rather than brash.
                
                   Considering everyone complaining about Dr. Faulkenberry, they are acting like the middle school students they will be teaching. Dr. Faulkenberry is a wonderful teacher, showing her students how the math she teaches relates to the math we will be teaching. Be ready to work and reap the rewards!!! I am a better teacher and student because of her!
                
                   If you're lazy dont sign up! You will work hard.  People who complain wanted to just come into the class and sit there to twiddle thier thumbs.  This isn't an easy class. But you can make an A
                
                   Its hard but you have to have it.
                
                   i would never take her class again
                
                   She takes off a huge amount of points for small things. Took off 40% on an assignment ... because I didn't label a single point out of over 20 points. 40%! Her assignments aren't clear, her tests are too hard, and she's also rude to students. She's impolite and mean. Not only will you dislike the class, she will insult you and give you a bad grade.
                
                   She raises the bar in our Mathematics field, taking off our blindfolds of how we were taught. Simply put, if you don't want to learn, don't take her class.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Took it over the summer and wasnt bad. Didnt give much homework. Did have to do the manipulative project. You have to pass the compency exam but she gives you a second chance if you dont get it the first time. The whole semester was based on using manipulatives with fractions and decimals. Class is a little frustrating at first..but you will be ok
                
                   She is a great teacher.  She gives lots of busy work, and gives homework on things she hasn't covered yet.  In the end, everything comes together.  She will help you become a better teacher.
                
                   Dr. Faulkenberry is an amazing teacher. She has very high expectations for her students, but she enables us to meet them. I have learned more from her than any other math professor I have had and would recommend her to any student wanting to truely learn mathematics.
                
                   She was pretty rude to me...and everyone in the class watched her shoot me looks! I wasn't pleased with her at all.
                
                   UGH! Teaching math to children should never be this difficult! She is very sarcastic and acts as if she is on the verge of a nervous breakdown. She gets so frustrated easily. She likes to assign LOTS of homework and material she has yet to review. Sometimes I wonder why she bothers to come to work.
                
                   This woman is crazy and overbearing! She loves to give out worksheets for homework everyday! She's only fair with the grading if you're one of her favorites, so try to get on her good side...doubt she has one!
                
                   I find it very interesting that people who are LEARNING how to teach are forming opinions about her teaching ability.  She knows how to prepare students for what they will see in the classroom.  Ignore the ridiculous comments about her abilities.....
                
                   She is not prepared for class. does not know how to teach to a class that wants to be teachers.  If you want to take a class on what not to do as a teacher, this would be a great class.  Working hard does not pay off.  She also treats some students better
                
                   She is very knowledgeable in mathematics. She is a great teacher outside of the classroom - go talk to her if you have problems. She doesn't manage the class well and resorts to treating students like unruly children at times.
                
                   She is very hard and loves to make the class harder than it should be.  She can not teach, she can not bring it down to the student's level.  Be prepared for a lot of homework.  She does not understand that students have jobs, other classes, and kids.
                
                   he is the best
                
                   Dr. Coskun is probably an ok teacher, but I found it hard to pay attention in class because he repeated himself so often. His tests are hard, and beware of Mathematica!
                
                   Dr. Coskun makes you do all homework in Mathematica. His test reviews are useless because they rarely match the test. When he grades you don't understand what you did wrong or what the correct answer should be. He really doesn't want to be helpful in his office hours and most of them are via Skype. I took three classes with him and learned nothing.
                
                   I recognize Dr. Coskun as being one of the best math professors Ive ever had as a college graduate now. I struggled with the material covered in the class at the beginning but he helped me a great deal. Dr. Coskun is truly a great instructor and I am glad that I had the opportunity to be in his class.
                
                   His tests were really difficult, most of the class complained about not having enough time. The test is always much harder than his review. He never checked homework or gave quizzes, and let us do test corrections for half our test scores back. The course is made purely of tests and a small attendance grade.
                
                   Fantastic lecturer! I am fully satisfied with his teaching. His class was very educational and we covered a lot of material.
                
                   Dr. Coskun is a nice person with very strong pedagogical formation. I liked his class and the way he teaches. I would recommend him to anyone.
                
                   Greatest professor ever! Go for his class.
                
                   Dr. Coskun is the best math professor I have had at this university. He is always very friendly. His lectures are crystal clear. I enjoy his classes and teaching style. Dr. Coskun is very conscientious of his students and wanted to help us. If you care about math he is the right person to take a class with.
                
                   Heavy use of technology in classrooms makes lectures interesting and easy to follow.  Emails all lecture notes ahead of class time.  Very knowledgeable of subject.  Gives extra help or hints on difficult problems.
                
                   He would show up for appointments that he made with students and other professors had to take up the slack for him.
                
                   He is a very good teacher. Sometimes he confuses himself, but he always clears it up. His tests are hard, but if you work the problems he gives as examples and do your homework you'll be ok. The homework in our class was always due 2 classes later. He is very nice and really cares for his students.
                
                   He was very hard to understand, and his tests were much too hard for the level he was teaching.  Was a very understanding man, but the class was way too hard.
                
                   He is a good teacher but he has difficulty remembering the english words for numbers. no big deal though you will get past it. sometimes i think he might be a bit ****. over all he is a good teacher who gives easy tests and easy homework. I would take his class again
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Coskun bent over backwards to help us learn the material so we could pass this difficult class.  Once I got used to his accent I had no trouble following him.  Also, he seems to be a really nice person.
                
                   She has always been one of my favorite teachers, she makes the students feel comfortable in their classroom environment.
                
                   She is an amazing teacher! I've always had trouble with math, until I had her. I took college algebra and trig with her from Paris Junior College at Greenville. She actually cares about her students, and helps you succeed. She does everything in her power to help you understand what she is teaching and makes it very interesting.
                
                   Very fun class. Loved the teacher, she was extreemly helpfull.
                
                   Awesome instructor-already commented on Math 1314-same for dual credit trig. Helpful, offers ways to bring your grade up if you are motivated, very clear instructor that goes the extra mile!
                
                   Love! So helpful, always offers ways to get extra credit and has study group meetings to help when needed. Math is not my favorite, but she made it so much more bearable. I feel so fortunate that she was my dual credit math instructor!
                
                   it was ok
                
                   Groovy.
                
                   She was the BEST math teacher I have ever had. Ms. Bunch explains everything step-by-step and goes over every possible way to solve a problem. Attendance is important, but Ms. Bunch will work with you if you have a valid reason for missing. Also, if her pace is too slow, she allows you to work on your homework during class time. GREAT TEACHER!
                
                   Enthusiastic.
                
                   Ms. Bunch is an amazing teacher!  She thoroughly covers the material, never makes an assumption that you already know something.  She will go the extra mile to help you understand the material.  If you are math-phobic, this is the teacher for you, she will be sure you understand it one way or another!
                
                   Prof. Bunch was great to work with, she has a great personality and it puts everyone at ease. She explained the material very clearly and made sure we all all understood it. I believe that she went above and beyond what was required of her in teaching the class. Most college professors do not care or try as hard as she did to reach us.
                
                   Prof. Bunch was great. Math is NOT easy for me but she takes time to explain and help if you don't quite get the concept. She has personality so the class was fun. As long as you attend and participate you should be abe to pass this course fairly easily even if math is hard for you. Just be respectful of her rules or she won't be near as cool!
                
                   Professor Bunch algebra class a great experience, because I was afraid of algebra. She ask me why was I afraid and she taught me how not to be afraid and taught and tutored me in algebra.She did not let me go no question unanswered she made she our class questions was clear. She was great.
                
                   If you need college algebra and you have the opportunity to take Sarah's class you will not regret taking her class. She's the best.
                
                   This was an algebra class that used an on-line textbook to do the work, but she taught the info in class. She will do whatever it takes to help you pass. You must stay involved and not be a problem student, but she is a great teacher!
                
                   Great teacher with a genuine care for her students.
                
                   Great teacher. I would recomend her to everyone.
                
                   She is by far the best teacher I have ever taken!  Very helpful and makes math fun.
                
                   Mrs. Bunch is the greatest math teacher I've ever had. She doesn't just drone on and bore you. She makes as as interesting as math can be and she's really really helpful. She's always there to help and doesn't make you feel dumb for it. She's really funny too. I love her to bits!! If you fail her class you weren't even trying and don't miss class!!
                
                   Dr. B is an extremely helpful teacher! He always responded to my panicked emails with clarity, was understanding when I completely forgot an assignment, and is very excited to help and teach the material. He's the type of teacher that really wants the students to learn the material, instead of just doing busy work. His textbook also helps a lot.
                
                   He gives good notes and doesn't require a textbook. His office hours are very helpful and he explains the material clearly. 
                
                   I took this class online and he hasn't updated any of his notes, videos, or material since 2011. He is extremely vague, lazy, and takes forever to reply to emails. The worst part was that if the syllabus says that a test is over certain chapters its a safe bet that those chapters that you just studied for the test aren't even mentioned. SURPRISE! 
                
                   Things you will need:  life vest, $200.00+, and a tutor. Ms. Beck teaches in absentia and uses a third-party vendor for the course.  Expect to buy an expensive calculator and never use the book.  Her help via email is useless and she is selective on which emails to answer.  Good luck!
                
                   Ok, I took her at PJC but she was so good I have to give her a review. I HATE algebra but she made it better. She is the best math teacher I have EVER had and is close to one of the best teachers I've ever had. If you actually want to understand take from her.
                
                   THE BEST MATH TEACHER TO EVER COME THROUGH COMMERCE!!! THE REST OF THE TEACHERS UGH! I LOVE HER SHE WORKS WITH YOU AND EXPLAINS THINGS GREAT! I WISH SHE COULD COME BACK!
                
                   Had taken and failed algebra 4 times, passed it with a B taking it with her. Need I say more&#63;
                
                   She explains algebra in a very easy to understand way. Probably the best math teacher I have had.
                
                   this is the best math class i have ever been to , i really enjoyed how she clarrified the study of math for us .
                
                   Heather is the best math teacher I have ever had! She explains things perfectly, and is always willing to help!
                
                   DO NOT BUY A TEXTBOOK she doesnt like them! if you take 141 and she doesnt supply the worksheets, find someone with a book and copy all the hw pages..she gives them out at beginning of semester.  I got over a 100 on every test I took and I absolutely hate algebra, TAKE BURKHAM!! :-)
                
                   I loved her, she was easy to find for help outside the classroom, she explained concepts well with examples
                
                   Ms. Burkham is an tremendous Professor of Mathematics, as she is helpful, available, and thorough, while explaining the complexity of alegbra in an every day language.  I loved her class, math was very hard for me...she gave it a new twist!!!!  TAKE BURKHAM!!!!
                
                   good and explains really well if you aren't too hot in math but it is a sleeping class if you know how to do algebra:&gt;)
                
                   She was AMAZING!!! She's probably the best teacher I had in my Fall semester. She makes it easier and helps us to understand it better. She does a great job.
                
                   She's really helpful and makes this REALLY easy!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   heather's a MUST have...! she makes math easy... =)
                
                   best math teacher i've ever had... makes everything easy to understand and perfectly clear...
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Get this teacher if you can! I finally passed math and it wasn't difficult.
                
                   she is great!!! I am going to pass college algebra this semester. Take heather if you ever get a chance.
                
                   Definately one of a kind. She makes math seem interesting, and can get across the concepts through all of our thick skulls. Definately THE BEST!!!
                
                   What can I say&#63;  She teaches Math and does such in everyday language.  I took college algebra several times at community college and dropped because it was too hard and confusing.  I passed this course.  NO MORE MATH!!!!!!!    Take her class, you won't regret it.  Thanks Heather!!!!!
                
                   a great teacher. one of the best i had, he cares about his studnts.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She is a Math professor, HRD and social justice is not her strength and on top of it she made me feel small and worthless, something that one doesn't expect to feel in a graduate class.
                
                   This class is solely on proofs, so there was not a lot of enthusiasm. There was no textbook, but she provided all of the material we needed online. If you want to do good in the class, show up. I feel like some of the class was vague but what you get in each class is what is on the exam.
                
                   She is not really helpful, and she makes you feel dumb. Have to learn the material on your own from the book. She does not lecture only takes questions. Assigns easy problems but test questions are harder. Quizzes every week and a lot of online homework.
                
                   Easy class if you pay attention to her.
                
                   I'm in the experimental class and it is tough. I've always been good at math, but this is a different concept. She is helpful during class, but the material is hard to comprehend because we learn through lecture videos while doing activities during class.
                
                   This isn't true for all of her classes, but if you're stuck in one of her &quot;experimental online&quot; classes, you are pretty much on your own. We had to watch her looong lectures online, then be expected to know everything. My advice- take this class at a community college!! Because you don't know if you'll be getting an &quot;experimental&quot; class or not.
                
                   Seems like she genuinely cares about student learning. The class wasn't that bad considering the subject matter. Attendence not mandatory but necessary if you intend to make a decent grade.. assuming you're not a genius.
                
                   He jumped around a lot chapter-wise. Basically had to study chapters beforehand on your own, the textbook and solutions became my new best friend. Was a week behind in my class. Dreaded homework because learned material as short as one day before homework was due. Used multiple sources that made class confusing (WebAssign, book, Maplets notes).
                
                   Yasskin is a mediocre professor. He doesn't post grades online, so it's hard to know what you have in the class. He only has 2 midterms, unlike most profs who have 3. This can really screw you over if you mess up 1 or both of them. His lectures are confusing, as he writes on the board in a disorganized way. He's not the worst 251 prof here.
                
                   He's not a terrible teacher, but his exams and homework are hard.  They have nothing to do with each other.  He doesn't take attendance every day, but he does call on people during the class to answer and if you aren't there, he takes off points.  I was luckily never called on and I went to every class. The textbook is a reference, but needed later
                
                   Terrible... Test are not similar to his teaching.
                
                   RUN! He' s a terrible professor...
                
                   I would not take his class; look for a better professor to take this course with. His final exam was so hard and really long like all his other exams are. He thinks students are as smart as he is and gives really tough challenging questions. Overall, I would advice you to not take his class.
                
                   He uses a lot of projects in 253, and they are your only hope of keeping your grade up since his tests are ridiculous -- especially the final. If you study hard, show up to every class, and don't completely ruin one of the projects, you might survive. Maybe. 
                
                   He seems like he tries to avoid students that need help. In a class like linear algebra that is unacceptable. Will humiliate you in class if you don't understand something he thinks is easy. There is no feedback on the homework; simply do it, get a grade.
                
                   Straight forward. For honors section he used the common exams but made his own final. One drawback for his engineering math class is that he doesn't teach Matlab. Instead, he uses Maple.
                
                   It honestly sounds like hes talking to himself out loud when he teaches, more or less rambling. He has an accent, so its even more difficult to understand him. Get a chegg account and youll be just fine though. His homework problems are identical from the book, so you can work solutions from the book on chegg and figure it out.
                
                   Has a lot of knowledge and is very helpful. But, it is not easy to understand his accent
                
                   This is the worst professor I've ever had. Please do not take him if you want to learn & succeed. His notes are scribbles in which he writes in bright colors. He goes over problems that are that won't be on the exam and makes stupid jokes. Be prepared to teach yourself. I made an A in the class by teaching myself & looking at other prof's notes. 
                
                   Do not get him!!! He made the final 100% free response and decided to count the whole problem wrong the second you make one mistake. Not to mention, when he posted the solutions to his practice final, they contained countless errors and mistakes. His lectures are hard to follow and many people do not attend. 
                
                   He gets off topic and goes on rabbit trails. I spent more time correcting him than learning and stopped going all together and went to a different professor. He gives really difficult quizzes compared to other professors. He isn't horrid but I wouldn't recommend it if you have another choice, Aurispa is AMAZING!
                
                   Dr. White is not the best professor because he is not thorough in his explanations of problems. Out of the approximately 100 people in his lecture, only 20 attend because it is not very helpful. If he stayed on topic and worked through every problem (including all steps) he would be much better. Go to office hours for help. Really good 1on1.
                
                   This is the worst professor I have had in my entire academic career. His lectures are pointless to attend as he goes over "real world" problems that are never on the test. When he does try to cover the material in the curriculum, he does not finish solving the problem nor explain how to do it. His notes are chicken scratch and incomprehensible. NO!
                
                   I wish I could give him zeros. If you get stuck with this guy as your prof, bless your heart. Don't even bother going to lecture because it's not worth your time. His notes are disorganized and messy. He comes to class unprepared and makes crude and inappropriate jokes to seem "cool". Just don't sign up for his class. Seriously. Don't.
                
                   A typical lecture from Jacob White consists of a vaguely scribbled new concept, 2 even more vague examples,  answering of an off-topic question for 10 minutes, taking another 10 minutes to look up things related to it, cracking a junior-high level joke and laughing hysterically for the next 3 problems, then finally releasing class 20 minutes early.
                
                   -homework is due on a different daytime every week -lectures end 20 minutes early nearly every time, which sounds good but means he can't even teach the entire period -final is all open-ended questions -he gets distracted in lectures and looks up pointless things completely unrelated to math (Star Wars, the Golden Gate Bridge, etc)
                
                   I am not exaggerating when I say the Jacob White is the worst professor I have had during my time at Texas A&M. His Webassign HW has inconsistent due dates ranging  from 3pm to midnight on any day of the week, he is extremely unprepared and unequipped to teach in his lectures, and his final was all free response questions. Do NOT take Jacob White
                
                   I stopped regularly attending his class after the first exam. I really didn't learn anything in his lectures and depended on other professor's online notes. Examples done during class often had answers that couldn't be solved by hand. He depends a lot on Wolfram Alpha which gets annoying because you can't use it on exams (obviously).
                
                   I would NOT recommend Ms Webster. She is not a good teacher. Her class average on her Test are failing. I am sure LOTS more comments will come in after everyone's grades come out. I am only trying to help others out and warn them. She doesnt review everything that is put on her test.
                
                   An excellent teacher
                
                   Dr. Shiu has a wonderful teaching style. I took her 415 class and the best part was whenever we get to a proof of a theorem: instead of just writing it on the board for the class to copy down, she had us participate in writing it by asking us at each step what to do next. Go to her office hours! She definitely cares about whether or not you learn.
                
                   Dr. Shatalov truly cares whether or not you learn how to write proofs correctly - that's why she's a tough grader on homework (this sort of drilling makes a HUGE difference when you're taking MATH 409 or 415). She's not as bad about the exams, though. As for the paper, do take it seriously- she gives a TON of feedback on it throughout the semester
                
                   Do not count Dr. Shatalov out just because of her accent; she is an amazing professor and makes even the most mundane proofs interesting. You get used to her accent very quickly, and if you actually bother to talk to her she is very sweet and personally cares about how you are doing. She grades homework harsh, but her tests often end up pretty easy
                
                   At the beginning of the semester I hated this class but towards the end it kind of grew on me. Notes are so clear. DO YOUR HOMEWORK, it helps I swear. The quizzes help a lot. DON'T BS THE TERM PAPER! It matters! Do all the practice tests and review homework and quizzes to study for the tests and you'll do fine. But be prepared to work for that A.
                
                   She has a thick russian accent, and counts off for literally anything she can find. weekly homework and quizzes. I would never take her again. I would go to her office hours for homework write down EXACTLY what she told me, then when she graded it she would count off points.
                
                   She is a pretty harsh professor. She's not very patient when it comes to questions, and often interrupts you if you ask a questions. She expects you to come to office hours and gets mad if you don't. Homework is graded hard, and you have to spend a lot of time on the homework. 
                
                   She has a very strong accent so it's kinda hard to understand her and when she works problems she skips a lot of steps and she goes really fast so it's kinda hard to keep up with her
                
                   Very helpful professor, especially during office hours. You will not regret taking this class with her. 
                
                   She is so helpful and sweet. Her class is very organized. Definitely reccomend. If you go to class, do her work, and study, this is an easy a.
                
                   Very helpful professor. Super nice. I highly recommend her.
                
                   She only has two projects and 3 tests, all pretty easy if you understand the material. Homework is optional and I only did them as practice right before the tests as practice. Some people really struggled, but this class seemed easy to me and I normally wouldn't consider myself a "math person."
                
                   She assigns a two part project where she offers her feedback if you email her before the due date, but she doesn't give much feedback. There are 3 tests plus a final and you have to know your stuff as the test is mostly open answer. The homework is optional and not for a grade but if you want to do well on the tests, I suggest you do it.
                
                   Print your class notes and bring to class. Go to class. Don't daze off in class. If you do all of this, you should be good. After getting a 97 on the first test, I got a bit cocky, stopped paying attention, and received a 62 on the third one. She is very sweet and so eager to help you understand. She's a great professor, just pay attention. 
                
                   She is a very nice professor. However, she did not help  students who struggled really bad in the class. Week in reviews were not as helpful as I thought they would be. Expect to know a lot from high school and the concepts were not explained at all. Basically you are teaching yourself.  Find a tutor to help you!
                
                   She is a good teacher but you do have to go to class all the time or you will get very behind. she sometimes doesn't explain things all the way though, you will have to find a tutor to help you. her week-in reviews don't help that much but you can go into office hours and she will help you there. 
                
                   She is a great teacher and cares about her students. She has Week in Review, and office hours. She wants you to pass.
                
                   By far my favorite teacher I have. I'm taking MATH 150 and she explains concepts so easily! gives many resources if you are stuck such as WIR and streaming videos! Get her!!!!
                
                   I would not recommend her to anyone. Quizzes are graded ridiculously. You will get half off of a question for forgetting an equal sign even if the answer and the rest of the work is correct. It does not really seem like Sherry cares whether or not her students learn- let alone pass.
                
                   This was my favorite class of freshman year. She does give homework, but it's not a waste of time. If you just study the homework, you'll kill the tests. You have to go to class just to take the occasional quiz, but you really don't need to take notes. She has so many video solutions online. There's no reason not to get a B or higher in this class.
                
                   Take Dr. Scarborough!!! She's the best professor I've ever had, and I've never even had a math teacher I barely liked. She's so sweet and truly cares that all of her students understand when she's lecturing, notes are very straightforward, the online hw is usually a piece of cake. Pop quizzes catch you off guard sometimes & tests are a little tough
                
                   Dr. Scarborough is an incredible teacher. No complaints whatsoever! She really cares and goes way above and beyond her job description. She makes a ton of extra resources like Streaming Videos. Don't skip class though.
                
                   love this woman!!
                
                   She is the nicest professor ever and truly wants everyone to do well. It's a math course, so you need to go to class to be able to understand the material. Tests are hard, but she gives a lot of resources for practice problems. 
                
                   She is very kind and goes above and beyond to understand your questions and "math misconceptions" however she moves very quickly through lectures. The homework was not overly difficult and I highly recommend doing the practice homework along side the actual homework. The tests are tough, but they are both open ended and multiple choice which helps!
                
                   Great professor and taught the information well for the most part. Gave 5 points extra credit on each test just for following directions. Always there if you needed help. I would definitely recommend her again.
                
                   Very nice and helpful.  It can be a hard class if you're bad at math like I am.
                
                   I thought i would understand math, but she excepted you to know most of the material from high school.
                
                   This class was awful. The subjects discussed have no utility whatsoever. No concepts taught only lost lists of functions that are task specific; and tasks that you will never do. Take a different math class. Teacher however isn't bad and will help you. If you can go to office hours do it! Week in reviews are useless.
                
                   She was absolutely wonderful! Her tests weren't bad as long as you studied her notes. If you wanted a little extra clarification, do some practice problems from the book, I thought it helped some. She is eager to help and LOVES teaching. She's not afraid to admit her mistakes and give a bonus opportunity. She has quizzes that are sometimes hard.
                
                   In my class the professor dove right in and wrote fast and furious notes the whole time. The quizzes instead of being good grade boosters for attendance and attentiveness were difficult and sometimes had questions that were from a very small portion of the notes. I felt that even if I worked hard I would not make a good grade in this class.
                
                   Amazing, best precal teacher at a&m, if you dont take her you will regret it! I had friends that took the other teacher and said he wasn't as good: they would come sit in her teaching times and test reviews.
                
                   She is a great teacher and knows the material well. She has plenty of ways of explaining problems and gladly helps those who need help. You must ask her though. She puts a lot of work into the students to make sure that they know and understand the material.
                
                   The only reason I passed this class is because I went to 4.0 and Go tutoring and that helped a lot!! I took this class instead of taking math 142. You can fail every single test but if you get an A on the final you get an A in the class which is cool. If you study for test  or go to tutoring then you will be just fine.
                
                   I had him years ago--can't believe he is still there! if you asked a question his response would be something like &quot;Ahhh girl--you don't study&quot;! I was a B calculus student in highschool.....his english made it impossible to learn anything. he sucked!
                
                   This idiot had absolutely no ability to teach.  He also could not speak the English language after living in the United States for several decades.  I still remember the mass-exodus the first day of class -- only to be deterred by the fact that no other sections were open.  It was a terrible semester for all of us.  Consider this payback, Pu.
                
                   By far one of my best profs in first year. Professor Rainone (or Timmy as he calls himself) is relatively new to the profession, and a new prof at UW. His age makes him very relatable to the class. His lectures are clear, and his answers to questions make plenty sense. The midterm is legendary but if you apply yourself you can pass!
                
                   Very good Professor for someone who is relatively new to the profession. Prof. Rainone has an upbeat attitude and a younger perspective on teaching, which gives him a sense of relate-ability with his students. The content he teaches certainly isn't easy, but he knows that and does fairly well in trying to be flexible for the benefit of students. 
                
                   
                
                   Great T.A.! Wish I could have him for all my courses!
                
                   He's incredibly though, but you really learn a lot! He cares for his students, he's fair and his teaching abilities are fantastic! He's one of the best TA's the math department has to date!
                
                   Amazing! She's always there for any student. I went to office hours like crazy, and she really made sure I understood everything fully. She doesn't teach 152 anymore, but if I had to I would take her again. 
                
                   Dr. Pollock is always there for you. If you need help understanding something she definitely will take the time to explain and help. The tests are not made by her, so they can be tough. I don't think she teaches Math 152 anymore, but I would take any course by her that she teaches in a heartbeat. 
                
                   I'm convinced Prof. Pollock is the best math professor at A&M.  Her lectures are very structured and easy to follow and her sense of humor may actually make you like math.  Loved the bonus on her final: Draw a dragon.  Take her if you can!!!
                
                   Loved her! Best math teacher I've ever had at A&M. Took Differential Equations with her and actually understood the material in comparison to my friends. I would describe her as  a Ms. Frizzle of math (Magic School Bus reference). Very helpful, very understand, very clear with concepts. Gives extra credit assignment. If you can, GET THIS LADY.
                
                   Dr. Pollock was a great professor. I enjoyed her lectures because she made the class less stressful. If you do the book homework you will find that the quiz is exactly the same questions. The tests are common exams, but the final was easy and made by Dr. Pollock. She provides many class examples and will help you with anything.
                
                   Dr. Pollock is super nice and super funny. She's really generous in the sense that she gives extra credit opportunities and curves tests. Sometimes she likes to go into lengthy proofs that aren't really necessary... But other than that, I would take her again if she was teaching the next level math class.
                
                   Awesome prof. Super energetic and seems to actually enjoy giving lectures which is rare for a prof. Highly suggest going to his office hours. I struggled with a topic towards the end of the semester so decided to go to his office hours as a last resort and he was so so helpful. Definitely my biggest regret was not going more often.
                
                   Chris was great. Really helpful guy and the lectures usually weren't too terribly boring. Funny guy with completely fair exams. Definitely recommend him for Calculus 2 as he helped a lot.
                
                   He was a new teacher this past semester and he was great. If you put in the effort this course takes, he will recognize it and help you a lot. Going to office hours makes a huge difference. He will give you ways to improve test scores and show you exactly where you stand. TAKE HIM AND ATTEND OFFICE HOURS.
                
                   Super helpful. One of the best math professors. He'll give you extra credit for going to class. Really really clear and good at explaining things. He's also pretty funny sometimes. Going to office hours saved me. He's super helpful there and will answer and explain things really easily and well. I would highly recommend him. 
                
                   He's really chill and always reviews before tests. His final was very fair and simple. Doing old exams before tests is great practice. I got a 62 on the first exam and still made an A in the class.  He bumps your grade if you attend lecture.
                
                   Good prof. Explains tough concepts well. Super helpful in office hours and doesn't mind answering questions in class. Common exams are nasty but he tries to prepare you well. Good examples in class
                
                   Awful, Awful, Awful...DO NOT TAKE HIM IF AT ALL POSSIBLE. He's from the Ukraine and is hard to understand.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Good lecturer, hard final, lots of homework, has an accent but not incomprehensible
                
                   His tests are really easy, however his lecture is terrible. So if you just go to a the lecture of a different professor you'll be golden.
                
                   NOT a very good class at all! Everyone eventually stops going due to bad grades and they can't really understand him. If you can get a different professor go for it but if not be prepared to study ALOT.
                
                   Dr. Moghbelli knows his stuff but isn't the best at conveying it sometimes because of his accent. Don't take him if it's your first foreign professor. I had a hispanic calc teacher in high school so he wasn't so bad. The tests are easy but you need to study for them!!!
                
                   Strong accent!! Very hard even to a student good at higher level math.
                
                   good guy, will help if u ask him. he does have a strong accent tho...but he knows what he's doin most of the time
                
                   Avoid this Prof, his lectures are incomprehensible and even though he asks &quot;Questions&#63;&quot; he might as well not because he doesn't even understand what people are asking. He uses online homework entirely, and the textbook is online. Pretty much everything he references was made by the other MATH 150 teacher. So many people ended up dropping.
                
                   Not helpful at all, he reads straight from the book and confuses himself at times. Definitely recommend to take it with another person.
                
                   He is very hard to understand.
                
                   Stay away from him for MATH150. Lectures are completely incomprehensible, people don't go half the time because of it. People barely pass the exams. Class average is at the D/F level. He suggests to students that they should drop his class. Go to his office hours for help, he'll make you look stupid instead of helping you. Take Scarborough instead.
                
                   Great guy, but his final was pretty hard. He'll be glad to help you if you approach him, otherwise, just listen to his lectures. This is a hard class to begin with, but i thought his final could've been a little better.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Professor Manuel was an amazing professor. I took his math course and he did a great job explaining every concept clearly but also made a lot of help resources available if you needed help. His lectures are pretty funny and I would definitely take another math class with him. His tests aren't super hard if you know the material.
                
                   Prof. Manuel is one of the best professors that I have had at A&M because he is a clear lecturer, helpful during office hours, and gets papers graded quickly. Tips: If you're going to miss class either tell him ahead of time or attend another session (doing this saved my bacon) and make sure you understand what you missed on old tests/quizzes.
                
                   I loved this professor! Theres HW on WebAssign and 4 exams including a comprehensive final. USE HIS OFFICE HOURS! Just go there to do your HW and he will help you. He's such  great professor because he LOVES to teach "the language of math". By far my fav professor!
                
                   Professor Manuel really seemed to care about his students and our understanding of the material. His Week-in-Review's and office hours were very helpful for online homework and preparing for tests. Although his lectures are long, he keeps your attention. Professor Manuel is a great math professor!
                
                   I love Mr. Manuel. He is such a sweet man and truly cares about his students' success. There are 4 tests and a ton of quizzes and homework to bring your grade up. This class definitely wasn't an easy A, but he is super willing to help if you go into office hours, and there are help sessions every night. He also lowkey rocks the pony tail.
                
                   Great professor. Should have gotten an A, but did not take advantage of office hours/week-in review. Tests are not easy, but he provides all notes online to study. He is a great guy, lively, and cracks the occasional joke. Definitely would take again with him. 
                
                   He clearly cares a lot about his students' well-being and understanding. He's kind and always willing to answer any questions, no matter how specific, broad, or simple. He also offers extra credit in his tests if you read carefully, and he makes himself extremely accessible to students through office hours.
                
                   Really cool guy! He is very smart, and sometimes surprises you! But a great over all teacher. Assigns weekly homework and tests are not hard but you need to read carefully! Attending class is important but not necessary, but if you don't show up, good luck understanding the material. Very thorough guy! He really wants you to understand the material
                
                   Very condescending, doesn't understand how we might be having trouble.
                
                   Makes lecture entertaining, weekly homework and quiz, tests are somewhat challenging but straight from the book. Would definitely recommend
                
                   He is a great professor. Really cares about the students. Class participation is manditory for the class, but this also allows for a little extra credit. The online help he gives is pretty good too.
                
                   Great professor!! Attendance is not mandatory but he will be more likely to curve your grade at the end of the semester if you have good attendance. He speaks very loudly and keeps your attention. Cares how you do and if you learn! Difficult class, but he is very reasonable and helpful as long as you show up and care about the class!
                
                   Great professor, makes everything very clear, his voice is really loud which makes you keep your attention.There are daily clicker quizzes, weekly take home quizzes, and weekly homework. Quizzes are really easy, they are always related to what you just did on the homework. Exams tend to be hard, take notes, make practice problems do to well
                
                   Great professor! Can be a little quirky, but he kept everything very organized and offered a ton of additional resources. His methods were a lot like the ones I learned at tutoring, which means they're probably the best way. It's still a difficult class, but he at least shows interest in you doing well.
                
                   Great professor. Extremely nice and energetic. Will keep your attention and genuinely wants to help you learn. Excellent prof!
                
                   He's a great professor. His jokes are somewhat corny and he has a crazy way of remembering rules, but they grab your attention and make you want to listen. He's fairly straightforward. I would definitely take his class again, very fun guy.
                
                   he does communicate very well and he's got a loud voice and lecture with his enthusiasm. Sometimes throw out pop quizs
                
                   His voice is very audible in the lecture hall, and he enunciates each word very clearly. The exams are somewhat challenging, but he does teach very well.
                
                   He has a vague outline for his lessons, he rarely is prepared, and he often makes mistakes and has to go back and correct himself, which confuses the whole class.
                
                   What can I say, hes an interim professor. Goes over the material 20 min before class and teaches in a very confusing way. I've never had calc so I basically taught myself.  I literally got nothing out of the lecture. He's hilarious though in a weird way so at least he was entertaining if anything else. Also he's really good in office house
                
                   okay so, this guy can't teach. He knows the concepts of the course, but he doesn't know the formulas by heart or the steps to solve certain types of problems or anything like that. Just doesn't know how to teach the material. He is always unprepared for each class and figures it out as he goes. I love math and he made it suck.
                
                   Be prepared for some awkward anecdotes and jokes that don't really make sense in English.  He's Russian.
                
                   Overall I thought Alex was a good prof. I do agree that his lectures were very theory based, however I love math and enjoyed his lectures. If you really pay attention and take what you learn in class and do a lot of PRACTICING on your own, you will be fine. But like a lot of other other reviews, his lectures can be very boring. Go to his office too
                
                   He was very theoretical based and didn't understand the test material. He teaches poorly and in a confused matter. Helpful and cares about his students but not very clear
                
                   He was one of the worst teachers I have had so far. He is an extremely tough grader and does not curve his class. He focuses his lectures on the theory behind what you are doing rather than actually learning how to solve homeworktest questions. He did not prepare you for the common exams at all. His notes were useless for studying and he is rude.
                
                   If you get him, switch out immediately.  The grade you get is the grade you get, i.e. if you have an 89.99 you'll have a B. He does not curve. His final matched NOTHING he reviewed over. If you got a 5 on your AP, TAKE THE CREDIT.
                
                   He spends one hour proving theories and fifteen minutes solving problems. His lectures don't prepare you at all for the common exams, so don't expect to get much out of them. Also, his final was really hard so it was impossible to raise the grade and don't expect him to curve because he won't.
                
                   He teaches primarily on theory, which does nothing for you for the common exams or the final. He can't answer a lot of the problems we ask because of the strong language barrier. 
                
                   Very nice guy, always has jokes but gets off topic often. Very smart and good at his job, but goes fast when explaining things. If you ask him to explain he will very politely. Overall good teacher if you like math
                
                   Not sure if he still teaches because he left halfway through the semester, but if he's back you should definitely take him. Funny guy and very approachable and a great teacher. Understands that not everyone loves math and wants to be a math major
                
                   He was a very boring lecturers. The average on his tests were always like a 62 or 63 and he never curved anything. The only thing I found good about him was that whenever you go to his office hours he is helpful.
                
                   I took him for calculus 2 and 3, and when I came in on the first day of class, he greeted me by name (I had never introduced myself). He even wrote a recommendation for me for a summer program. He may be a dry lecturer, but he thinks he is hilarious... which is hilarious :) Nicest guy ever, totally take his class.
                
                   He is still fairly boring, and he does try to be funny, but I've never had a quiz from him. I'm sure the fact that my class meets first thing in the morning on TR doesn't help, but whatever. 10 problems out of the book are due every week. We had 4 tests and a final and the tests were general easy or simple compared to homework problems
                
                   He's somewhat funny but very boring. He gives quizzes which don't really have to do with the homework.
                
                   If you aren't extremely strong in math DO NOT take Lewis. She seems like a sweet lady but can not teach at all. Most of the time she spends half the class going over one example then realizes she doesn't even know how to solve it. Super hard to follow. I was in tutoring all the time. When I went to her for help she said sorry q drop my class.
                
                   Nice lady, awful teacher. I don't have a very good math foundation from high school, so I flunked the class. For the most part, I didn't knew what was going on, and I don't think the professor did either. She's extremely unorganized when it comes to solving problems or grading stuff.
                
                   Dr. Lewis was a terrible teacher. I barely made a C in her class. I was constantly going to tutoring and office hours every week and never understood anything. She was never clear in class and confused everyone. She even confused herself in class and never knew how to do any problems. She was also very unorganized. Do not take Lewis. DO NOT!!!!!!!!
                
                   One of the worst teachers I've ever had in my life. She was a really nice lady, but a terrible teacher. I had to go to tutoring every week just so I could pass with a C. I'm not very math smart, but I knew it wasn't just me having this problem when the tutoring rooms would become PACKED with her students. Do yourself a favor and don't take Lewis.
                
                   Professor Lewis is really nice and you can tell that she wants her students to succeed, but she's not great at helping them do so. She often messes up while doing problems in front of the class and she sometimes will start an entirely different problem without telling anyone. I only got an A because I studied a lot outside of class.
                
                   Jennifer is a really sweet lady, but is not a good professor. She constantly has to redo problems and often confuses herself. She is better one on one in office hours but is difficult to understand in class. Tests are usually a lot harder than reviews. Go to the week in reviews to help you understand. I only did well because I am good at math.
                
                   She has reviews that are extremely similar to the test. If you do the review, you should get a very high c, or even a low B minimum! If you are struggling and want to get a higher grade, go to TutorJohns! I did and I got a 100 in the class. I don't know why people hated her so much, from what I heard, she's the best teacher. Go to her office hours!
                
                   Came into this course thinking it would be easy, boy was I wrong. I found myself confused 70% of the time because 80% of the time she would make a mistake somewhere. Sweet lady though.
                
                   I would not recommend this professor to anybody. I found concepts very confusing and hard to understand due to her teaching methods. The wording of the quizzes and tests is very difficult to understand. I had to have a friend with another professor explain to me all of the concepts after every single class.
                
                   Do not take this prof if you can't teach yourself math. She doesn't tell you key information about most of the things she "teaches" you. She lets her quizzes be take home quizzes but that doesn't matter when the tutors can't even figure out the questions. Very unhelpful professor 
                
                   Tutoring and understanding when life was rough saved my gpa.
                
                   Professor Lewis is super sweet. Although she gets a little confusing during class, she puts all notes online. She gives extra credit opportunities with easy "take-home" quizzes  or problems. She's always asking the class if they understand, so if you have a question- ask. She usually can clarify. I'd take again.
                
                   Prof. Lewis is a super sweet woman, but she's getting a tad old and that may be affecting her teaching a bit... I would really only recommend her to people who understand math well already. She is obviously intelligent, but sometimes can't get the concepts across right. If you struggle with math, go to someone who is more clear. 
                
                   Avoid Lewis at all costs! I went from AP Calculus into this class and the material itself is not difficult, if she would actually teach it to you. You're completely teaching yourself out of the book and she's confused most of the time. The homework and quizzes are easy since they're take-home, but don't prepare you for the test at all. 
                
                   She's an awful professor. She never seems to know what she's talking about. Half way through class she'll realize everything she's done is wrong and she'll start over, so basically we learned nothing that day. The homework is pretty doable but you have to teach yourself how to do it and doesn't help for the tests. Avoid this professor.
                
                   She is a nice lady but an awful professor. Has trouble working out examples for the class and often does them incorrectly. She takes questions from her students but is frequently unable to answer them. This class is primarily self taught because she wastes a lot of class time trying to correct her own grading mistakes on tests and quizzes. 
                
                   This class is fairly difficult with any professor, so she isn't much different than anyone else. She is pretty funny and sweet, but can be a bit confusing sometimes. As long as you do the homework and test reviews you should be fine. I had to go to all the Week-in-Reviews to understand the material in the course, but it is not impossible
                
                   Lectures are very confusing. She makes many mistakes every class when going over problems (typically all she did was go over example problems). I had trouble understanding what was happening throughout the whole semester
                
                   She's kind of confusing at times and gets confused herself when doing a problem. 
                
                   Super nice lady but not a very good teacher in class and I think it's because she gets nervous by huge classes. However she's way WAY more helpful in her office hours so go to her if you have a problem. Her tests are easy if you know your material so go to tutoring and do the recommended problems in the book and you should be fine. 
                
                   Dr. Lahodny is a great professor and is always willing to answer your questions. He's very good at explaining all of the concepts in lecture. His tests are pretty tough though, if you want to do well you pretty much have to do ALL of the assigned homework. If you want an A you'll have to work for it, but it's definitely not impossible.
                
                   Although I took calc in high school, Dr. Lahodny was very easy to follow. He's very easy to understand and will explain things as many times as he needs to. He's genuinely nice and will never make you feel stupid for asking about something you don't understand. The quizzes are straight from the optional homework.
                
                   Dr. Glenn is very clear in lectures.  He genuinely cares about the success of his students and is EXTREMELY helpful in office hours.  If you do not understand something he will help.  The homework is only suggested and the lab assignments are with partners.  The tests are just like the quizzes and notes.  I would HIGHLY recommend him as a prof.
                
                   Lahodny is an awesome prof. He is clear and works so everyone can follow his work. He has a good sense of humor and likes to connect with his students. I highly recommend!! He gives easy quizzes and is a lot of hep in his office hours.
                
                   Dr. Lahodny is the best professor I have had at A&M. He is very thorough in his explanations and is very helpful. He did a great job preparing students for the common exams and always had a class average higher than the other professors. I would recommend him for any class. 
                
                   Glenn is very nice and clear! He is willing to explain as many times as he needs to. His lectures aren't boring and he has notes online as well. He is a very approachable professor and wants everyone to understand and do well. MATH 152 is when quite a few people start to struggle with calc but if he is an option for professor, he's your best bet!
                
                   He's kind of disorganized and graded my first exam with the wrong key. Skips office hours sometimes. But very nice as a person and clear when teaching.
                
                   He is a really nice professor who seems to genuinely care about his students. His lectures go slow because he wants everyone to understand the topic, which is nice. He doesn't make the tests, but I was prepared for them by doing the homework. I would definitely take him again. 
                
                   He is an AMAZING professor. He is extremely clear in his explanations and takes time to make sure you understand the material completely before moving on. If you do good on the quizzes (one every week) then you will do good on the test. He also is very good at communication outside of lectures if you need anything! I would highly recommend him!
                
                   Really wants you to learn! Hard to understand at times but will repeat because he understands you don't understand.
                
                   Took his class his first semester at TAMU. Was always willing to clarify in lecture/office hours. Definitely knows his stuff, lectures are easy to follow but notes are not available for missed lectures. Exams are common exams so much harder than the homework, but the homework definitely helps your grade and practice for the exam.
                
                   I had Kordek for MATH 152 his first semester at A&M. Young guy, but definitely knows his stuff. All of the lectures were on a whiteboard, so you better be there if you want the notes. A good lecturer, who is very enthusiastic about math. He never takes himself too seriously. Stop by his office hours if you can, he was always willing to help.
                
                   If you have a basic knowledge of math, this class will be exceptionally easy. I may have missed one test question all year.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Terrible teacher. GET OUT if you get her!
                
                   He's surely a nice guy and unlike other people, I find his teaching methods useful.
                
                   Thinks in a complicated manner and his teaching reflects that. His final was much harder than others. 
                
                   He did a poor job of explaining things. Even though I took calculus in high school, I would still get confused occasionally because of the way he presented topics. i could tell he wanted to help us (the class before an exam was always a review), but  he struggles to simplify his lectures. He'll make this class difficult for those without experience
                
                   I really hope you took calculus in high school. He's a really nice guy, and funny sometimes. Just over-explains to the point of us forgetting what we're actually trying to solve, when it's simple. Frustrating, just be selective in what you spend time writing down in  class. Do the homework too, that's the only way to prepare for exams. 
                
                   Honestly, I feel like I unlearned calculus from what I learned in high school. He's a great guy, but his teaching in general is awful. Literally, our class size went from 150 to 35 due to his incompetence in teaching to students who aren't mathematicians. In addition, his final review was ridiculously harder than any test we've taken so far.
                
                   Overall he's a nice guy. He genuinely knows what he's talking about, but that's the problem. Only he knows. As a student it is very hard to follow his style of teaching. Most of the student's taking the course have most likely taken calculus in high school and that is probably the only reason they pass. He doesn't answer the questions you ask...
                
                   I have taken Calculus before and I had no Idea what he was saying.  He very often gets off track and then gets the whole class confused. His accents not too bad but he's very scatterbrained and often gets the whole class confused.  He never seems to understand whats someone is asking when questions are asked in class he never answers them fully. 
                
                   looks as if she just rolled out of bed every day. Says cool, cool over and over 300 times per class.  goes way to fast, and only explains problems partially.
                
                   I LOVED HER. She was very interactive with students. If anyone had a question, she made sure to repeat everything she just did. She always made class fun. SO MUCH MATERIAL per TEST. It was hard to keep up with all the formulas, but if you study, you should do fine. Tests were very straightforward, & she gave lots of partial credit
                
                   Jaclyn knew my name, spoke loudly and clearly, and knew what she was talking about. She didn't just spit information at you either . She taught interactively and answered all questions before moving on.  The type of prof you want all your profs to be. Class was hard but extra credit left me with an A! If you have the option of taking her class, do.
                
                   Jaclyn is funny and super helpful. I love math so I really enjoyed her class and she offered many extra credit opportunities, dropped our lowest grades, and is always wanting the best for her students! You have to work hard but it's all worth it in the end! TAKE THIS CLASS FROM HER!!
                
                   Ms. Kessler is a hilarious person, but the actual class was hard. She is available to help and actually makes the effort to learn students names. 
                
                   I definitely didn't put in as much effort as I could've but I passed. The class is easy compared to most math classes but it gets gradually harder. Jaclyn's very nice and being in class is not so bad. She offers LOTS of help outside of class but she's a tough grader. I enjoyed having her as a prof.
                
                   Jaclyn is awesome! If you learn math by seeing lots of examples then this is the class for you.  Test questions are usually all from Web Assign, or the office hour sessions.  TEXTBOOK IS FREE! Quizzes you can work with partners! Come to class to get notes! Jaclyn knows everyone's names and is super friendly and makes the class interesting!  
                
                   She was a terrible prof. It was her first semester teaching 147 and she made a lot of mistakes and wasn't helpful at all in office hours. She doesn't care about her students doing well. Don't expect any help from a curve although her test averages are in the 50s she does't seem to care.
                
                   I thought she was a good professor. She went fast during lectures but you can tell her to slow down, also there is so much material that she has to go fast. She is super nice and learns your name quick! If you take this class you well be successful if you attend her office hours! Even if you don't have a question go in and listen to other students.
                
                   didn't mind her, ya you need to go to class bc she gives a lot of quizzes/ take home assignments and whatnot, but I liked that bc it definitely helped my grade out! tests are relatively straightforward the only catch is she is a pretty tough grader! overall I didn't find the course to be too challenging and I thought she was a helpful/ average prof
                
                   SHE IS AWESOME!!! People who are rating her bad either did not apply themselves or did not attend class. Kessler is VERY helpful if you take the time to ask her questions and go to her week in reviews! I recommend her to everyone.. definitely my favorite teacher at A&M so far.
                
                   She makes a lot of mistakes in class, she has notes online but those are not helpful on the tests. She does not explain Calculus concepts well, and the homework is easy compared to the common exams. The book, is riddled with errors, lack of explanation and terrible solution manual. She is a nice lady and  and will help you out, but thats it.
                
                   Kessler is unable to explain concepts in plain English so that students who arent math-minded can understand.  She told us WHAT to do, not WHY we do it or HOW one concept relates to or builds on another. Her tests were INSANE & meant to trick and confuse--much harder than the quizzes or HW. I needed tutoring AND audited another math class to pass!
                
                   She is super helpful and is always open to questions. Her notes are fill in the blank. She tries to buffer your grade as much as possible. Go to class, a lot of times she has in class activities that count toward your grade. Overall a good, kind and understanding teacher.
                
                   Great teacher and learns your name quickly and really wants to help the students pass. She has so many extra credit assignments. No book needed! Homework required in EVERY math class, so deal with it. Tests are not impossible and she provides partial credit. Loved her as a professor. Would take her again!
                
                   Kessler is AMAZING! All the other reviews are negative because it was her first semester teaching. I took her class during summer session 1. She helps ALOT and her class is FUN. She has office hours everyday and stays to help you, even on homework. Her class/tests are not impossible. I would take her again and again. SHE IS AWESOME!
                
                   The tests did not match anything you had been given an opportunity to practice in class.
                
                   Her explanations in class were clear and she answers questions completely.  I didn't have any trouble following her lectures and notes.  The homework is difficult, but it prepares you for the tests well.  She sorta treats the class like a high school class but she is concerned about her students.
                
                   The homework she assigned does not go along with the material she teaches. Also the lectures are not clear nor datailed. She likes to teach the surface and you come into her office hours to learn the details. I would avoid her class and get another professor or get it transfered from another college like Blinn.
                
                   I think this was her first semester teaching Math 166 and it showed. Her lectures are long, boring, and useless in preparing you for tests. I Q-dropped because I know I couldn't have passed with her as my professor. Think carefully before taking a class of hers.
                
                   He's a good teacher. He cares about your needs in mathmatics and likes questions. He seems a little quiet but he knows his stuff.
                
                   Dr. Kanschat was very nice and his tests weren't unreasonable for a 400-level class. He's always willing to help, although some of the theory can get very tedious and he works very few examples.
                
                   Don't bother going to lecture, Dr. Ikenmeyer will copy the textbook onto the board from the pages he brings every time. No quizzes in lecture. He's difficult to understand, not bc of his accent, but bc of his teaching method. You're better off learning on YouTube. 3 Exams are common, use the previous exams to study for those. SUPER EASY final!!
                
                   Don't bother going to lecture, Dr. Ikenmeyer will copy the textbook onto the board from the pages he brings every time. No quizzes in lecture. He's difficult to understand, not bc of his accent, but bc of his teaching method. You're better off learning on YouTube. 3 Exams are common, use the previous exams to study for those. SUPER EASY final!
                
                   Very strong german accent, tends to get excited during lecture and talking very fast which is almost impossible to understand. However, lecture attendance isn't required since he only reads from the book anyway.    Common exams are as to be expected, he doesn't post any grades online, final is easy but NO CURVE AT ALL!
                
                   Doug clearly knows what he is talking about. He simply can't communicate effectively. Everything that comes out of his mouth seems to be encrypted and only he can decipher it. He constantly makes errors in his proofs and poorly manages the class time. His class is not equipped to be a primary source of learning - so be prepared.
                
                   ROUGH semester. Most 251 students agreed Hensley was the hardest! Expect long webassigns AND difficult paper homeworks every week. But, though I felt like I was failing, he gives a generous amount of curves on the (RIDICULOUSLY HARD) exams. I'll get an A because of the curves, but it truly wasn't worth the crazy work load and stress.
                
                   He is a wonderfully smart person, just has trouble communicating sometimes. He definitely has gotten better through the semester since this was his first semester back to teach. Can be absolutely hilarious in a dad way. Tests are tough but extra credit is built in
                
                   He is pretty cool. He is a visiting professor, but he is a lot better then some of the other professors in the department. It's better to just not go to class then to leave early, he will crucify you. He has web based homework, weekly quizzes, and three exams plus a cumulative final. He also has high expectations, so be ready.
                
                   This class was rough. He is very confusing and hard to understand. You can't read his handwriting very well at all. He does post notes and lecture notes (that he writes on) online, but there are many discrepancies in the notes and his in-class notes. Go to class as he takes attendance up to 2 times per class period. Take someone else if you can!
                
                   One of the worst professors on campus. Nobody can hear or understand him and he refuses to use a microphone. Repeatedly disrespects and talks down to students. Hard grader, horrible in lectures, and he is the only option for this class.
                
                   He is very confusing during class, makes a lot of errors. Goes by way to fast. He thinks that everyone knows the material already. Do the sample test a couple of times and go over the homework problems. He gives a lot of homework that you actually have to do in paper and turn in. I did the sample test and homework and made high Bs and As on exams.
                
                   He is not a great professor. He does not prepare you for his exams. even if you did the homework that won't be enough to get a C on his exams. If you can stay away from him it would be best . I use to love math but this professor made me hate ti 
                
                   This professor is not an easy professor. He writes reaallyyy fast and teaches even faster. If you want to actually understand what's going on in class, you must go over the material BEFORE you get there, which is hard for Cal 3. He is helpful during office hours, but overall to do well in this class requires hard work and a lot of self-teaching.
                
                   While Professor Gustafson did make some errors sometimes during class, his test were always fair. He did give out curves according to the class average and his in class quizzes and assignments were easy so that it would help your grade. Attendance is kinda mandatory since thats when you take notes and sometimes surprise quizzes.
                
                   Great professor. I have literally put off taking math until my senior year and it hasn't been much of a struggle. Quizzes and homework are a bit time consuming but straightforward as they are very close to the notes he gives in class.
                
                   The guy is a straight baller. He is extremely clear when giving lectures, and the grading criteria is extremely clear. Do the ecampus on time and study hard for the tests and you will get an A.
                
                   At first I was worried to take 141 at A&M, because I heard it was hard, but with him the class didn't seem as hard as everyone said. He gives several extra credit opportunities, the web assign can really boost your grade, and the tests are multiple choice. He is super helpful in his office hours and the week in reviews.
                
                   Math 141 is known to be super hard but Craig Gin definitely wasn't super hard. I would have made an A in the class but I bombed the 3rd exam. He's sarcastic and funny. He goes slow and answers everyone's questions. He also holds a review every Sunday so that's definitely helpful. He's a good choice for a math prof.
                
                   Sweet guy. Helpful, fair, offers extra credit. Has you print out your notes for lectures, but they are very helpful on the weekly homework assignments and weekly take home quizzes. He doesn't curve or bump up your grade. He lectures until the last possible second & never cancels. I would still take him again. Can be a tough class, but he's the best
                
                   Professor Gin was great!! He's helpful, easy to approach, fair, and truly wants his students to be successful. The subject itself can only be so easy however he makes sure that his students have all of the tools they need to do well in the class, but you do have to put in the work! I would definitely take him again! (Also quizzes are take home!!)
                
                   Dr. Gin was the best professor I had this semester. Easily the best MATH 141 professor A&M has to offer. His lectures and notes are very clear and I would highly recommend him to anyone. I wish he taught 142 as well so I could take him again. Weekly homework's and quizzes, but easy to do because the notes are so clear. Excellent professor.
                
                   You really can't go wrong with taking Gin for Math 141. His lecturing style is a bit slow, but he makes sure everyone understands the material instead of just rushing through notes. All of his quizzes are take home and not hard, and the tests are easy if you study for them. Overall a great professor, I would take him again for another class.
                
                   Any Math 141 class is going to be hard and need some effort put into it, but Gin makes the class easier to understand in his lectures. He takes it slow and explains the problem step by step so it's hard to get lost. There is a lot of homework involved but if you do the reviews, week-in-reviews, and study your notes, you will do fine on the exams. 
                
                   The class is not super easy, especially if you aren't too good at math, but if you go to his office hours and ask him for help you will do fine. he will let you do your quizzes and homework at his office hours and you can ask him for help any time you need it. definitely one of the better 141 teachers at A&M
                
                   Dr. Gin was easily the best math 141 teacher out of any of the. A lot of my friends in other classes would look at my notes and go to this week-in-review sessions just to understand what their teachers couldn't get. He goes slowly and makes sure everyone gets the material and really knows what he's talking about. Would absolutely take again.
                
                   He's really good at taking questions and explaining things. He has office hours that are extremely helpful. I'd definitely recommend him and take him again. The material is decently easy but pay attention in class and it will make it much easier. The exams follow the material in the homework and lecture.
                
                   Professor Gin is a great professor and made 141 an easy class. You must go to class to get notes and understand what is going on. All homework and quizzes are take home and the tests are fairly easy if you study. I would take him again in a heart beat because he is always willing to help and makes hard topics easier to understand.
                
                   TAKE GIN! even if you are terrible with math, he makes things simple and easy. Notes are very clear, lectures are very clear. Lots of office hours and help sessions. You can definitely pull an A if you work for it
                
                   He takes a lot of time taking questions from his class of 300 students, which eats up a lot of time. That is really he only negative to his lecture, though. He is a typical instructor and expects you to listen and learn how to apply the notes on your own time. However, he has office hours that are great and will provide help if you ask.
                
                   Very helpful and nice professor! Lectures are not boring and very understandable. He has many opportunities to get help in his office hours and will be more than willing to help. Quizzes and homework are take home and you have a week to finish them. Take him for sure, best 141 professor.
                
                   He explains the lectures really slow and answers all questions. If you do the homework and quizzes (which are a grade) then you should be fine on the test. I haven't had to do any of the extra practices and there is plenty of reviews and tutoring options if you need extra explanation. 
                
                   He is super sweet and helpful! His exams are not bad at all! Would definitely recommend :)
                
                   His class was one of the best I've taken. He makes everything extremely clear in the lectures and if you visit him in office hours or after class, he is always willing to help. I'd definitely take a class by him again. 
                
                   Great professor. Strongly believe he is the best out there for MATH 141. Super nice and funny. Haven't met a student who doesn't like him. Trust me, if you have the option, take him.
                
                   Class was boring. She's scary. She didn't even try to hide her intense dislike for this one guy in our class. She curves a lot. She doesn't seem to know what she's doing sometimes.
                
                   Hateed calculus before the semester...and I still do after the semester.
                
                   I don't like math and have a hard time no matter who the teacher is......but if you go to her, she will help you out alot!
                
                   hard as heck, we had guest teacher a couple of times and I understood for once. 4.0 and go helped me, not garza
                
                   Coming from a CMC student, do NOT take this class. Do everything you can to get out. Language barrier is an issue, tests are really hard, and prof. is hard to talk to and get your questions answered. The worst decision of my freshman year. Causes depression, wrinkles, and anger.
                
                   Now teaches at Claremont Mckenna, watch out for his tests, they can be hard if you aren't prepared
                
                   good teacher, helpful if you ask questions or go to office hours (though he does get lazy sometimes and say 'you do it'..but that can be good). writes CRAZY hard tests though, hard to finish in the time allowed..  better know all your identities and theorems, because he'll put tons in one problem. And he's got impecable fashion. Socks and sandals.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Ben does  a great job getting to know all of his students on a personal level. This really helps in such a large school. He goes quickly through his material, but has no problem answering questions/clarifying. If you don't understand something, ASK! He goes off on tangents sometimes, but they're pretty funny (in a very dry, sarcastic way). 10/10
                
                   He prefers to be called Ben by his students. He's very good at teaching and will go over things when needed. Don't be afraid to ask him questions he will answer them. I made a B, but I skipped often and didn't study. Not an easy A but if you put in the effort you should do well. He likes class participation and gets annoyed if there isn't any.
                
                   Ben was a great teacher! He was interesting to listen to in class and was very approachable if you needed help outside of class. eHomework is due a week after the lesson is taught and there were no quizzes, just tests. I highly recommend Ben because he knows his students by first and last name and genuinely cares about their success/understanding. 
                
                   Want to get at least a B? It is possible! She gives out good notes, and is one of the sweetest professors I know. She makes mistakes now and then but kindly receives feedback from students.
                
                   Not the greatest teacher. She is kind of a cat lady, and sometimes has trouble understanding her own material. Wouldn't recommend her.
                
                   If you fail a test, it is because you are not trying hard enough. She is always willing to help and everything on the test are things you learn in class. She is the only teacher I know who has tried to learn everyone's name in class. She genuinely cares. She does make mistakes on the board sometimes but just kindly correct her. 
                
                   She was very helpful. Do everything she says and you will get an A in the course. 
                
                   Well... When she first introduced herself, she was very kind and seemed to be passionate about her students. I was excited for a fair and bearable course. NOPE. 1/3 of our class got below a 60 on our second test. There's no curve. Don't take her as a professor. 
                
                   Sometimes Mrs. Fry can be a bit crazy and make a few mistakes here and there during lecture, but if you just nicely point it out to her, she gladly looks back over her work and fixes it. She is super sweet and holds office hours to help any students who maybe struggling. Gives extra credit for every test. There is a lot of online homework.
                
                   She does a great job of preparing her students for Math 151
                
                   She gives lectures super fast, doesn't wait for us to finish copying. I went to her office hours a couple of times and she was rude the first time, the second time and the third time she said my grade in front of other students without caring, very disrespectful and rude. A lot of people in my class ended dropping her class. So I do not recommend. 
                
                   Talks really soft, so you can't understand her when shes lecturing and she has kind of a slur. Makes a lot of mistakes, has really small handwriting, so you can barely read what she writes on the projector. Tests are really hard, and no curve. Test material is on a much higher level than the class work. Would definitely recommend taking another prf
                
                   Good teacher but fast paced and moderately scatter brained. I'm still confused in the class but shes very kind. Her office hours are very minimal. Sends too many emails. I don't even read them anymore
                
                   You can tell she is really passionate about math. She is extremely nice and will always help you with your problems. She does a great job of going slow and allowing others to ask questions before moving on. Her tests could be challenging at times but not impossible at all. I would recommend her.
                
                   Dr. Fry was nice, but I felt like her tests were near impossible to get an A on. She never gave proper review material and the items in lecture were not near the level expected for the exams. Definitely a class you will have to work at everyday to do just decently. I recommend taking this class elsewhere because none of the profs are that great.
                
                   She tends to make lots mistakes throughout her lectures. She is not very clear when it comes to explaining things. But she does offer office hours and is willing to explain. She also answers questions during class and offers some extra credit. She really is not that bad of a professor.
                
                   Do not take her if at all possible. Take scarbrough. Fry is a sweet and very kind lady, but it's obvious she doesn't know the material, she offers no curve with test averages in the 60's, and her tests are difficult and mostly free response. Horrible math professor overall.
                
                   Fry is really helpful and cares. She is constantly sending out email giving advice. She doesn't go that fast and compared to other professors she is easier. She is a little scatter brain but its part of her personally. She is very quirky. She will answer any questions asked during class, and always encourages you to come to her office hours.
                
                   Worst teacher I have ever had. She didn't know how to explain the material, and often made many mistakes in her notes. The average test scores were 40's and she offered little help when asked. the only thing that saved me from failing was high homework grades. DO NOT TAKE HER
                
                   Horrible Teacher, clearly not fit to teach the course. She explained on the first day that prior to this semester she was a HIGH SCHOOL SUB. She is a scatter brain, and solves her problems in class with little explanation.  Would not recommend at all.
                
                   THE WORST MATH PROFESSOR I'VE EVER TAKEN. SHE UNDERSTAND AND LOVES MATH, BUT SHE CAN'T EXPLAIN IT TO SAVE HER LIFE! COOL & FUNNY BUT UNLESS YOU ALREADY KNOW THE MATERIAL OR UNDERSTAND THE VERY CONFUSING ONLINE BOOK THAN YOU SHOULDN'T TAKE THIS CLASS. AT LEAST 75% OF HIS STUDENTS FAILED EACH TEST. THE AVERAGE USUALLY RANGED FROM A 31-50 FOR EXAMS.
                
                   She was terrible at teaching! Students were constantly correcting her. The test average on her last test of the year was a 40 and she offered no curve. You'd be better off just jumping straight into calculus than trying to take from her.
                
                   This is the worse teacher I have ever taken. She understood her own material well but could not teach at all. When I asked for help she told me to go study more. DO NOT take this teacher if you can. Students would have to correct her in class because of all the mistakes she made and she did not prepare much before coming to class. Bad exp. overall.
                
                   His tests are very difficult. The average on the first one was a 43. That was after he let us use the book. He's nice, but he basically copies our notes from the book.
                
                   I actually failed his class and had to retake it. His tests weren't that hard but his final was. HE DOESN"T CURVE. STUDY HARD especially for the 3rd and final tests.
                
                   Math has always been my best subject and I did not do well with him. He was not confident in the material he was teaching and he seemed to be unsure at times. He rarely worked out example problems with us and when he did, he worked them wrong most of the time. He is an extremely nice guy, just not a very good teacher. I do not suggest taking him. 
                
                   Dutta is only a grad student, but he really cares about his students' success. In lecture he is a good teacher, if you pay attention its not hard to follow along, but one on one he is an amazing teacher. Attendance isn't mandatory but he gives graded in class activities that will hurt your grade if you aren't there to take them. 
                
                   WORST PROFESSOR IVE HAD. Avoid taking this professor at all costs. She is too old to be teaching and had brain surgery. Do not listen in class it will only confuse you more. Says she doesn't take attendance in beginning of year then proceeds to be tricky on purpose and take attendance quizzes in CLASS. she is difficult on purpose. Strict abt phones
                
                   I did not enjoy her class. When she worked out a problem, she would work it out wrong by putting in wrong numbers or confuse +/- signs. Her method of problem solving are very roundabout and I had to drop her class. I would not recommend taking her class.  
                
                   Posts notes online to complete as she lectures. Write down everything! Textbook is useless. Helpful during office hours, will go over tests with you. Tests are difficult, must study lots. Very strict about cell phones. Do ALL homework and quizzes. If you skip class, you won't pass.
                
                   While she knows the material, she often poorly communicates the material in lectures, even making mistakes while showing work for the class. Lectures fail to cover much of what appears in homework and her exams. Worst of all, she wastes a lot of time before exams, making finishing difficult. While she can be nice, I would not recommend her.
                
                   I respected Mrs. Drost, but it is a very tough class. Nothing from homework or quizzes were on the tests, and her tests were so hard. I took calc in high school and come out of it with a 97, so I knew calculus very well, but her class is very difficult. And do NOT buy a textbook. Said it was mandatory, have touched it since I picked it up
                
                   Very fast when going through the little material she did teach about. Really old and can appear cranky but is nice. While she is nice, very hard to get a good grade so not worth your time.
                
                   THE WORST AT A&M. Does not care about her students at all and tests you on material that she does not cover. First exam she boasted how it was made to be finished within the allotted class period but she started 25 minutes late and took them up 5 minutes early. DO NOT TAKE UNDER ANY CIRCUMSTANCE. She think's that she is a good teacher but she's not
                
                   I had excellent grades on the homework and failed the tests.  Her instruction and homework is not aligned to the exams.  That is a sign of a poor educator.
                
                   She is not a great teacher and moves very quickly. Has pop quizzes so you basically are required to attend if you want an A. The tests are hard and have things that haven't been covered on them. I would not recommend her.
                
                   Terrible teacher. She came out of retirement to teach again.  I dreaded going to her class every time. She thinks her jokes are funny, but they are not. She always talks about how she never gets any sleep during class, and you just want her to get to the point.  She will give Pop Quizzes all the time so beware.  She goes over things never on Hw.
                
                   She came out of retirement to teach this class, enough said.
                
                   She is very intimidating. She is tough but if you keep up on it and go to her office hours you can do well in this class. I would recommend printing out web assign to review for the tests. Her tests are hard and the problems on them are very intimidating so you need to be prepared.
                
                   She is extremely rude and calls out people in class. Paranoid of cheating and gives back test late. I do not recommend this teacher.
                
                   Offers alot of office hours and if you go to them it helps alot. She is very intemidating at first but is a very nice and understanding prof who wants you to succeed! Take her and show you care and you will be fine
                
                   Not that bad a prof. she moves really quick though so if this is your 1st calc. WATCH OUT! She tries to offer alot of office hours and tries to be helpful, But I always felt like she didn't understand why I couldn't get it and that it was my fault for not understanding her. Book hw isn't required...but if you want to do well in the course DO IT.
                
                   very difficult instructor, hard to keep up in her class. moves very quickly and test dont reflect her notes.
                
                   classes are somewhat fun to go to. her style of teaching is pretty effective
                
                   Don't take her.
                
                   don't take this class, waited until after drop to give back the test, doesn't care if you have questions or understands she just moves on, and don't look up during the test or she thinks your cheating even if you look at her
                
                   The class is hard and involves a lot of quizzes and such but she offers several ways to get help. Her attitude sometimes can seem rude but she likes to joke around a bit too sometimes. Expect to have to work hard to do well.
                
                   Stresses understanding concepts rather than just being able to solve the problem. Bit different than what most students would be used to in terms of teaching style but in the long run it is actually to their benefit. He also encourages questions, so do not be afraid to ask. Probably would take again if I could.
                
                   Mr. DeWolff is a very caring professor. He connects with his students individually, and makes sure everyone is on the same level before proceeding. He encourages questions, so do not hesitate to ask. He explains math in a way that really gets you thinking. It kind of forces you to know what is going on and why, not only the numbers involved. 
                
                   Dewolff cares about his students and wants them to succeed.  However, he stresses knowing concepts over practicing problems, which is not the learning style of most students coming out of high school.  I struggled through this class, but if you stay on top of your homework, and pay attention during his lecture, you will pass.
                
                   This professor along side his TA are the worst combination you could ever get. I advise you, do not take his class, you'll hate it! Professor hardly explains and when he does, it will confuse you more than it will help you. I had to sit in order professor's lectures in order to learn the content and pass the class! 
                
                   His class is not easy, and he will make you work for your grade. He writes a lot because he is more interested in you knowing the concepts. If you know the concepts well enough, solving the problems will be easier. He was always willing to help and he genuinely cares about his students. Just show him that you're really trying.
                
                   He's a visiting prof from Germany, but have no fear his english is on point. That wasnt the problem. His math confused me. I stopped going to lecture and went to tutoring instead. It is a math class yet his notes end up as novels on the board. Hard to follow and keep up with. Genuinely kind and doesn't like to let his students fail. There for you.
                
                   Very Nice, but some accent.  Somtimes a little hard to understand.  Know her material, but at times make mistakes during lecture.  Multiple choice Final.  Do not Highly recommend.
                
                   She is an excellent teacher.  She knows her material and is very willing to help you if you are wanting to learn.  Her tests take the entire 50 min, so if you are a slow test-taker, this could hurt you.  She offers extra credit and extra points for attendance.  If you pay attention, she is not as difficult to understand as some say.  I recommend.
                
                   A very nice teacher, but is hard to understand and seems to jump to conclusions w/out explaining how she got there.  Do not take her unless you have a very good foundation in calculus.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   i absolutely hated this class, but the good news is i failed every test except the final and still pulled a B with all the hw and quiz grades.
                
                   She is really nice and willing to help if you act like you care.  Her homework and examples on the notes cover what is on the tests.  The class can be herd though.  She has notes available online.
                
                   She is very hard to understand. Going to class and taking note will not be enough to pass. Most tests are too long to finish in 50 min.
                
                   Hard to understand. Is not a good class to take if you do not have a good background in math and are not able to find a tutor to teach you the information you cannot learn from her. She is a nice woman however, just not a very good teacher.
                
                   wasnt very helpful to me. and very diffucult to understand
                
                   she's super nice, just go to class u'll do good her examples are on the tests
                
                   Just go to class you can pass it
                
                   He was very straight forward and was clear about what he wanted since day 1. He is an honest man and I really respect him. I enjoyed his class and would absolutely take another course with him if he ever offeres 
                
                   An excellent professor. Everybody should take him. Can go to any extent for helping you. He is AWESOME!... Extremely Knowledgable!!!
                
                   GREAT  prof. who actually cares about his students and how well they learn.  Isn't out to weed out freshman students with his math class-- he's just out to get his students to learn!  His class requires work, but it's NOT impossible.
                
                   She may come off as rude but she is just firm. Do not break the rules in her class and you will be fine. I HATE math and i loved this class, she is super nice, sit in the front even if you are shy (like me) because she will notice it and will help you. She is there to make you have a better grade.
                
                   Ms. Bollinger can be a bit abrasive at times, yes, but her notes are crystal clear and she does her job well as a professor. She expects you to come to class and pay attention while you're there, which is fair, and if you use the notes she provides and stay on top of the weekly homework assignments, you should have no problems.
                
                   Professor Bollinger was great! DO NOT HAVE YOUR CELL PHONE OUT OR ON! She is very strict about cell phones, but honestly, it made it easier to focus. Do the work and study, you will do fine. It is easy to forget the material so practice problems are a must. She is there to help if you need it so take advantage! Would take her again!
                
                   Kathryn was the worst professor I have ever had, knew or even heard of and especially from A&M. She is the definition of disrespectful and has more attitude than your average teenage girl. She seemed power hungry and threatened us when any phone went off or was seen in or out of class. She wasted time over it. Impatient and very rude. NEVER again.
                
                   Bollinger is a really great teacher. She knows what she wants and expects her students to really try and understand the math. She seems pretty cruel during class because she will not tolerate cellphone usage. When I went to her office hours though she was very nice and approachable. If you aren't good at math, use every extra help you can find!
                
                   I'm a liberal arts major so math is NOT my thing. I thought she was a little intimidating at first but she talked to all of us in the front rows before class and is really awesome.  She was really helpful in office hours, tests were average and I made a B on all of them, go to class and you'll have no problem passing 
                
                   Kathryn was very good at making the material understandable.  She puts the notes up on her website for you to print off and then you go over them in class.  You can expect a quiz or in class assignment at least once a week, but as long as you pay attention you should be fine.  This was my first A in math since my soph. yr of HS.  Would recommend!
                
                   Go to Office hours!
                
                   I miss having Bollinger, only because of the clarity of her notes. Her personality on the other hand I don't miss one bit. She's rude, harsh environment to learn in. Prepare to walk into Germany in 1941, because she practices a diplomatic regime of teaching. Her way or the highway (take the highway). Notes are great, tests are not. No phones. 
                
                    Tried to ask for help in her office hours and she was a bit rude. She can definitely come off as apathetic. Stay positive and pay attention in class.  You can't really skip class because she gives pop quizzes. No phones ever. The homework help and week in review sessions with the other professor that teaches 167 really helped! 
                
                   Kathryn is very clear and helpful professor. That is not to say that she is not strict in class. She has rules that she expects you to follow and will call you out if you do not. But, these rules are in place to ensure that those that go to class pay attention and have a distraction free class. If you need help all you need to do is ask for it.
                
                   At first, she's terrifying but then you get to really like her. 
                
                   Not an easy A, in fact I barely passed. She gives difficult tests, weekly homeworks and quizzes, and also made me feel uncomfortable with her threats to other students. Her last words while walking out of the final were, "I should give you all zero's." Due to a phone jingling. If someone cared they'd advise you NOT to take her as a professor. 
                
                   Kathryn was my favorite professor this semester. She can be really strict, but if you get on her good side, she'll always help you and joke around with you before class! There's homework due almost every week and she give in class assignments pretty regularly so GO TO CLASS! Plus, you don't want to miss her notes. I would definitely take again. :) 
                
                   You have to go to class. She takes a grade pretty much every day and if you miss multiple assignments, your grade will drop significantly. Her tests can be tricky, but doable if you practice enough. You have to work to get a good grade in this class. Also, she comes across as harsh and hates cell phones, but she's good at what she does.
                
                   Kathryn was a great professor.  Business math 1  is unlike any other math because it doesn't cover what you would have taken in your high school pre-cal or calculus class.  However she presents the notes and subjects in a very well manner and explains everything you need to know for the test.  I never used the book or practiced problems, just notes
                
                   She was a great teacher. the concepts were clear and you always know what is expected of you. she gives lots of in class work so you have to go. the homework is due every week but it is pretty easy if you follow along in class. she hates cell phones and is mean to the class as a whole but she is super helpful one on one. 
                
                   This was definitely a hard class. I had just taken Statistics in high school so I had a lot of background knowledge, and I don't think I would have been very successful if I didn't have that. She thoroughly explains topics and has very organized lectures, but she's really weird about phones. If you put in a TON of work, you will be successful.
                
                   The tests were tough, but with a lot of work they're a B. It will take up all of your time.
                
                   She has a very monotone voice which makes the class boring and hard to get interested in the topic. 
                
                   One of the best professors to take for MATH 251. Homework practices on webassign are submitted the night before so if you dont understand a problem you can look at the practice solution and figure it out. STUDY HER PAST TESTS AND QUIZES. This is essential because it is hard material and her past test and quizes mirror the ones she will give you.
                
                   If you know you have a rough semester ahead of you, I would recommend Dr. Biard. She is nice and helpful, but I found it difficult to stay focused the whole lecture. She makes the course very reasonable by writing quizzes and tests that are very similar to previous ones that she posts on her site. I didn't become a calculus expert but I did well.
                
                   She is an excellent instructor during office hours and responds to emails almost immediately with thorough explanation. I only went to class during the last 30 min on quiz days and I am making a high A. Do ALL the homework, study the past exams and look at past quizzes before you take that quiz and you will make an easy A. Highly recommend! 
                
                   She is a decent prof in lecture. Go to class, write down her examples, make sure you understand the homework, and you'll have a good shot at an A. She drops the lowest midterm and gives the quiz dates in advanced. She is very helpful in office hours and is a very nice person overall.
                
                   Very nice teacher from France. She has 2 midterms, and she drops the lowest grade. Question on exams are similar to the ones gone over in class and in homework. Usually, you will have a quiz every few weeks. She is very helpful during office hours. Class is pretty easy. Take her if you can!
                
                   I hope that there are no more professors like this at this university. Heavily relied on the calculator which was of no use in semesters to come. His lectures were bad and he didn't answer students questions unless they came to office hours. Slightly rude and sarcastic and didn't mind making students feel silly for asking questions.
                
                   Obsessed with calculators that you cant use on the test until the final
                
                   After the first week of class, no one showed up anymore. The only thing you learn in class is how to use his  "illustrious machine" that you can't even use on the common exams. I think I was more productive in counting the dumb phrases he thought he used to be funny rather than actually learning math.
                
                   He has videos online that help way more than he does in class. Lecture is mostly him trying to be funny. He does stay on schedule and his homework is due in a few big chunks rather than every other day or weekly. 
                
                   Very nice and helpful, but her tests are HARD!!
                
                   So, I took his calc1 at university of ottawa. I remember he mentioned that he won't be teaching in uottawa anymore cuz he found a job back in the states () For you fellas to know, his teaching is okay. He covered most of the types of questions showing up in assignments and exams.  Just practice and memorize the types of problem sets. 
                
                   Steve is a fairly lazy teacher, but that makes him so laid back. He's actually not that bad of a teacher; differential equations isn't a bad class as people make it out to be.
                
                   Ben has hands down been the best professor I've had since I've been at A&M. All his notes can be found online and he's always willing to help. His lectures reflect the material that's going to be on the test and his final was straight forward, no tricks. Awesome professor.
                
                   He is great! I didn't have calculus background so I struggled through some of the material but he was an awesome teacher. Very willing to help you succeed. Very generous when it came to curves/grading. He posts the notes online in case you miss something and he is very good about communicating via email.
                
                   Aurispa is an excellent professor. His lectures and homework are very representative of the tests. Professor Aurispa is always professional and helpful.  His office hours are very helpful, but if you need more help there are plenty of other resources like the "week  in review" and tutoring in Evans. Also don't cheat on the MatLAB assignments
                
                   Professor Aurispa is amazing! He is always there to answer questions and offer help when needed. His lectures are clear and he posts notes and filled notes online which is really helpful if you miss class. He's by far the best math prof I've had, so I would definitely recommend taking his class!
                
                   Ben is awesome. I had him for 151 and skipped my 152 prof's lectures to go to his. He is exceptionally organized, clear, and helpful. He does a great job of explaining things to make sure everyone understands. He reviews for tests and posts notes that cover everything that ends up on tests. Very do-able A, should be a guaranteed B if you work hard.
                
                   Ben is is the best, lets be real.  He is so precise and accurate in his explanations.  I got above 95's on everything in the course, except for MATLAB (5%),  It was the easiest course I've taken.  Easy A if you aren't lazy, guaranteed B.
                
                   Lets be honest who doesn't love Ben he is the best!  He is a great prof.  I didnt have him for 151, but because we had common exams I attended his lectures instead of my profs, so even if you don't get him I recommend doing that.  He informed me of the section he would be teaching for 152 ahead of time so that I was able to get in his 152 class.   
                
                   One of my favorite professors from freshman year because of his helpfulness and how clear and helpful his lectures are. The common exams are hard but he does his best to prepare you for them. The only exam he gets to right is the final and it tends to be straightforward. 
                
                   By far the best math prof at TAMU. He always had the highest test averages out of all professors and he truly cares that you understand. Cal 2 has been one of my easiest college courses yet thanks to Ben. Show up to class, FOCUS in lecture, do your homework (try without notes first) and it's an easy A. His class fills up immediately so be quick! 
                
                   He's a great calculus professor. I would highly recommend taking him for Math 152 or 151. He makes notes so you can print them out and go along with him as he works out problems. He teaches all the material you need to know for tests in a clear manner. If you do the homework and study the notes, you're sure to make a good grade.
                
                   He is honestly the best Professor for engineering math. His notes are clear and go well with the homework and he is very approachable if you have any questions. Take his classes and you wont regret it!
                
                   Aurispa is the best math professor at A&M. His lecture notes are amazing study tools and often have problems like what you see on the homework. I took him for 151 and am taking him again for 152 and without him I would probably be failing this class. His lectures draw people from other classes so make sure to show up early, not just on time.
                
                   Ben is the best Professor I've had at TAMU, is the most amazing guy. And no doubt is the hottest Professor out there I mean his picture on the tamu web page gets me going lol. He's such a good lecturer that other people from other 152 classes come to our lecture cause their profs suck. I highly highly recommend Ben to anyone. Plus he posts notes
                
                   Absolutely the best Calculus professor at the University!!! Ben is awesome and made this class bearable.  He is a super nice guy and always willing to help.  It's not his fault the common exams suck, but he does his absolute best to present the material in a way that you are able to follow. 
                
                   Yes, the tests are hard (homework can be challenging), but he isn't the one making them, all the classes will have the same kind. He is really easy going, talks clear and elaborates just enough to where he isn't blabbing but makes it to where you can easily understand it for the most part. Would so take him again!
                
                   He teaches good
                
                   Professor Ben is just my favorite! I took math 151, and I made an A! That was tough, but once you put an effort - you will succeed! I was registered for another professor for math 152, but I changed my whole schedule, dropped all other courses and forced myself in one of his sections. I am sure that was worth it!
                
                   Prof. Aurispa was very clear and helpful. He explained everything very in depth and clearly. There was quite a bit of homework and studying involved in this class. The tests which are common throughout the course were very tough, but he tried his hardest to prepare us for them. 
                
                   He is an awesome teacher but the tests are just difficult.
                
                   Really great lectures plan on taking as many calc classes as possible with him.
                
                   I lucked out getting Professor Austin! She is widely known as the best (math) professor on campus and I believe it. Other professor's students would come to her office hours and her lectures.   She writes the tests, so whatever she teaches is what you need to know. Her notes are online, completed and not  I have her again in the Spring for 152
                
                   She is overall a great professor.  She teaches clearly, and her office hours are convenient and laid back and she will make sure you end up understanding!  I'm so glad to be taking her again for MATH 152!
                
                   Austin is the best!! Her lectures are extremely simple, and makes calculus very easy to understand. She posts her notes online so you can skip, but sitting in her class will get you a better chance for an A. Practice tests are similar to the real tests. She will talk to you if you need help. Overall, an awesome teacher, TAKE HER IF YOU CAN!!
                
                   She is an amazing professor. She explains everything in detail and posts all notes online.(Just Google Amy Austin math 151). Soon before exams she goes over a practice exam that is really similar to the real test. There is a quiz every week but she posts online what is going to be about. There is a lot of homework but she will help in office hours.
                
                   She makes a lot of mistakes and is not really able to explain the material because she is constantly making small mistakes on the notes. It seems as if she is never prepared for class. She is even sometimes rude to students who try and correct her or ask questions. At least she grades things fairly.
                
                   Amy really wants you to learn the material. She is willing to explain something multiple ways if a student doesn't understand it and she will work with you in her office hours to make sure that you understand how to do problems and not just how to finish the homework.
                
                   BEST MATH PROFESSOR HERE! DO ANYTHING TO HAVE HER!
                
                   I have no clue as to why her rating is so high. She is competent but she always messes up when taking notes (but is corrected) and she knows her stuff so well since she is tenured that she flies through the notes at 100 mph. If you ask her a question she will spit the answer back and keep it moving, and she is kind of rude, take JD Kim.
                
                   Amy Austin is bae :) She is literally the best teacher you can have in college: she explains everything so well and in steps to where you understand how to do everything. Not only that, but she makes the common exams, so if you take her class then you will do very well on the tests. Her classes fill up fast! I would do anything to take her again!!
                
                   She is one of the best math teachers. Super helpful and easy to understand. Try to get her as a teacher if you can!!
                
                   Amy is seriously the best teacher you can ever get, well if you can even get a class with her. They fill up quick! She will prepare you for the exam, which she makes. Its not to hard to make an A. Just do your work and go to class. She's very helpful in office hours!
                
                   She was very helpful during office hours and very nice to talk to. I had trouble during class staying focused for the hour and 15 minutes. Compared to a sub that taught one class, she didn't explain what she was doing as well, but she would answer any questions askes. She will call anyone out for talking or cell phone use during class.
                
                   Great professor, always willing to answer as many questions as possible.  She does teach very fast but she offers tutoring sessions that go over what we do in class that slow it down a lot.  Over all she is the greatest Math professor but her classes fill up fast.  Also always do the homework!!!!!!!
                
                   :) great prof, hard to get a class with her, they fill up fast
                
                   Many students appreciate her step-by-step teaching style, but I found it difficult to learn math through only examples. I didn't truly understand the concepts we were learning in class, instead only how to do problems. This made it difficult for me to do well on tests with problems I had never seen before.
                
                   Great Teacher, and I messed up by not doing the easy homework assignments.  DO YOUR HOMEWORK!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very helpful for freshmen engineering majors.  Take her if you can get into her class.
                
                   One of my favorite teachers... Wondering if she still has her cat, Lucy...
                
                   Dr. Anshelevich is a difficult professor and has a strange voice. You do not have to go to class but it is very helpful if you do. The tests are ridiculous but they are passable. Only three people had an A at midterm.
                
                   Professor Allen isn't your typical professor. She's younger and  has a more entertaining less stuffy lecture style. She'll laugh at herself. I have two tips for anyone taking her. 1) When you take her 50 minute classes, she has to cram a lot into the time,  so take her in the longer time slot. 2) Talk to her! she curved my 87 to an A at the end.
                
                   Dr. Allen was honestly the best math teacher I've ever had. Shes such a nice woman, and genuinely cares about the success of her students. The subject is hard (I mean it is calculus), but if you do the homework, study, and actually work for it, you'll do well. She offers so many tutoring opportunities that really it would be your fault if you fail.
                
                   Had I known what to study for the first test I would've been alright. We had a test the day after thanksgiving break and that hurt a lot of people. She said the final would be all "work-out" type problems but there was still a lot of concept so that sucked but she gives lot of extra credit and I honestly learned more from her than I did in hs calc.
                
                   Professor Allen, is probably the best person to take MATH 142 with. Her tests are at least 75% conceptual, so please know how to work everyone problem from start to answer, detailing how everything fits into that problem. Definitely not a blow off class, but if you like hands on respectful professors who actually help, take her. She is awesome.
                
                   Most difficult thing about the class is that the tests don't include much math and are more focused around concepts. Homework is truly easy but nothing close to the level on the tests. Would not recommend this professor if you are expecting to legitimately do math. Going to lectures provides notes, but the notes won't help prepare you for tests.
                
                   The material is difficult but she is an amazing prof who is always there for you if you need help! Her week-in-reviews are the best ways to prepare for the exams. There is a lot of homework but try to get good grades on them because they will help your grade in the class. She is probably the best professor to take Math 142 from at Texas A&M.
                
                   Dr. Allen is such a nice professor, but she is tough! Her tests are mostly "concepts" rather than math. She is always there to help you with any questions you may have. She gives extra information about what is on the test at office hours. Do the week in Reviews! She pulls some test questions straight from those. She offers some bonus on exams. 
                
                   She is awesome! By far the best math professor I've had at A&M! Go to her office hours, she is very helpful. She will help you with homework, and give you advice about the tests. 
                
                   Prof Allen was a great professor! Although the class is very difficult and a majority of the students failed the first test, Prof Allen gave us extra credit on every test and final. I got a 52 on the first test and was able to finish with an A by the end of the semester. WORK HER WEEK-IN REVIEWS. Majority of test questions come straight from them. 
                
                   Allen is a wonderful teacher who will stop to help if you do not understand something or have questions. The test are tough and I recommend you do every week in review to prepare for them. She does give a generous curve on the test when students don't do well. I bombed my final and 23 test and somehow managed to get a B in her class!! Take Allen!!
                
                   Allen was the best professor I've ever had by far! Uses web assign for homework (drops 4 lowest), weekly quizzes (drops one), 3 tests (usually curves), one cumulative final. I'll most likely fail calculus, but that's because I'm horrid at math. She has the most incredible passion for students DO WHATEVER YOU CAN TO TAKE Allen!
                
                   This is a tough course. However, professor is AMAZING and she helps you as much as she possibly can. It's a tough course  but if you put in the work and she's sees that she is more than willing to help. I would recommend her any day. LOVE her! (oh yea sit at the front and talk to her in the beginning of class)
                
                   She can go through the notes pretty quickly, but she'll stop and explain something if you ask. She's a really sweet person and keeps it interesting. Her tests are different from the homework and the quizzes though. Study!!
                
                   Allen has been my favorite professor this semester! The material isn't easy but she cares about her students and will do what she can to help you pass! Look at the week-in-reviews and you're golden for the tests!
                
                   This class was super difficult. However, Angela Allen has been one of the most helpful math teacher I have ever had. You definitely have to study for the test but as long as you do the week in reviews over and over and go to her office hours she will be willing to help you as much as possible. 
                
                   Prof Allen is amazing. You can ask her any question in class. She loves to clarify anything you have questions on. She is easy to talk to, very laid back, and she wants nothing more than for her students to succeed. Get to know her, go to her office hours, she will help you as much as you need. I would recommend her 110%!!
                
                   Best teacher I have ever had at A&M. If you have to take 131 or 142 take her class. She is super helpful and attentive. It is not an easy class though, so just be prepared to actually do work.
                
                   Professor Allen is by far the best professor I've had at A&M. She is SOOO willing to help you and takes time to remember names if you make an effort to go to her. The workload isn't bad at all & she really prepares you for the tests so that they're a walk through the park. She is BY FAR the best calculus professor here. & she's super nice. Take her
                
                   Professor Allen is by far the best professor I've had at A&M. She is SOOO willing to help you and takes time to remember names if you make an effort to go to her. The workload isn't bad at all & she really prepares you for the tests so that they're a walk through the park. She is BY FAR the best calculus professor here. & she's super nice! 
                
                   Allen was a great professor, however her exams are extremely difficult. She curved every exam and the final grade. Although despite that I ended up failing. Go to her WIR sessions and office hours and do all the homework assignments and you should be able to pass. The exams were multiple choice and the other profs are work out questions.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Highly recommend if ur more concerned with good understanding and better grade.
                
                   Cons- horrendous test that do not reflect his lectures. Essentially, is not available during office hours. just stands in front of the class and lectures. he is smart, but it takes more than that to become a great teacher.
                
                   He was awesome.  He tried to get us involved.  Great lecturer.  He was always available outside of class to help.  Very friendly.  Great teacher.
                
                   She was super easy as long as you attended class! She also took attendance every day and that attendance helped a lot with the final grade as well.Overall, very easy as long as you pay attention and do your homework. Should definitely be an easy B at the very least.
                
                   I have taken 2 of her Math online classes and barely made it through both of them. The lesson notes are confusing and they do not explain the material well. She shows you the solutions but doesnt explain how to actually get there.
                
                   Well organized schedule and material. Easy if you put the time and effort. She is very helpful.
                
                   Took online- very easy class everything is very organized and allotted a good amount of time. Test are easy if you do the study guide, great teacher easy to understand and lessons are lined up well. Never used book just watched online lectures.
                
                   She smiles a lot and works with you on stuff that comes up that you can not help.
                
                   Made me aware that I needed to know a lot more before I try to teach. She had high standards but it is for us so we can teach our students math even if we do not like math.
                
                   I wouldn't have passed college algebra if it wasn't for her.  She was really easy going and helpful.
                
                   She expects us to learn the material but is helpful. This is the first math class I have ever understood and enjoyed. People who do not come to class or wont work do not like the class but those jerks should go work at Sonic.
                
                   she listens and she cares and anyone who does not ejoy her classes should go work at wendy's!
                
                   Nice and helpful. Cares whether we understand or not.
                
                   The prerequisites for this class are high school Algebra I and II, and high school geometry. The purpose of the class is not to learn geometry, but to learn to teach it. You better review your geometry, because she won't help you relearn it. It is a great class if you are not lazy and want your hand held.
                
                   Willing to help you if you ask, homework is mandatory, you will not pass the class if you don't pass the tests. If you're not good at math like I am, you WILL need to study and/or get a tutor. Her tests are usually pretty short, typically 10 questions, or just a few more, but keep in mind that puts more pressure on you to know the material.
                
                   She is very nice. In my opinion, it is one of my easiest classes I've taken maybe because I am good at Math and interested in it. The test is not long or hard.  You should go to class and pay attention. However, the way that she solves some problems is different from others; therefore, if you go to Math lab and ask them, it will make you confused. 
                
                   Pay attention
                
                   I was in the class where the first two weeks were supposed to be "intermediate" because I was at the last orientation. I had scored high on my TSI  and didn't think I needed the intermediate part, but as soon as she started her class, all of my previous math knowledge vanished. All she seemed to do was confuse me and I had to drop the class
                
                   She was the best math teacher I've have ever had! I would recommend her to anyone!!
                
                   She is a very good teacher. She is helpful and non-judgmental. Her test are really fair as well
                
                   Miss Hajje is an amazing math teacher. She's extremely knowledgeable, approachable, and fully commits herself to her students. She she makes math easy to understand and regardless if your a modern day Einstein or math scares you I highly recommend Mrs. Hajje for your future math classes.
                
                   Really great teacher. She can be a little...interesting at time. But you'll have a good laugh with her.
                
                   I took her pre-cal class. And I had a emergency that caused me to miss several classes. Professor chase worked with me to help me get caught up and back on track. She is really understanding and wants to help you learn the material.
                
                   She is great always there if you need her!!!
                
                   Very good professor, goes out of her way to help her students. Would definitely recommend.
                
                   Very helpful. Very Easygoing. She will make sure you get the grades you want or more likely you deserve.
                
                   No Comments
                